John Locke 

Some Thoughts Concerning Education 



1693 



Source: http://www.socsci.kun.nl/ped/whp/histeduc/locke/ 




A brief introduction 

John Locke, born in 1632 in Wrington near Bristol, studied science, medicine and 
philosophy at Oxford. In 1667, he became the personal physician of the prominent Lord 
Antony Ashley, and soon also acted as governor for the Lord's son. When in 1683 his 
employer was exiled for political reasons, Locke accompanied him and lived in the 
Netherlands until the Dutch prince William in 1689 became King of England. Locke then 
took a position at the Treasury which he held until a few years before his death in 1704. 

His main works all were published about 1690, although he had developed much of his 
ideas in the preceding decades. Apart from financial and political treatises (in which he 
presented an early view on constitutional government) Locke's most important 
philosophical work was the Essay Concerning Human Understanding. In that book, he 
tried to refute the concept of "innate ideas": according to him, human knowledge and 
morals originated from experience, being acquired through the senses. This made Locke 
one of the first representants of empiricist philosophy. 

One of the aspects of this philosophical view was the concept of people being born as 
"tabula rasa": a blank sheet, which was gradually filled in by experience. This may 
explain why Locke considered education an important activity that deserved careful 
consideration: education meant helping to fill that blank with knowledge and morals. 
Which in turn meant that the educator ought to take care to further such knowledge and 
morals, as would be useful both for the pupil himself and for the community as a whole. 
What arose here, was basically the new Enlightenment idea of the pupil as a moldable 
entity: as a person who could be improved by a good education — but also corrupted by a 
bad one. 

Locke's book Some Thoughts Concerning Education originated from a series of letters 
which he about 1684 wrote from the Netherlands to advise a friend, Edward Clarke, on 
his son's education. After his return to England, Locke expanded this material into the 
book which first appeared in 1693. Within a few years, the book was translated into 
French, Dutch, Swedish, and later in German and Italian: for the better part of the next 
century, it remained a highly popular education manual among the better classes. 

As an education manual, this book was not intended for all: in line with the views of his 
time, it was highly class-specific. About educating children at the other end of the social 
spectrum, children of the poor, Locke wrote something quite different: his 1697 proposal 
On Working Schools. For these children of the masses, he wanted an education that in the 
very first place would teach them to work: to become useful and god-fearing people who 
would not be dependent from charity. The education described in Some Thoughts 
Concerning Education was what Locke had in mind only for children of a relatively small 
elite (and he was thinking mainly of the boys here). 

Locke wanted this education to create the archetype of a gentleman: a rationally thinking, 
morally dependable, socially capable person given to both adequate reflection and 
adequate action. To achieve this, the necessary basis had to be a sober, natural, healthy 




development of the body. In the second place, it required the development of (in this 
order) Virtue, Wisdom, Breeding, and Learning. Locke considered good morals and good 
manners more important than knowledge; and as far as knowledge was concerned, he 
stressed it should be selected not just because of some educational tradition, but rather for 
reasons of usability and practicality — as became apparent, for example, in his exposition 
about learning foreign languages and one's own. 

The fact that upper-class boys used to be educated individually, by governors, allowed 
Locke to promote natural teaching methods as the most effective approach: that is, 
teaching that was more concrete than abstract, and that to some extent took into account 
(and made use of) the individual pupil’s temperament, interests, capabilities and 
environment. He pointed out explicitly that no two children were the same, or that 
compelling children to learn when they didn't want to might turn out to be ineffective. 

But especially in moral respects such as honesty, modesty, obedience, etc. Locke also 
drew a firm line: the child should in no way be spoiled. The pupil should learn his proper 
place in the social order: if possible without harsh punishments, but if necessary the hard 
way. 

As an education manual, the essence of Some Thoughts Concerning Education was the 
advice to do what was practical and effective, even if this meant ignoring some venerable 
tradition. Apart from its philosophical foundations, it was this rational, almost common- 
sense orientation on achieving educational results that made the book (within the social 
and normative limitations of its time) an important step forward in educational guidance, 
and a success with the public for which it was intended. While from a present-day 
viewpoint many of Locke's specific advices may appear wrong or even ridiculous, he also 
gave observations that may still come across as reasonable or sensible. 

At the same time, this book's almost utilitarian focus on achieving educational results 
may illustrate to the present-day reader what is perhaps the most important difference 
between Locke's late- 17th century views and our own. For Locke, childhood appears to 
have been mainly something that had to be overcome, that offered opportunities for a 
step-by-step conversion into maturity. What really mattered to Locke and his 
contemporaries was never the child: it was the future adult. 

POSTSCRIPT 

Someone suggested I also ought to point out that Locke never had children himself. Let 
me add that the idea that Locke might have written a different book if he'd been a father, 
may reveal more about the 20th century concept of parenthood, than about a 17th century 
author. 



Henk van Setten 




Dedication 

TO 

EDWARD CLARKE, 
OF 

CHIPLEY, Esq.; 



SIR, 

These Thoughts concerning Education, which now come abroad into the world, do of 
right belong to you, being written several years since for your sake, and are no other than 
what you have already by you in my letters. I have so little varied any thing, but only the 
order of what was sent you at different times, and on several occasions, that the reader 
will easily find, in the familiarity and fashion of the style, that they were rather the 
private conversation of two friends, than a discourse designed for public view. 

The importunity of friends is the common apology for publications men are afraid to own 
themselves forward to. But you know I can truly say, that if some, who, having heard of 
these papers of mine, had not pressed to see them, and afterwards to have them printed, 
they had lain dormant still in that privacy they were designed for. But those whose 
judgment I defer much to, telling me, that they were persuaded, that this rough draft of 
mine might be of some use, if made more public, touched upon what will always be very 
prevalent with me: for I think it every man's indispensable duty, to do all the service he 
can to his country; and I see not what difference he puts between himself and his cattle, 
who lives without that thought. This subject is of so great concernment, and a right way 
of education is of so general advantage, that did I find my abilities answer my wishes, I 
should not have needed exhortations or importunities from others. However, the 
meanness of these papers, and my just distrust of them, shall not keep me, by the shame 
of doing so little, from contributing my mite, when there is no more required of me than 
my throwing it into the public receptacle. And if there be any more of their size and 
notions, who liked them so well, that they thought them worth printing, I may flatter 
myself they will not be lost labour to every body. 

I myself have been consulted of late by so many, who profess themselves at a loss how to 
breed their children, and the early corruption of youth is now become so general a 
complaint, that he cannot be thought wholly impertinent, who brings the consideration of 
this matter on the stage, and offers something, if it be but to excite others, or afford 
matter for correction; for errors in education should be less indulged than any. These, like 
faults in the first concoction, that are never mended in the second or third, carry their 
afterwards-incorrigible taint with them through all the parts and stations of life. 

I am so far from being conceited of anything I have here offered, that I should not be 
sorry, even for your sake, if some one abler and fitter for such a task would in a just 
treatise of education, suited to our English gentry, rectify the mistakes I have made in 
this, it being much more desirable to me, that young gentlemen should be put into (that 
which every one ought to be solicitous about) the best way of being formed and 
instructed, than that my opinion should be received concerning it. You will, however, in 
the meantime bear me witness, that the method here proposed has had no ordinary effects 




upon a gentleman's son it was not designed for. I will not say the good temper of the child 
did not very much contribute to it; but this I think you and the parents are satisfied of, 
that a contrary usage, according to the ordinary disciplining of children, would not have 
mended that temper, nor have brought him to be in love with his book, to take a pleasure 
in learning, and to desire, as he does, to be taught more than those about him think fit 
always to teach him. 

But my business is not to recommend this treatise to you, whose opinion of it I know 
already; nor it to the world, either by your opinion or patronage. The well educating of 
their children is so much the duty and concern of parents, and the welfare and prosperity 
of the nation so much depends on it, that I would have every one lay it seriously to heart; 
and after having well examined and distinguished what fancy, custom, or reason advises 
in the case, set his helping hand to promote that way in the several degrees of men, which 
is the easiest, shortest, and likeliest to produce virtuous, useful, and able men in their 
distinct callings. Though that most to be taken care of is the gentleman's calling; for if 
those of that rank are by their education once set right, they will quickly bring all the rest 
into order. 

I know not whether I have done more than shewn my good wishes towards it in this short 
discourse; such as it is, the world now has it, and if there be any thing in it worth their 
acceptance, they owe their thanks to you for it. My affection to you gave the first rise to 
it, and I am pleased, that I can leave to posterity this mark of the friendship that has been 
between us. For I know no greater pleasure in this life, nor a better remembrance to be 
left behind one, than a long-continued friendship with an honest, useful, and worthy man, 
and lover of his country. 

I am, Sir, 



Your most humble and most faithful servant. 




§ 1 A SOUND mind in a sound body, is a short but full description of a happy state in 
this world: he that has these two, has little more to wish for; and he that wants either of 
them, will be but little the better for any thing else. Men's happiness or misery is most 
part of their own making. He whose mind directs not wisely, will never take the right 
way; and he whose body is crazy and feeble will never be able to advance in it. I confess 
there are some men's constitutions of body and mind so vigorous and well framed by 
nature that they need not much assistance from others but by the strength of their natural 
genius they are from their cradles carried towards what is excellent and by the privilege 
of their happy constitutions are able to do wonders. But examples of these are but few; 
and I think I may say that, of all the men we meet with, nine parts of ten are what they 
are, good or evil, useful or not, by their education. 'Tis that which makes the great 
difference in mankind. The little, and almost insensible impressions on our tender 
infancies, have very important and lasting consequences; and there 'tis, as in the fountains 
of some rivers where a gentle application of the hand turns the flexible waters into 
channels, that make them take quite contrary courses, and by this little direction given 
them at first in the source they receive different tendencies and arrive at last at very 
remote and distant places. 

§ 2 Health. — I imagine the minds of children as easily turned, this or that way, as water 
itself; and though this be the principal part, and our main care should be about the inside, 
yet the clay cottage is not to be neglected. I shall therefore begin with the case, and 
consider first the health of the body, as that which perhaps you may rather expect, from 
that study I have been thought more peculiarly to have applied myself to; and that also, 
which will he soonest dispatched, as lying, if I guess not amiss, in a very little compass. 

§ 3 How necessary health is to our business and happiness; and how requisite a strong 
constitution, able to endure hardships and fatigue, is to one that will make any figure in 
the world, is too obvious to need any proof. 

§ 4 Tenderness. — The consideration I shall here have of health, shall be, not what a 
physician ought to do with a sick and crazy child; but what the parents without the help 
of physic should do for the preservation and improvements of an healthy, or at least not 
sickly constitution in their children. And this perhaps might be all dispatched in this sort 
rule, viz. That gentlemen should use their children as the honest farmers and substantial 
yeomen do theirs. But because the mothers possibly may think this a little too hard, and 
the fathers too short, I shall explain myself more particularly; only laying down this as a 
general and certain observation for the women to consider, viz. That most children's 
constitutions are either spoiled, or at least harmed by cockering and tenderness. 

§ 5 Warmth. — The first thing to be taken care of, is, that children be not too warmly 
clad or covered, winter or summer. The face when we are born, is no less tender than any 
other part of the body. 'Tis use alone hardens it, and makes it more able to endure the 
cold. And therefore the Scythian philosopher gave a very significant answer to the 
Athenian, who wondered how he could go naked in frost and snow. "How," said the 
Scythian, "can you endure your face exposed to the sharp winter air?" "My face is used to 




it," said the Athenian. "Think me all face," replied the Scythian. Our bodies will endure 
any thing, that from the beginning they are accustomed to. 



An eminent instance of this, though in the contrary excels of heat, being to our present 
purpose, to shew what use can do, I shall set down in the author's words, as I meet with it 
in a late ingenious voyage [Nouveau Voyage du Levant]. "The heats," says he, "are more 
violent in Malta, than in any part of Europe: they exceed those of Rome itself, and are 
perfectly stifling; and so much the more, because there are seldom any cooling breezes 
here. This makes the common people as black as Gypsies: but yet the peasants defy the 
sun; they work on in the hottest part of the day, without intermission, or sheltering 
themselves from his scorching rays. This has convinced me, that nature can bring itself to 
many things which seem impossible, provided we accustom ourselves from our infancy. 
The Malteses do so, who harden the bodies of their children, and reconcile them to the 
heat, by making them go stark naked, without shirt, drawers, or any thing on their head, 
from their cradles, till they age ten years old." 

Give me leave therefore to advise you, not to fence too carefully against the cold of this 
our climate. There are those in England, who wear the same clothes winter and summer, 
and that without any inconvenience, or more sense of cold than others find. But if the 
mother will needs have an allowance for frost and snow, gor fear of harm, and the father 
for fear of censure, be sure let not his winter-clothing be too warm: and amongst other 
things, remember, that when Nature has so well covered his head with hair, and 
strengthened it with a year or two’s age, that he can run about by day without a cape, it is 
best that by night a child should also ly without one; there being nothing that more 
exposes to head-aches, colds, catarrhs, coughs, and several other diseases, than keeping 
the head warm. 

§ 6 I have said He here, because the principal aim of my discourse is, how a young 
gentleman should be brought up from his infancy, which in all things will not so perfectly 
suit the education of daughters; though, where the difference of sex requires different 
treatment, 'twill be no hard matter to distinguish. 

§ 7 Feet. — I will also advise his feet to be washed every day in cold water, and to have 
his shoes so thin, that to might leak and let in water, whenever he comes near it. Here, I 
fear, I shall have the mistress and maids too against me. One will think it too filthy, and 
the other perhaps too much pains, to make clean his stockings. But yet truth will have it, 
that his health is much more worth, than all such considerations, and ten times as much 
more. And he that considers how mischievous and mortal a thing taking wet in the feet is, 
to those who have been bred nicely, will wish he had, with the poor people's children, 
gone bare-foot, who, by that means, come to be so reconciled by custom to wet in their 
feet, that they take no more cold ar harm by it, than if they were wet in their hands. And 
what is it, I pray, that makes this great difference between the hands and the feet in 
others, but only custom? I doubt not, but if a man from his cradle had been always used 
to go barefoot, whilst his hands were constantly wrapt up in warm mittens, and covered 
with hand-shoes, as the Dutch call gloves; I doubt not, I say, but such a custom would 
make taking wet in his hands as dangerous to him, as now taking wet in their feet is to a 




great many others. The way to prevent this, is, to have his shoes made so as to leak water, 
and his feet washed constantly every day in cold water. It is recommended for its 
cleanliness: but that which I aim at in it, is health; and therefore I limit it not precisely to 
any time of the day. I have known it used every night with very good success, and that all 
the winter, without the omitting it so much as one night in extreme cold weather; when 
thick ice covered the water, the child bathed his legs and feet in it, though he was of an 
age not big enough to rub and wipe himself; and when he began this custom was puling 
and very tender. But the great end being to harden those parts, by a frequent and familiar 
use of cold water, and therefore to prevent the mischiefs that usually attend accidental 
taking wet in the feet in those who are bred otherwise, I think it may be left to the 
prudence and convenience of the parents, to choose either night or morning. The time I 
deem indifferent, so the thing be effectually done. The health and hardiness procured by 
it, would be a good purchase at a much dearer rate. To which, if I add, the preventing of 
corns, that to some men would be a very valuable consideration. But begin first in the 
spring with luke-warm, and so colder and colder every time, till in a few days you come 
to perfectly cold water, and then continue it so winter and summer. For it is to be 
observed in this, as in all other alterations from our ordinary way of living, the changes 
must be made by gentle and insensible degrees; and so we may bring our bodies to any 
thing without pain, and without danger. 

How fond mothers are like to receive this doctrine, is not hard to foresee. What can it be 
less, than to murder their tender babes, to use them thus? What! put their feet in cold 
water in frost and snow, when all one can do is little enough to keep them warm? A little 
to remove their fear by examples, without which the plainest reason is seldom hearkened 
to: Seneca tells us of himself, Ep. 53, 83, that he used to bathe himself in cold spring- 
water in the midst of winter. This, if he had not thought it not only tolerable, but healthy 
too, he would scarce have done, in an exorbitant fortune, that could well have born the 
expense of a warm bath, and in an age (for he was then old) that would have excused 
greater indulgence. If we think his Stoical principles led him to this severity, let it be so, 
that this sect reconciled cold water to his sufferance. What made it agreeable to his 
health? For that was not impaired by this hard usage. But what shall we say to Horace, 
who warmed not himself with the reputation of any sect, and least of all affected Stoical 
austerities? yet he assures us, he was wont in the winter season to bathe himself in cold 
water. But, perhaps, Italy will be thought much warmer than England, and the chillness of 
their waters not to come near ours in winter. If the rivers of Italy are warmer, those of 
Germany and Poland are much colder, than any in this our country; and yet in these, the 
Jews, both men and women, bathe all over, at all seasons of the year, without any 
prejudice to their health. And every one is not apt to believe it is miracle, or any peculiar 
virtue of St. Winifred's Well, that makes the cold waters of that famous spring do no 
harm to the tender bodies that bathe in it. Every one is now full of the miracles done by 
cold baths on decayed and weak constitutions, for the recovery of health and strength; 
and therefore they cannot be impracticable or intolerable for the improving and hardening 
the bodies of those who are in better circumstances. 

If these examples of grown men be not thought yet to reach the case of children, but that 
they may be judged still to be too tender, and unable to bear such usage, let them examine 




what the Germans of old, and the Irish now, do to them, and they will find, that infants 
too, as tender as they are thought, may, without any danger, endure bathing, not only of 
their feet, but of their whole bodies, in cold water. And there are, to this day, ladies in the 
Highlands of Scotland who use this discipline to their children in the midst of winter, and 
find that cold water does them no harm, even when there is ice in it. 

§ 8 Swimming. — I shall not need here to mention swimming, when he is of an age able 
to learn, and has any one to teach him. 'Tis that saves many a man's life, and the Romans 
thought it so necessary, that they ranked it with letters, and it was the common phrase to 
mark one ill-educated, and good for nothing, that he had neither learnt to read nor to 
swim: Nec literas didicis nec natare. But, besides the gaining a skill which may serve him 
at need, the advantages to health, by often bathing in cold water, during the heat of 
summer, are so many, that I think nothing need to be said to encourage it; provided this 
one caution to be used, that he never go into the water when exercise has at all warmed 
him, or left any emotion in his blood or pulse. 

§ 9 Air. — Another thing that is of great advantage to every one's health, but especially 
children's, is, to be much in the open air, and, very little, as may be, by the fire, even in 
winter. By this he will accustom himself also to heat and cold, shine and rain; all which if 
a man's body will not endure, it will serve him to very little purpose in this world: and 
when he is grown up, it is too late to begin to use him to it: it must be got early and by 
degrees. Thus the body may be brought to bear almost anything. If I should advise him to 
play in the wind and sun without a hat, I doubt whether it could be borne. There would a 
thousand objections be made against it, which at last would amount to no more, in truth, 
than being sun-burnt. And if my young master be to be kept always in the shade, and 
never exposed to the sun and wind, for fear of his complexion, it may be a good way to 
make him a beau, but not a man of business. And although greater regard be to be had to 
beauty in the daughters, yet I will take the liberty to say, that the more they are in the air 
without prejudices to their faces, the stronger and healthier they will be; and the nearer 
they come to the hardships of their brothers in their education, the greater advantage will 
they receive from it all the remaining part of their lives. 

§ 10 Habits. — Playing in the open air has but this one danger in it, that I know; and that 
is, that when he is hot with running up and down, he should sit or lie down on the cold or 
moist earth. This I grant; and drinking cold drink, when they are hot with labour or 
exercise, brings more people to the grave, or to the brink of it, by fevers and other 
diseases, than any thing I know. These mischiefs are easily enough prevented whilst he is 
little, being then seldom out of sight. And if, during his childhood, he be constantly and 
rigorously kept from sitting on the ground; or drinking any cold liquor whilst he is hot, 
the custom of forbearing, grown into habit, will help much to preserve him, when he is no 
longer under his maids or tutors eye. This is all I think can be done in the case: for, as 
years increase, liberty must come with them; and in a great many things he must be 
trusted to his own conduct, since there cannot always be a guard upon him, except what 
you have put into his own mind by good principles, and established habits, which is the 
best and surest, and therefore most to be taken care of. For, from repeated cautions and 




rules, never so often incalculated, you are not to expect any thing either in this, or any 
other case, farther than practice has established. 



§ 1 1 Clothes. — One thing the mention of the girls brings into my mind, which must not 
be forgot; and that is, that your son's clothes be never made strait, especially about the 
breast. Let Nature have scope to fashion the body as she thinks best. She works of herself 
a great deal better and exacter than we can direct her. And if women were themselves to 
frame the bodies of their children in their wombs, as they often endeavour to mend their 
shapes, when they are out, we should as certainly have no perfect children born, as we 
have few well-shaped that are straitlaced, or much tampered with. This consideration 
should methinks keep busy people (I will not say ignorant nurses and bodice-makers) 
from meddling in a matter they understand not, and they should be afraid to put Nature 
out of her way in fashioning the parts, when they know not how the least and meanest is 
made. And yet I have seen so many instances of children receiving great harm from 
strait-lacing, that I cannot but conclude there are other creatures as well as monkeys, 
who, little wiser than they, destroy their young ones by senseless fondness, and too much 
embracing. 

§12 Narrow breasts, short and stinking breath, ill lungs, and crookedness, are the 
natural and almost constant effects of hard bodice, and clothes that pinch. That way of 
making slender wastes, and fine shapes, serves but the more effectually to spoil them. 

Nor can there indeed but be disproportion in the parts, when the nourishment prepared in 
the several offices of the body cannot be distributed as Nature designs. And therefore 
what wonder is it, if, being laid where it can, on some part not so braced, it often makes a 
shoulder or hip higher or bigger than its just proportion ? 'Tis generally known, that the 
women of China, (imagining I know not what kind of beauty in it) by bracing and 
binding them hard from their infancy; have very little feet. I saw lately a pair of China 
shoes, which I was told were for a grown woman: they were so exceedingly 
disproportioned to the feet of one of the same age among us, that they would scarce have 
been big enough for one of our little girls. Besides this, 'tis observed that their women are 
also very little, and short-lived; whereas the men are of the ordinary stature of other men, 
and live to a proportionable age. These defects in the female sex of that country, are by 
some imputed to the unreasonable binding of their feet, whereby the free circulation of 
the blood is hindered, and the growth and health of the whole body suffers. And how 
often do we see, that some small part of the foot being injured by a wrench or a blow, the 
whole leg or thigh thereby lost their strength and nourishment, and dwindle away? How 
much greater inconveniencies may we expect, when the thorax, wherein is placed the 
heart and seat of life, is unnaturally compressed, and hindered from its due expansion? 

§13 Diet. — As for his diet, it ought to be very plain and simple; and, if I might advise, 
flesh should be forborn as long as he is in coats, or at least till he is two or three years 
old. But whatever advantage this may be to his present and future health and strength, I 
fear it will hardly be consented to by parents, misled by the custom of eating too much 
flesh themselves, who will be apt to think their children, as they do themselves, in danger 
to be starved, if they have not flesh at least twice a-day. This I am sure, children would 
breed their teeth with much less danger, be freer from diseases whilst they were little, and 




lay the foundations of an healthy and strong constitution much surer, if they were not 
crammed so much as they are by fond mothers and foolish servants, and were kept 
wholly from flesh the first three or four years of their lives. 

But if my young master must needs have flesh, let it be but once a-day, and of one sort at 
a meal. Plain beef; mutton, veal, &c. without other sauce than hunger, is best: and great 
care should be used, that he eat bread plentifully, both alone and with every thing else; 
and whatever he eats, that is solid, make him chew it well. We English are often 
negligent herein; from whence follow indigestion, and other great inconveniencies. 

§14 For breakfast and supper, milk, milk-pottage, water- gruel, flummery, and twenty 
other things that we are wont to make in England, are very fit for children. Only, in all 
these, let care be taken that they be plain, and without much mixture, and very sparingly 
seasoned with sugar, or rather none at all; especially all spice, and other things that may 
heat the blood, are carefully to be avoided. Be sparing also of salt in the seasoning of all 
his victuals, and use him not to high-seasoned meats. Our palates grow into a relish and 
liking of the seasoning and cookery, which by custom they are set to: and an over-much 
use of salt, besides that it occasions thirst, and over-much drinking, has other ill effects 
upon the body. I should think, that a good piece of well-made and well-baked brown 
bread, sometimes with, and sometimes without butter or cheese, would be often the best 
breakfast for my young master. I am sure 'tis as wholesome, and will make him as strong 
a man as greater delicacies; and if he be used to it, it will be pleasant to him. If he at any 
time calls for victuals between meals, use him to nothing but dry bread. If he be hungry 
more than wanton, bread alone will down; and if he be not hungry, 'tis not fit he should 
eat. by this you will obtain two good effects: 1. That by custom, he will come to be in 
love with bread; for, as I said, our palates and stomachs too are pleated with the things we 
are used to. 2. Another good you will gain hereby is, that you will not teach him to eat 
more nor oftener than Nature requires. I do not think that all people's appetites are alike; 
some have naturally stronger, and some weaker stomachs. But this I think, that many are 
made gourmands and gluttons by custom, that were not so by Nature: and I see in come 
countries, men as lusty and strong, that eat but two meals a-day, as others that have set 
their stomachs by a constant usage, like larums, to call on them for four or five. The 
Romans usually fasted till supper, the only set meal even of those who ate more than 
once a-day; and those who used breakfasts, as some did at eight, some at ten, others at 
twelve of the clock, and some later, neither ate flesh, nor had any thing made ready for 
them. Augustus, when the greatest monarch on the earth, tells us, he took a bit of dry 
bread in his chariot. And Seneca, in his 83d Epistle, giving an account how he managed 
himself, even when he was old, and his age, permitted indulgence, says, that he used to 
eat a piece of dry bread for his dinner, without the formality of sitting to it, though his 
estate would as well have paid for a better meal (had health required it) as any subjects in 
England, were it doubled. The masters of the world were bred up with this spare diet; and 
the young gentlemen of rome felt no want of strength or spirit, because they ate but once 
a-day. Or, if it happened by chance, that any one could not fast so long as till supper, their 
only set meal, he took nothing but a bit of dry bread, or at most a few raisins, or some 
such slight thing with it, to stay his stomach. This part of temperance was found so 
necessary, both for health and business, that the custom of only one meal a-day held out 




against that prevailing luxury, which their Eastern conquests and spoils had brought in 
amongst them; and those who had given up their old frugal eating, and made feasts; yet 
began them not till the evening. And more than one set meal a-day was thought so 
monstrous, that it was a reproach as low down as Cesar's time, to make an entertainment, 
or sit down to a full table, till towards sun-set: and therefore, if it would not be thought 
too severe, I should judge it most convenient, that my young master should have nothing 
but bread too for breakfast. You cannot imagine of what force custom is; and I impute a 
great part of our diseases in England to our eating too much flesh, and too little bread. 

§ 15 Meals. — As to his meals, I should think it best, that as much as it can be 
conveniently avoided, they should not be kept constantly to an hour: for when custom has 
fixed his eating to certain stated periods; his stomach will expect victuals at the usual 
hour, and grow peevish if he passes it; either fretting itself into a troublesome excess, or 
flagging into a downright want of appetite. Therefore I would have no time kept 
constantly to, for his breakfast, dinner and supper; but rather varied almost every day. 
And if betwixt these, which I call meals, he will eat, let him have, as often as he calls for 
it, good dry bread. If any one think this too hard and sparing a diet for a child, let them 
know, that a child will never starve nor dwindle for want of nourishment, who, besides 
flesh at dinner, and spoon-meat, or some such other thing, at supper, may have good 
bread and beer as often as he has a stomach. For thus, upon second thoughts, I should 
judge it best for children to be ordered. The morning is generally designed for study, to 
which a full stomach is but an ill preparation. Dry bread, though the best nourishment, 
has the least temptation; and no body would have a child crammed at breakfast, who has 
any regard to his mind or body, and would not have him dull and unhealthy. Nor let any 
one think this unsuitable to one of estate and condition. A gentleman in any age ought to 
be so bred, as to be fitted to bear arms, and be a soldier. But he that in this breeds his son 
so, as if he designed him to sleep over his life in the plenty and ease of a full fortune he 
intends to leave him, little considers the examples he has seen, or the age he lives in. 

§ 16 Drink. — His drink should be only small beer; and that too he should never be 
suffered to have between meals, but after he had eaten a piece of bread. The reasons why 
I say this, are these. 

§ 17 More fevers and surfeits are got by people's drinking when they are hot, than by 
any one thing I know. Therefore, if by play he be hot and dry, bread will ill go down; and 
so, if he cannot have drink but upon that condition, he will be forced to forbear. For, if he 
be very hot, he should by no means drink; at least, a good piece of bread first to be eaten, 
will gain time to warm the beer blood-hot, which then he may drink safely. If he be very 
dry, it will go down so warmed, and quench his thirst better; and if he will not drink it so 
warmed, abstaining will not hurt him. Besides, this will teach him to forbear, which is an 
habit of great use for health of body and mind too. 

§ 18 Habits. — Not being permitted to drink without eating, will prevent the custom of 
having the cup often at his nose; a dangerous beginning and preparation to good- 
fellowship. Men often bring habitual hunger and thirst on themselves by custom, and if 
you please to try, you may, though he be weaned from it, bring him by use to such a 




necessity again of drinking in the night, that he will not be able to sleep without it. It 
being the lullaby used by nurses to still crying children, I believe mothers generally find 
some difficulty to wean their children from drinking in the night, when they first take 
them home. Believe it, custom prevails as much by day as by night; and you may, if you 
please, bring any one to be thirsty every hour. I once lived in a house, where, to appease a 
froward child, they gave him drink as often as he cried; so that he was constantly bibbing. 
And though he could not speak, yet he drank more in twenty-four hours than I did. Try it 
when you please, you may with small, as well as with strong beer, drink yourself into a 
drought. The great thing to be minded in education is, what habits you settle; and 
therefore in this, as all other things, do not begin to make any thing customary, the 
practice whereof you would not have continue, and increase. It is convenient for health 
and sobriety, to drink no more than natural thirst requires; he that eats not salt meats, nor 
drinks strong drink, will seldom thirst between meals, unless he has been accustomed to 
such unseasonable drinking. 

§19 Strong drink. — Above all, take great care that he seldom, if ever, taste any wine or 
strong drink. There is nothing so ordinarily given children in England, and nothing so 
destructive to them. They ought never to drink any strong liquor, but when they need it as 
a cordial, and the doctor prescribes it. And in this case it is, that servants are most 
narrowly to be watched, and most severely to be reprehended when they transgress. 

Those mean sort of people, placing a great part of their happiness in strong drink, are 
always forward to make court to my young master, by offering him that which they love 
best themselves: and finding themselves made merry by it, they foolishly think 'twill do 
the child no harm. This you are carefully to have your eye upon, and restrain with all the 
skill and industry you can, there being nothing that lays a surer foundation of mischief, 
both to body and mind, than children being used to strong drink; especially to drink in 
private with the servants. 

§ 20 Fruit. — Fruit makes one of the most difficult chapters in the government of health, 
especially that of children. Our first parents ventured paradise for it; and 'tis no wonder 
our children cannot stand the temptation, though it cost them their health. The regulation 
of this cannot come under any one general rule; for I am by no means of their mind, who 
would keep children almost wholly from fruit, as a thing totally unwholesome for them: 
by which strict way they make them but the more ravenous after it, and to eat good or 
bad, ripe or unripe, all that they can get, whenever they come at it. Melons, peaches, most 
sorts of plumbs, and all sorts of grapes in England, I think children should be wholly kept 
from, as having a very tempting taste, in a very unwholesome juice: so that if it were 
possible, they should never to much as see them, or know there were any such things. But 
strawberries, cherries, gooseberries, or currants, when thorough ripe, I think may be 
pretty safely allowed them, and that with a very liberal hand, if they be eaten with these 
cautions: 1. Not after meals, as we usually do, when the stomach is already full of other 
food: but I think they should be eaten rather before or between meals, and children should 
have them for their breakfast. 2. Bread eaten with them. 3. Perfectly ripe. If they are 
thus eaten, I imagine them rather conducing, than hurtful to our health. 




Summer-fruits being suited to the hot season of the year they come in, refresh our 
stomachs, languishing and fainting under it; and therefore I should not be altogether to 
strict in this point, as some are to their children, who being kept so very short, instead of 
a moderate quantity of well chosen fruit, which being allowed them would content them, 
whenever they can get loose, or bribe a servant to supply them, satisfy their longing with 
any they can get, and eat to a surfeit. 

Apples and pears too, which are thorough ripe, and have been gathered some time, I think 
may be safely eaten at any time, and in pretty large quantities; especially apples, which 
never did any body hurt, that I have heard, after October. 

Fruits also, dried without sugar, I think very wholesome. But sweet-meats of all kinds are 
to be avoided; which, whether they do more harm to the maker or eater, is not easy to tell. 
This I am sure, it is one of the most inconvenient ways of expence that vanity has yet 
found out; and so I leave them to the ladies. 

§21 Sleep. — Of all that looks soft and effeminate, nothing is more to be indulged 
children, than sleep. In this alone they are to be permitted to have their full satisfaction; 
nothing contributing more to the growth and health of children, than sleep. All that is to 
be regulated in it is, in what part of the twenty-four hours they should take it; which will 
easily be resolved, by only saying, that it is of great use to accustom them to rise early in 
the morning. It is best so to do, for health; and he that, from his childhood, has, by a 
settled custom, made rising betimes easy and familiar to him, will not, when he is a man, 
waste the best and most useful part of his life in drowsiness and lying a-bed. If children 
therefore are to be called up early in the morning, it will follow of course, that they must 
go to bed betimes; whereby they be accustomed to avoid the unhealthy and unsafe hours 
of debauchery, which are those of the evenings; and they who keep good hours, seldom 
are guilty of any great disorders. I do not say this, as if your son, when grown up, should 
never be in company past eight, nor ever chat over a glass of wine till midnight. You are 
now, by the accustoming of his tender years, to indispose him to those inconveniencies as 
much as you can; and it will be no small advantage, that contrary practice having made 
sitting up uneasy to him, it will make him often avoid, and very seldom propose mid- 
night revels. But if it should not reach so far, but fashion and company should prevail, 
and make him live as others do above twenty, 'tis worth the while to accustom him to 
early rising and early going to bed, between this and that, for the present improvement of 
his health and other advantages. 

Though I have said a large allowance of sleep, even as much as they will take, should be 
made to children when they are little; yet I do not mean, that it should always be 
continued to them in so large a proportion, and they suffered to indulge a drowsy laziness 
in their bed, as they grow up bigger. But whether they should begin to be restrained at 
seven or ten years old, or any other time, is impossible to be precisely determined. Their 
tempers, strength, and constitutions must be considered. But some time between seven 
and fourteen, if they are too great lovers of their beds, I think it may be seasonable to 
begin to reduce them by degrees to about eight hours, which is generally rest enough for 
healthy grown people. If you have accustomed him, as you should do, to rise constantly 




very early in the morning, this fault of being too long in bed will easily be reformed; and 
most children will be forward enough to shorten that time themselves, by coveting to sit 
up with the company at night; though if they be not looked after, they will be apt to take 
it out in the morning, which should by no means be permitted. They should constantly be 
called up, and made to rise at their early hour. But great care should be taken in waking 
them, that it be not done nor with a loud or shrill voice, or any other sudden violent noise. 
This often affrights children, and does them great harm; and sound sleep thus broken off 
with sudden alarms, is apt enough to discompose any one. When children are to be 
wakened out of their sleep, be sure to begin with a low call, and some gentle motion; and 
so draw them out of it by degrees, and give them none but kind words and usage, 'till they 
are come perfectly to themselves, and being quite dressed; you are sure they are 
throughly awake. The being forced from their sleep, how gently soever you do it, is pain 
enough to them; and care should be taken not to add any other uneasiness to it, especially 
such that may terrify them. 

§ 22 Bed. — Let his bed be hard, and rather quilts than feathers. Hard lodging 
strengthens the parts; whereas being buried every night in feathers melts and dissolves 
the body, is often the cause of weakness, and the fore-runner of an early grave. And 
besides the stone, which has often its rise from this warm wrapping of the reins, several, 
other indispositions, and that which is the root of them all, a tender weakly constitution, 
is very much owing to down-beds. Besides, he that is used to hard lodging at home, will 
not miss his sleep (where he has most need of it) in his travels abroad, for want of his soft 
bed, and his pillows laid in order. And therefore I think, it would not be amiss, to make 
his bed after different fashions: sometimes lay his head higher, sometimes lower; that he 
may not feel every little change he must be sure to meet with, who is not designed to lie 
always in my young master's bed at home, and to have his maid lay all things in print, 
and tuck him in warm. The great cordial of Nature is sleep. He that misses that, will 
suffer by it; and he is very unfortunate, who can take his cordial only in his mother's fine 
gilt cup, and not in a wooden dish. He that can sleep soundly, takes the cordial; and it 
matters not, whether it be on a soft bed, or the hard boards. 'Tis sleep only that is the 
thing necessary. 

§ 23 Costiveness. — One thing more there is, which has a great influence upon the 
health, and that is, going to stool regularly. People that are very loose, have seldom 
strong thoughts, or strong bodies. But the cure of this, both by diet and medicine, being 
much more easy than the contrary evil, there needs not much to be said about it. For if it 
come to threaten, either by its violence or duration, it will soon enough, and sometimes 
too soon, make a physician be sent for; and if it be moderate or short, it is commonly best 
to leave it to Nature. On the other side, costiveness has too its ill effects, and is much 
harder to be dealt with by physic; purging medicines, which seem to give relief, rather 
increasing them, than removing the evil. 

§ 24 It being an indisposition I had a particular reason to enquire into, and not finding 
the cure of it in books, I set my thoughts on work, believing, that greater changes than 
that might be made in our bodies, if we took the right course, and proceeded by rational 
steps. 




1 . Then I considered, that going to stool, was the effect of certain motions of the body; 
especially of the peristaltic motion of the guts. 

2. I considered, that several motions, that were not perfectly voluntary, might yet, by use 
and constant application, be brought to be habitual, if by an unintermitted custom they 
were at certain seasons endeavoured to be constantly produced. 

3. I had observed some men, who by taking after supper a pipe of tobacco, never failed 
of a stool: and began to doubt with myself, whether it were not more custom, than the 
tobacco, that gave them the benefit of Nature; or at least, if the tobacco did it, it was 
rather by exciting a vigorous motion in the guts, than by any purging quality; for then it 
would have had other effects. 

Having thus once got the opinion, that it was possible to make it habitual, the next thing 
was to consider what way and means was the likeliest to obtain it. 

§ 25 The reasons that made me choose this time, were: 

1 . Because the stomach being then empty, if it received any thing grateful to it (for I 
would never, but in case of necessity, have any one eat but what he likes, and when he 
has an appetite) it was apt to embrace it close by a strong constriction of its fibres; which 
constriction, I supposed, might probably be continued on in the guts, and so increase their 
peristaltic motion, as we see it the Ileus, than an inverted motion, being begun any where 
below, continues itself all the whole length, and makes even the stomach obey that 
irregular motion. 

2. Because when men eat, they usually relax their thoughts; and the spirits then, free 
from other employments, are more vigorously distributed into the lower belly, which 
thereby contribute to the same effect. 

3. Because, whenever men have leisure to eat, they have leisure enough also to make so 
much court to Madam Cloacina, as would be necessary to our present purpose; but else, 
in the variety of human affairs and accidents, it was impossible to affix it to any hour 
certain, whereby the custom would be interrupted. Whereas men in wealth seldom failing 
to eat once a day, though the hour changed, the custom might still be preserved. 

§ 26 Upon these grounds, the experiment began to be tried. And I have known none 
who have been steady in the prosecution of it; and taken care to go constantly to the 
necessary-house, after their first eating, whenever that happened, whether they found 
themselves called on or no, and there endeavour to put Nature upon her duty, but in a few 
months they obtained the desired success, and brought themselves to so regular an habit, 
that they seldom ever failed of a stool after their first eating, unless it were by their own 
neglect: for, whether they have any motion or no, if they go to the place, and do their 
part, they are sure to have Nature very obedient. 

§ 27 I would therefore advise, that this course should be taken with a child every day, 
presently after he has eaten his breakfast. Let him be set upon the stool, as if 
disburthening were as much in his power, as filling his belly; and let not him or his maid 
know any thing to the contrary, but that it is so: and if he be forced to endeavour, by 
being hindered from his play, or eating again 'till he has been effectually at stool, or at 
least done his utmost, I doubt not but in a little while it will become natural to him. For 
there is reason to suspect, that children being usually intent on their play, and very 




heedless of any thing else, often let pass those motions of Nature, when she calls them 
but gently; and so they, neglecting the seasonable offers, do by degrees bring themselves 
into an habitual costiveness. That by this method costiveness may be prevented, I do 
more than guess; having known, by the constant practice of it for some time, a child 
brought to have a stool regularly, after his breakfast every morning. 

§ 28 How far any grown people will think fit to make trial of it, must be left to them; 
though I cannot but say, that considering the many evils that come from that defect, of a 
requisite easing of Nature, I scarce know any thing more conducing to the preservation of 
health, than this is. Once in four and twenty hours, I think is enough; and no body, I 
guess, will think it too much. And by this means it is to be obtained without physic, 
which commonly proves very ineffectual in the cure of a settled and habitual costiveness. 

§ 29 Physic. — This is all I have to trouble you with, concerning his management, in the 
ordinary course of his health and perhaps it will be expected from me, that I should give 
some directions of physic, to prevent diseases: for which, I have only this one very 
sacredly to be observed: Never to give children any physic for prevention. The 
observation of what I have already advised will I suppose, do that better than the ladies' 
diet drinks or apothecary's medicines. Have a great care of tampering that way, lest 
instead of preventing, you draw on diseases. Nor even upon every little indisposition is 
physic to be given, or the physician to be called to children; especially if he be a busy 
man, that will presently fill their windows with gally-pots and their stomachs with drugs. 
It is safer to leave them wholly to nature, than to put them into the hands of one forward 
to tamper, or that thinks children are to be cured in ordinary distempers, by any thing but 
diet, or by a method very little distant from it. It seeming suitable both to my reason and 
experience, that the tender constitutions of children should have as little done to them as 
is possible and as the absolute necessity of the case requires. A little cold stilled red 
poppy-water, which is the true surfeit-water, with ease and abstinence from flesh, often 
puts an end to several distempers in the beginning, which, by too forward applications, 
might have been made lusty diseases. When such a gentle treatment will not stop the 
growing mischief, but that it will turn into a formed disease, it will be time to seek the 
advice of some sober and discreet physician. In this part, I hope, I shall find an easy 
belief; and nobody can have a pretence to doubt the advice of one, who has spent some 
time in the study of physic, when he counsels you not to be too forward in making use of 
physic and physicians. 

§ 30 And thus I have done with what concerns the body and health, which reduces itself 
to these few and easily observable rules. Plenty of open air, exercise, and sleep; plain 
diet, no wine or strong drink, and very little or no physic; not too warm and strait 
clothing; especially the head and feet kept cold, and the feet often used to cold water and 
exposed to wet. 

§ 3 1 Mind. — Due care being had to keep the body in strength and vigour, so that it may 
be able to obey and execute the orders of the mind: the next and principal business is, to 
set the mind right, that on all occasions it may be disposed to do nothing but what may be 
suitable to the dignity and excellency of a rational creature. 




§ 32 If what I have said in the beginning of this discourse be true, as I do not doubt but 
it is, viz. that the difference to be found in the manners and abilities of men, is owing 
more to their education than to any thing else; we have reason to conclude, that great care 
is to be had of the forming children's minds, and giving them that seasoning early, which 
shall influence their lives always after. For when they do well or ill, the praise or blame 
will be laid there: and when any thing is done untowardly, the common saying will pass 
upon them, that it is suitable to their breeding. 

§ 33 As the strength of the body lies chiefly in being able to endure hardships, so also 
does that of the mind. And the great principle and foundation of all virtue and worth is 
placed in this, that a man is able to deny himself his own desires, cross his own 
inclinations, and purely follow what reason directs as best, though the appetite lean the 
other way. 

§ 34 Early. — The great mistake I have observed in people's breeding their children has 
been, that this has not been taken care enough of in its due season; that the mind has not 
been made obedient to rules, and pliant to reason, when at first it was most tender, most 
easy to be bowed. Parents being wisely ordained by nature to love their children, are very 
apt, if reason watch not that natural affection very warily; are apt, I say, to let it run into 
fondness. They love their little ones, and 'tis their duty: but they often with them cherish 
their faults too. They must not be crossed, forsooth; they must be permitted to have their 
wills in all things; and they being in their infancies not capable of great vices, their 
parents think they may safely enough indulge their little irregularities and make 
themselves sport with that pretty perverseness which they think well enough becomes 
that innocent age. But to a fond parent that would not have his child corrected for a 
perverse trick but excused it saying it was a small matter, Solon very well replied, 'Ay, 
but custom is a great one.' 

§ 35 The fondling must be taught to strike, and call names; must have what he cries for, 
and do what he pleases. Thus parents, by humouring and cockering them when little, 
corrupt the principles of nature in their children and wonder afterwards to taste the bitter 
waters, when they themselves have poisined the fountain. For when their children are 
grown up, and these ill habits with them; when they are now too big to be dandled, and 
their parents can no longer make use of them as play things; then they complain, that the 
brats are untoward and perverse; then they are offended to see them wilful, and are 
troubled with those ill humours, which they themselves inspired and cherished in them. 
And then, perhaps too late, would be glad to get out those weeds which their own hands 
have planted, and which now have taken too deep root to be easily extirpated. For he that 
has been used to have his will in every thing, as long as he was in coats, why should we 
think it strange that he should desire it, and contend for it still, when he is in breeches? 
Indeed, as he grows more towards a man, age shows his faults the more, so that there be 
few parents then so blind, as not to see them; few so insensible as not to feel the ill effects 
of their own indulgence. He had the will of his maid before he could speak or go; he had 
the mastery of his parents ever since he could prattle; and why, now he is grown up, is 




stronger and wiser than he was then, why now of a sudden must he be restrained and 
curbed? Why must he at seven, fourteen, or twenty years old, lose the privilege which the 
parents' indulgence, till then, so largely allowed him? Try it in a dog, or an horse, or any 
other creature, and see whether the ill and resty tricks they have learned when young are 
easily to be mended when they are knit: and yet none of those creatures are half so wilful 
and proud, or half so desirous to be masters of themselves and others, as man. 

§ 36 We are generally wise enough to begin with them, when they are very young, and 
discipline betimes those other creatures we would make useful to us. They are only our 
own offspring, that we neglect in this point; and having made them ill children, we 
foolishly expect they should he good men. For if the child must have grapes, or sugar- 
plums, when he has a mind to them, rather than make the poor baby cry, or be out of 
humour, why, when he is grown up, must he not be satisfied too, if his desires carry him 
to wine or women? They are objects as suitable to the longing of one of more years, as 
what he cried for, when little, was to the inclinations of a child. The having desires 
suitable to the apprehensions and relish of those several ages, is not the fault; but the not 
having them subject to the rules and restraints of reason: the difference lies not in the 
having or not having appetites, but in the power to govern, and deny our selves in them. 
And he that is not used to submit his will to the reason of others, when he is young, will 
scarce hearken or submit to his own reason, when he is of an age to make use of it. And 
what a kind of a man such an one is like to prove, is easy to foresee. 

§ 37 [Spoiling]. — These are oversights usually committed by those who seem to take 
the greatest care of their children's education. But if we look into the common 
management of children, we shall have reason to wonder, in the great dissoluteness of 
manners which the world complains of, that there are any footsteps at all left of virtue. I 
desire to know what vice can be named, which parents, and those about children, do not 
season them with, and drop into them the seeds of, as soon as they are capable to receive 
them? I do not mean by the examples they give, and the patterns they set before them, 
which is encouragement enough; but that which I would take notice of here is, the 
downright teaching them vice, and actual putting them our of the way of virtue. Before 
they can go, they principle them with violence, revenge, and cruelty. Give me a blow, 
that I may beat him, is a lesson which most children every day hear; and it is thought 
nothing, because their hands have not strength to do any mischief. But I ask, does not this 
corrupt their mind? Is not this the way of force and violence, that they are set in? And if 
they have been taught when little, to strike and hurt others by proxy, and encouraged to 
rejoice in the harm they have brought upon them, and see them suffer, are they not 
prepared to do it when they are strong enough to be felt themselves, and can strike to 
some purpose. 

The coverings of our bodies which are for modesty, warmth and deference, are by the 
folly or vice of parents recommended to their children for other uses. They are made 
matters of vanity and emulation. A child is set a-longing after a new suit, for the finery of 
it; and when the little girl is tricked up in her new gown and commode, how can her 
mother do less than teach her to admire herself, by calling her, her little queen and her 
princess? Thus the little ones are taught to be proud of their clothes, before they can put 




them on. And why should they not continue to value themselves for their outside 
fashionableness of the taylor or tirewoman's making, when their parents have so early 
influenced them to do so? 

Lying and equivocations, and excuses little different from lying, are put into the mouths 
of young people, and commended in apprentices and children, whilst they are for their 
after or parents advantage. And can it be thought, that he that finds the straining of truth 
dispensed with, and encouraged, whilst it is for his godly master's turn, will not make use 
of that privilege for himself, when it may be for his own profit ? 

Those of the meaner sort are hindered, by the straitness of their fortunes; from 
encouraging intemperance in their children, by the temptation of their diet, or invitations 
to eat or drink more than enough; but. their own ill examples, whenever plenty comes in 
their way, shew, that 'tis not the dislike of drunkenness or gluttony, that keeps them from 
excess, but want of materials. But if we look into the houses of those who are a little 
warmer in their fortunes, their eating and drinking are made so much the great business 
and happiness of life, that children are thought neglected, if they have not their share of 
it. Sauces and ragouts, and food disguised by all the arts of cookery, must tempt their 
palates, when their bellies are full; and then, for fear the stomach should be overcharged, 
a pretence is found, for the other glass of wine to help digestion, though it only serves to 
increase the surfeit. Is my young master a little out of order, the first question is, what 
will my dear eat? what shall I get for thee? Eating and drinking are instantly pressed; and 
every body's invention is set on work to find out something luscious and delicate enough 
to prevail over the want of appetite, which Nature has wisely ordered in the beginning of 
distempers, as a defence against their increase; that being freed from the ordinary labour 
of digesting any new load in the stomach, she may be at leisure to correct and master the 
peccant humours. 

And where children are so happy in the care of their parents, as by their prudence to be 
kept from the excess of their tables, to the sobriety of a plain and simple diet, yet there 
too are scarce to be preserved from the contagion that poisons the mind; though, by a 
discreet management whilst they are under tuition, their healths perhaps may be pretty 
well secure, yet their desires must needs yield to the lessons which everywhere will be 
read to them upon this part of epicurism. The commendation that eating well has 
everywhere, cannot fail to be a successful incentive to natural appetites, and bring them 
quickly to the liking and expence of a fashionable table. This shall have from every one, 
even the reprovers of vice, the title of living-well. And what shall sullen reason dare to 
say against the public testimony? Or can it hope to be heard, if it should call that luxury, 
which is so much owned and universally practised by those of the best quality? 

This is now so grown a vice, and has so great supports, that I know not whether it do not 
put in for the name of virtue; and whether it will not be thought folly, or want of 
knowledge of the world, to open one's mouth against it? And truly I should suspect, that 
what I have here said of it, might be censured as a little satyr out of my way, did I not 
mention it with this view, that it might awaken the care and watchfulness of parents in the 
education of their children, when they fee how they are beset on every side, not only with 




temptations, but instructors to vice, and that, perhaps, in those they thought places of 
security. 

I shall not dwell any longer on this subject, much less run over all the particulars that 
would show what pains are used to corrupt children, and instil principles of vice into 
them. But I desire parents soberly to confider, what irregularity or vice there is which 
children are not visibly taught, and whether it be not their duty and wisdom to provide 
them other instructions. 

§ 38 Craving. — It seems plain to me, that the principle of all virtue and excellency lies 
in a power of denying our selves the satisfaction of our own desires, where reason does 
not authorize there. This power is to be got and improved by custom, made easy and 
familiar by an early practice. If therefore I might be heard, I would advise, that, contrary 
to the ordinary way, children should be used to submit their desires, and go without their 
longings, even from their very cradles. The first thing they should learn to know, should 
be, that they were not to have anything, because it pleased them, but because was thought 
fit for them. If things suitable to their wants were supplied to them, so that they were 
never suffered to have what they once cried for, they would learn to be content without it; 
would never with bawling and peevishness contend for mastery; nor be half so uneasy to 
themselves and others as they are, because from the first beginning they are not thus 
handled. If they were never suffered to obtain their desire by the impatience they 
expressed for it, they would no more cry for other things than they do for the moon. 

§39 I say not this, as if children were not to be indulged in any thing, or that I expected 
they should, in hanging sleeves, have the reason and conduct of counsellors. I consider 
them as children that must be tenderly used, that must play, and have playthings. That 
which I mean is, that whenever they craved what was not fit for them to have, or do, they 
should not be permitted it, because they were little and desired it: nay, whatever they 
were importunate for, they should he sure, for that very reason, to be denied. I have seen 
children at a table, who, whatever was there, never asked for anything, but contentedly 
took what was given them; and at another place, I have seen others cry for every thing 
they saw, must be served out of every dish, and that first too. What made this vast 
difference, but this; that one was accustomed to have what they called or cried for, the 
other to go without it? The younger they are, the less, I think, are their unruly and 
disorderly appetites to he complied with; and the less reason they have of their own, the 
more are they to be under the absolute power and restraint of those, in whose hands they 
are. From which I confess, it will follow, that none but discreet people should be about 
them. If the world commonly does otherwise, I cannot help that: I am saying what I think 
should be; which, if it were already in fashion, I should not need to trouble the world with 
a discourse on this subject. But yet I doubt not, but when it is considered, there will be 
others of opinion with me, that the sooner this way is begun with children, the easier it 
will be for them, and their governors too. And that this ought to be observed as an 
inviolable maxim, that whatever once is denied them, they are certainly not to obtain by 
crying or importunity; unless one has a mind to teach them to be impatient and 
troublesome, by rewarding them for it, when they are so. 




§ 40 Early. — Those therefore that intend ever to govern their children, should begin it 
whilst they are very little; and look that they perfectly comply with the will of their 
parents. Would you have your son obedient to you, when past a child? Be sure then to 
establish the authority of a father, as soon as he is capable of submission, and can 
understand in whose power he is. If you would have him stand in awe of you, imprint it 
in his infancy; and, as he approaches more to a man, admit him nearer to your familiarity: 
so shall you have him your obedient subject (as is fit) whilst he is a child, and your 
affectionate friend when he is a man. For methinks they mightily misplace the treatment 
due to their children, who are indulgent and familiar when they are little, but severe to 
them, and keep them at a distance when they are grown up. For liberty and indulgence 
can do no good to children: their want of judgment makes them stand in need of restraint 
and discipline. And, an the contrary, imperiousness and. severity is but an ill way of 
treating men, who have reason of their own to guide them, unless you have a mind to 
make your children, when grown up, weary of you; and secretly to say within themselves, 
"When will you die, father?" 

§41 I imagine every one will judge it reasonable, that their children, when little should 
look upon their parents as their lords, their absolute governors; and, as such, stand in awe 
of them: and that, when they come to riper years, they should look on them as their best, 
as their only sure friends; and, as such, love and reverence them. The way I have 
mentioned, if I mistake not, is the only one to obtain this. We, must look upon our 
children, when grown up, to be like ourselves, with the same passions, the same desires. 
We would be thought rational creatures, and have our freedom; we love not to be uneasy 
under constant rebukes and brow-beatings; nor can we bear severe humours, and great 
distance, in those we converse with. Whoever has such treatment when he is a man, will 
look out other company, other friends, other conversation, with whom he can be at ease. 

If therefore a strict hand be kept over children from the beginning, they will in that age be 
tractable, and quietly submit to it, as never having known any other: and if, as they grow 
up to the use of reason, the rigour of government be, as they deserve it, gently relaxed, 
the father's brow more smooth to them, and the distance by degrees abated, his former 
restraints will increase their love, when they find it was only a kindness to them, and a 
care to make them capable to deserve the favour of their parents, and the esteem of every 
body else. 

§ 42 Thus much for the settling your authority over your children in general. Fear and 
awe ought to give you the first power over their minds, and love and friendship in riper 
years to hold it: for the time must come, when they will be past the rod and correction; 
and then, if the love of you make them not obedient and dutiful, if the love of virtue and 
reputation keep them not in laudable courses, I ask, what hold will you have upon them, 
to turn them to it? Indeed, fear of having a scanty portion, if they displease you, may 
make them slaves to your estate, but they will be never the less ill and wicked in private; 
and that restraint will not last always. Every man must some time or other be trusted, to 
himself, and his own conduct; and he that is a good, a virtuous, and able man, must be 
made so within. And therefore, what he is to receive from education, what is to sway and 
influence his life, must be something put into him betimes, habits woven into the very 




principles of his nature; and not a counterfeit carriage, and dissembled outside, put on by 
fear, only to avoid the present anger of a father, who perhaps may disinherit him. 

§ 43 Punishments. — This being laid down in general, as the course ought to be taken, 
'tis fit we now come to consider the parts of the discipline to be used, a little more 
particularly. I have spoken so much of carrying a strict hand over children, that perhaps I 
shall be suspected of not considering enough, what is due to their tender age and 
constitutions. But that opinion will vanish, when you have heard me a little farther. For I 
am very apt to think, that great severity of punishment does but very little good; nay, 
great harm in education: and I believe it will be found, that, caeteris paribus, those 
children who have been most chastised, seldom make the best men. All that I have 
hitherto contended for, is, that whatsoever rigour is necessary, it is more to be used the 
younger children are; and having by a due application wrought its effect, it is to be 
relaxed, and changed into a milder sort of government. 

§ 44 Awe. — A compliance and suppleness of their wills, being by a steady hand 
introduced by parents, before children have memories to retain the beginnings of it, will 
seem natural to them, and work afterwards in them, as if it were so, preventing all 
occasions of struggling or repining. The only care is, that it be begun early, and inflexibly 
kept to, till awe and respect be grown familiar, and there appears not the least reluctancy 
in the submission, and ready obedience of their minds. When this reverence is once thus 
established (which it must be early, or else it will cost pains and blows to recover it, and 
the more, the longer it is deferred, 'tis by it, mixed still with as much indulgence, as they 
make not an ill use of, and not by beating, chiding, or other servile punishments, [that] 
they are for the future to be governed as they grow up to more understanding. 

§ 45 That this is so, will be easily allowed, when it is but considered what is to be 
aimed at in an ingenuous education, and upon what it turns. 

1. Self-denial. He that has not a mastery over his inclinations, he that knows not how to 
resist the importunity of present pleasure or pain, for the sake of what reason tells him is 
fit to be done, wants the true principle of virtue and industry, and is in danger never to be 
good for any thing. This temper, therefore, so contrary to unguided nature, is to be got 
betimes; and this habit, as the true foundation of future ability and happiness, is to be 
wrought into the mind, as early as may be, even from the first dawnings of any 
knowledge or apprehension in children; and so to be confirmed in them, by all the care 
and ways imaginable, by those who have the oversight of their education. 

§ 46 2. Dejected. On the other side, if the mind be curbed, and humbled too much in 

children; if their spirits be abased and broken much, by too strict an hand over them, they 
lose all their vigour and industry, and are in a worse state than the former. For 
extravagant young fellows, that have liveliness and spirit, come sometimes to be set right, 
and so make able and great men: but dejected minds, timorous and tame, and low spirits, 
are hardly ever to be raised, and very seldom attain to any thing. To avoid the danger that 
is on either hand is the great art; and he that has found a way, how to keep up a child's 
spirit, easy, active, and free; and yet, at the same time, to restrain him from many things 




he has a mind to, and to draw him to things that are uneasy to him; he, I, say, that knows 
how to reconcile these seeming contradictions, has, in my opinion, got the true secret of 
education. 

§ 47 Beating. — The usual lazy and short way by chastisement, and the rod, which is the 
only instrument of government that tutors generally know, or ever think of, is the most 
unfit of any to be used in education; because it tends to both those mischiefs, which, as 
we have shown, are the Scylla and Charybdis, which, on the one hand or the other, ruin 
all that miscarry. 

§ 48 1 . This kind of punishment contributes not at all to the mastery of our natural 

propensity to indulge corporal and present pleasure, and to avoid pain at any rate, but 
rather encourages it; and so strengthens that in us, which is the root of all vicious and 
wrong actions. For what motives, I pray, does a child act by, but of such pleasure and 
pain, that drudges at his book against his inclination, or abstains from eating 
unwholesome fruit, that he takes pleasure in, only out of fear of whipping? He in this 
only prefers the greater corporal pleasure, or avoids the greater corporal pain; and what is 
it, to govern his actions, and direct his conduct, by such motives as these? What is it, I 
say, but to cherish that principle in him, which it is our business to root out and destroy? 
And therefore I cannot think any correction useful to a child, where the shame of 
suffering for having, done amiss does not work more upon him than the pain. 

§49 2. This sort of correction naturally breeds an aversion to that which it is the tutor's 

business to create a liking to. How obvious is it to observe, that children come to hate 
things liked at first, as soon as they come to be whipped, or chid, and teazed about them? 
And it is not to be wondered at in them, when grown men would not be able to be 
reconciled to any thing by such ways. Who is there that would not be disgusted with any 
innocent recreation in itself indifferent to him, if he I should with blows, or ill language, 
be haled to it, when he had no mind? Or be constantly so treated, for some circumstance 
in his application to it? This is natural to be so. Offensive circumstances ordinarily infect 
innocent things which they are joined with: and the very sight of a cup, wherein any one 
uses to take nauseous physic, turns his stomach, so that nothing will relish well out of it, 
though the cup be never so clean and well-shaped, and of the richest materials. 

§ 50 3. Such a sort of slavish discipline makes a slavish temper. The child submits, and 

dissembles obedience, whilst the fear of the rod hangs over him; but when that is 
removed, and, by being out of sight, he can promise himself impunity, he gives the 
greater scope to his natural inclination, which by this way is. not at all altered, but on the 
contrary heightened and increased in him; and after such restraint, breaks out usually with 
the more violence. Or, 

§51 4. If severity carried to the highest pitch does prevail, and works a cure upon the 

present unruly distemper, it is often bringing in the room of it a worse and more 
dangerous disease, by breaking the mind; and then, in the place of disorderly young 
fellow, you have a low-spirited, moped creature: who, however with his unnatural 
sobriety he may please silly people, who commend tame, unactive children because they 




make no noise, nor give them any trouble; yet, at last, will probably prove as 
uncomfortable a thing to his friends, as he will be, all his life, an useless thing to himself 
and others. 

§ 52 Rewards. — Beating them, and all other sorts of slavish and corporal punishments, 
are not the discipline fit to be used in the education of those we would have wise, good, 
and ingenuous men; and therefore very rarely to be applied, and that only in great 
occasions, and cases of extremity. On the other side, to flatter children by rewards of 
things that are pleasant to them, is as carefully to be avoided. He that will give to his son 
apples, or sugar-plums, or what else of this kind he is most delighted with, to make him 
learn his book, does but authorize his love of pleasure, and cocker up that dangerous 
propensity, which he ought by all means to subdue and stifle in him. You can never hope 
to teach him to master it whilst you compound for the check you give his inclination in 
one place, by the satisfaction you propose to it in another. To make a good, a wise, and a 
virtuous man, it is fit he should learn to cross his appetite, and deny his inclination to 
riches, finery, or pleasing his palate, etc., whenever his reason advises the contrary, and 
his duty requires it. But when you draw him to do anything that is fit, by the offer of 
money; or reward the pains of learning his book, by the pleasure of a luscious morsel; 
when you promise him a lace-cravat, or a fine new suit, upon performance of some of his 
little tasks; what do you, by proposing these as rewards, but allow them to be the good 
things he should aim at, and thereby encourage his longing for them, and accustom him 
to place his happiness in them? Thus people, to prevail with children to be industrious 
about their grammar, dancing, or some other such matter of no great moment to the 
happiness or usefulness of their lives by misapplied rewards and punishments, sacrifice 
their virtue, invert the order of their education, and teach them luxury, pride, or 
covetousness, etc. For in this way, flattering those wrong inclinations, which they should 
restrain and suppress, they lay the foundations of those future vices, which cannot be 
avoided, but by curbing our desires, and accustoming them early to submit to reason. 

§53 I say, not this, that I would have children kept from the conveniences or pleasures 
of life, that are not injurious to their health or virtue. On the contrary, I would have their 
lives made as pleasant, and as agreeable to them as may be, in a plentiful enjoyment of 
whatsoever might innocently delight them: provided it be with this caution, that they have 
those enjoyments only as the consequences of the state of esteem and acceptation they are 
in with their parents and governors; but they should never be offered or bestowed on 
them, as the reward of this or that particular performance, that they show an aversion to, 
or to which they would not have applied themselves without that temptation. 

§ 54 But if you take away the rod on one hand, and these little encouragements, which 
they are taken with, on the other. How then (will you say) shall children be governed? 
Remove.hope and fear, and there is an end of all discipline. I grant, that good and evil, 
reward and punishment, are the only motives to a rational creature; these are the spur and 
reins whereby all mankind are set on work and guided, and therefore they are to be made 
use of to children too. For I advise their parents and governors always to carry this in 
their minds, that they are to be treated as rational creatures. 




§ 55 Rewards, I grant, and punishments must be proposed to children, if we intend to 
work upon them. The mistake, I imagine, is that those that are generally made use of, are 
ill chosen. The pains and pleasures of the body are, I think, of ill consequence, when 
made the rewards and punishments, whereby men would prevail on their children: for 
they serve but to increase and strengthen those appetites which 'tis our business to subdue 
and master. What principle of virtue do you lay in a child, if you will redeem his desires 
of one pleasure by the proposal of another? This is but to enlarge his appetite, and 
instruct it to wander. If a child cries for an unwholesome and dangerous fruit, you 
purchase his quiet by giving him a less hurtful sweetmeat; this perhaps may preserve his 
health, but spoils his mind, and sets that farther out of order. For here you only change 
the object, but flatter still his appetite, and allow that must be satisfied: wherein, as I have 
showed, lies the root of the mischief: and till you bring him to be able to bear a denial of 
that satisfaction, the child may at present be quiet and orderly, but the disease is not 
cured. By this way of proceeding you foment and cherish in him, that which is the spring 
from whence all the evil flows, which will be sure on the next occasion to break out again 
with more violence, give him stronger longings, and you more trouble. 

§ 56 Reputation. — The rewards and punishments, then, whereby we should keep 
children in order, are quite of another kind; and of that force, that when we can get them 
once to work, the business, I think, is done, and the difficulty is over. Esteem and 
disgrace are, of all others, the most powerful incentives to the mind, when one is brought 
to relish them. If you can once get into children a love of credit, and an apprehension of 
shame and disgrace, you have put into them the true principle, which will constantly 
work, and incline them to the right. But it will be asked, How shall this be done? 

I confess, it does not, at first appearance, want some difficulty; but yet I think it worth our 
while to seek the ways (and practice them when found) to attain this, which I look on as 
the great secret of education. 

§57 First, children (earlier perhaps than we think) are very sensible of praise and 
recommendation. They find a pleasure in being esteemed and valued, especially by their 
parents, and those whom they depend on. If therefore the father caress and commend 
them, when they do well; show a cold and neglectful countenance to them upon doing ill; 
and this accompanied by a like carriage of the mother; and all others that are about them, 
it will in a little time make them sensible of the difference: and this, if constantly 
observed, I doubt not but will of itself work more than threats or blows, which lose their 
force, when once grown common, and are of no use when shame does not attend them; 
and therefore are to be forborne, and never to be used, but in the case hereafter- 
mentioned, when it is brought to extremity. 

§ 58 But, secondly, to make the sense of esteem or disgrace sink the deeper, and be of 
the more weight, other agreeable or disagreeable things should constantly accompany 
these different states; not as particular rewards and punishments of this or that particular 
action, but as necessarily belonging to, and constantly attending one, who by his carriage 
has brought himself into a state of disgrace or commendation. By which way of treating 
them, children may as much as possible be brought to conceive, that those that are 




commended and in esteem for doing well, will necessarily be beloved and cherished by 
every body, and have all other good things as a consequence of it. And, on the other side, 
when any one by miscarriage falls into disesteem, and cares not to preserve his credit, he 
will unavoidably fall under neglect and contempt; and in that state, the want of what ever 
might satisfy or delight him, will follow. In this way the objects of their desires are made 
assisting to virtue, when a settled experience from the beginning teaches children, that the 
things they delight in, belong to, and are to be enjoyed by those only, who are in a state of 
reputation. If by these means you can come once to shame them out of their faults, (for 
besides that, I would willingly have no punishment,) and make them in love with the 
pleasure of being well thought on, you may turn them as you please, and they will be in 
love with all the ways of virtue. 

§ 59 The great difficulty here is, I imagine, from the folly and perverseness of servants, 
who are hardly to be hindered from crossing herein the design of the father and mother. 
Children, discountenanced by their parents for any fault, find usually a refuge and relief 
in the caresses of these foolish flatterers, who thereby undo whatever the parents 
endeavour to establish. When the father or mother looks sour on the child, everybody else 
should put on the same carriage to him, and nobody give him countenance, till 
forgiveness asked, and a contrary carriage restored him to his esteem and former credit 
again. If this were constantly observed, I guess there would be little need of blows or 
chiding: their own ease and satisfaction would quickly teach children to court 
commendation, and avoid doing that which they found every body condemned, and they 
were sure to suffer for, without being chid or beaten. This would teach them modesty and 
shame; and they would quickly come to have a natural abhorrence for that which they 
found made them slighted and neglected by every body. But how this inconvenience from 
servants is to be remedied, I can only leave to parents' care and consideration. Only I 
think it of great importance; and that they are very happy, who can get discreet people 
about their children. 

§ 60 Shame. — Frequent beating or chiding is therefore carefully to be avoided; because 
it never produces any good, farther than it serves to raise shame and abhorrence of the 
miscarriage that brought it on them. And if the greatest part of the trouble be not sense 
that they have done amiss, and the apprehension that they have drawn on themselves the 
just displeasure of their best friends, the pain of whipping will work but an imperfect 
cure; it only patches up for the present, and skins it over, but reaches not to the bottom of 
the sore. Shame, then, and apprehension of displeasure, being that which ought alone to 
give a check and hold the reins, 'tis impossible but punishment should lose that efficacy, 
when it often returns. Shame has in children the same place as modesty in women, which 
cannot be kept, and often transgressed against. And as to the apprehension of displeasure 
in the parents, that will come to be very insignificant, if the marks of that displeasure 
quickly cease. And therefore I think parents should well consider, what faults in their 
children are weighty enough to deserve the declaration of their anger: but when their 
displeasure is once declared to a degree that carries any punishment with it, they ought 
not presently to lay by the severity of their brows, but to restore their children to their 
former grace with some difficulty; and delay till their conformity, and more than ordinary 
merit, make good their amendment. If this be not so ordered, punishment will be by 




familiarity but a thing of course; and offending, being punished and then forgiven, be as 
natural and ordinary as noon, night, and morning, following one another. 

§61 Reputation. — Concerning reputation, I shall only remark this one thing more of it: 
that, though it be not the true principle and measure of virtue, (for that is the knowledge 
of a man's duty, and the satisfaction it is to obey his Maker, in following the dictates of 
that light God has given him, with the hopes of acceptation and reward), yet it is that 
which comes nearest to it: and being the testimony and applause that other people's 
reason, as it were, by common consent, gives to virtuous and well-ordered actions, is the 
proper guide and encouragement of children, till they grow able to judge for themselves, 
and to find what is right by their own reason. 

§ 62 This consideration may direct parents how to manage themselves in reproving and 
commending their children. The rebukes and chiding, which their faults will sometimes 
make hardly to be avoided, should not only be sober, grave, and unpassionate words, but 
also alone and in private: but the commendations children deserve, they should receive 
before others. This doubles the reward, by spreading their praise; but the backwardness 
parents show in divulging their faults, will make them set a greater value on their credit 
themselves, and teach them to be the more careful to preserve the good opinion of others, 
whilst they think they have it: but when being exposed to shame, by publishing their 
miscarriages, they give it up for lost, that check upon them is taken off, and they will be 
the less careful to preserve other's good thoughts of them, the more they suspect that their 
reputation with them is already blemished. 

§ 63 Childishness. — But if a right course be taken with children, there will not be so 
much need of the application of the common rewards and punishments, as we imagine, 
and as the general practice has established. For, all their innocent folly, playing, and 
childish actions are to be left perfectly free and unrestrained, as far as they can consist 
with the respect due to those that are present; and that with the greatest allowance. If 
these faults of their age, rather than of the children themselves, were, as they should be, 
left only to time, and imitation, and riper years to cure, children would escape a great deal 
of misapplied and useless correction; which either fails to overpower the natural 
disposition of their childhood, and so, by an ineffectual familiarity, makes correction in 
other necessary cases of less use; or else if it be of force to restrain the natural gaiety of 
that age, it serves only to spoil the temper both of body and mind. If the noise and bustle 
of their play prove at any time inconvenient or unsuitable to the place or company they 
are in, (which can only be where their parents are,) a look or a word from the father or 
mother, if they have established the authority they should, will be enough either to 
remove or quiet them for that time. But this gamesome humour, which is wisely adapted 
by nature to their age and temper, should rather be encouraged, to keep up their spirits, 
and improve their strength and health, than curbed or restrained: and the chief art is to 
make all that they have to do, sport and play too. 

§ 64 Rules. — And here give me leave to take notice of one thing I think a fault in the 
ordinary method of education; and that is, the charging of children's memories, upon all 
occasions, with rules and precepts, which they often do not understand, and constantly as 




soon forget as given. If it be some action you would have done, or done otherwise; 
whenever they forget, or do it awkwardly, make them do it over and over again, till they 
are perfect; Whereby you will get these two advantages: first, to see whether it be an 
action they can do, or is fit to be expected of them; For sometimes children are bid to do 
things, which, upon trial, they are found not able to do; and had need be taught and 
exercised in, before they are required to do them. But it is much easier for a tutor to 
command than to teach. Secondly, another thing got by it will be this; that by repeating 
the same action, till it be grown habitual in them, the performance will not depend on 
memory, or reflection, the concomitant of prudence and age, and not of childhood; but 
will be natural in them. Thus, bowing to a gentleman when he salutes him, and looking in 
his face when he speaks to him, is by constant use as natural to a well-bred man as 
breathing; it requires no thought, no reflection. Having this way cured in your child any 
fault, it is cured for ever: and thus one by one, you may weed them out all, and plant what 
habits you please. 

§ 65 I have seen parents so heap rules on their children, that it was impossible for the 
poor little ones to remember a tenth part of them, much less to observe them. However, 
they were either by words or blows corrected for the breach of those multiplied and often 
very impertinent precepts. Whence it naturally followed, that the children minded not 
what was said to them; when it was evident to them, that no attention they were capable 
of, was sufficient to preserve them from transgression, and the rebukes which followed it. 
Let therefore your rules to your son be as few as is possible, and rather fewer than more 
than seem absolutely necessary. For if you burden him with many rules, one of these two 
things must necessarily follow; that either he must be very often punished, which will be 
of ill consequence, by making punishment too frequent and familiar; or else you must let 
the transgressions of some of your rules go unpunished, whereby they will of course 
grow contemptible, and your authority become cheap to him. Make but few laws, but see 
they be well observed, when once made. Few years require but few laws; and as his age 
increases when one rule is by practice well established, you may add another. 

§ 66 Practice. — But pray remember, children are not to be taught by rules, which will 
be always slipping out of their memories. What you think necessary for them to do, settle 
in them by an indispensable practice, as often as the occasion returns; and, if it be 
possible, make occasions. This will beget habits in them, which, being once established, 
operate of themselves easily and naturally, without the assistance of the memory. But 
here let me give two cautions: 

1 . The one is, that you keep them to the practice of what you would have grow into a 
habit in them by kind words and gentle admonitions, rather as minding them of what they 
forget, than by harsh rebukes and chiding, as if they were wilfully guilty. 

2. Another thing you are to take care of is, not to endeavour to settle too many habits at 
once, lest by variety you confound them, and so perfect none. When constant custom has 
made any one thing easy and natural to them, and they practise it without reflection, you 
may then go on to another. This method of teaching children by a repeated practice, and 
the same action done over and over again, under the eye and direction of the tutor, till 




they have got the habit of doing it well and not by relying on rules trusted to their 
memories; has so many advantages, which way soever we consider it, that I cannot but 
wonder (if ill customs could be wondered at in any thing) how it could possibly be so 
much neglected. I shall name one more that comes now in my way. By this method we 
shall see, whether what is required of him be adapted to his capacity, and any way suited 
to the child's natural genius and constitution: for that too must be considered in a right 
education. We must not hope wholly to change their original tempers, nor make the gay 
pensive and grave; nor the melancholy sportive, without spoiling them. God has stamped 
certain characters upon men's minds, which, like their shapes, may perhaps be a little 
mended; but can hardly be totally altered and transformed into the contrary. 

He, therefore, that is about children, should well study their natures and aptitudes, and 
see, by often trials, what turn they easily take, and what becomes them; observe what 
their native stock is, how it may be improved, and what it is fit for: he should consider 
what they want, whether they be capable of having it wrought into them by industry, and 
incorporated there by practice; and whether it be worth while to endeavour it. For, in 
many cases, all that we can do, or should aim at, is, to make the best of what nature has 
given, to prevent the vices and faults to which such a constitution is most inclined, and 
give it all the advantages it is capable of. Every one's natural genius should be carried as 
far as it could; but to attempt the putting another upon him will be but labour in vain; and 
what is so plastered on, will at best sit but untowardly and have always hanging to it the 
ungracefulness of constraint and affectation. 

Affectation is not, I confess, an early fault of childhood, or the product of untaught 
nature. It is of that sort of weeds which grow not in the wild uncultivated waste, but in 
garden-plots, under the negligent hand or unskilful care of a gardener. Management and 
instruction, and some sense of the necessity of breeding, are requisite to make any one 
capable of affectation, which endeavours to correct natural defects, and has always the 
laudable aim of pleasing, though it always misses it; and the more it labours to put on 
gracefulness, the farther it is from it. For this reason, it is the more carefully to be 
watched, because it is the proper fault of education; a perverted education indeed, but 
such as young people often fall into, either by their own mistake, or the ill conduct of 
those about them. 

He that will examine wherein that gracefulness lies, which always pleases, will find it 
arises from that natural coherence which appears between the thing done and such a 
temper of mind as cannot but be approved of as suitable to the occasion. We cannot but 
be pleased with an humane, friendly, civil temper wherever we meet with it. A mind free, 
and master of itself and all its actions, not low and narrow, not haughty and insolent, not 
blemished with any great defect, is what every one is taken with. The actions which 
naturally flow from such a well-formed mind, please us also, as the genuine marks of it; 
and being as it were natural emanations from the spirit and disposition within, cannot but 
be easy and unconstrained. This seems to me to be that beauty which shines through 
some men's actions, sets off all that they do, and takes all they come near; when by a 
constant practice, they have fashioned their carriage, and made all those little expressions 
of civility and respect, which nature or custom has established in conversation, so easy to 




themselves, that they seem not artificial or studied, but naturally to follow from a 
sweetness of mind and a well-turned disposition. 

On the other side, affectation is an awkward and forced imitation of what should be 
genuine and easy, wanting the beauty that accompanies what is natural; because there is 
always a disagreement between the outward action, and the mind within, one of these two 
ways: 

1 . Either when a man would outwardly put on a disposition of mind, which then he really 
has not, but endeavours by a forced carriage to make shew of; yet so, that the constraint 
he is under discovers itself: and thus men affect sometimes to appear sad, merry, or kind, 
when in truth they are not so. 

2. The other is, when they do not endeavour to make shew of dispositions of mind, which 
they have not, but to express those they have by a carriage not suited to them. And such 
in conversation are all constrained motions, actions, words, or looks, which, though 
designed to shew either their respect or civility to the company, or their satisfaction and 
easiness in it, are not yet natural nor genuine marks of the one or the other, but rather of 
some defect or mistake within. Imitation of others, without discerning what is graceful in 
them, or what is peculiar to their characters, often makes a great part of this. But 
affectation of all kinds, whencesoever it proceeds, is always offensive; because we 
naturally hate whatever is counterfeit, and condemn those who have nothing better to 
recommend themselves by. 

Plain and rough nature, left to itself, is much better than an artificial ungracefulness, and 
such studyed ways of being illfashioned. The want of an accomplishment, or some defect 
in our behaviour, coming short of the utmost gracefulness, often escapes observation and 
censure. But affectation in any part of our carriage is lighting up a candle to our defects, 
and never fails to make us be taken notice of, either as wanting sense, or wanting 
sincerity. This governors ought the more diligently to look after, because, as I above 
observed, 'tis an acquired ugliness, owing to mistaken education, few being guilty of it 
but those who pretend to breeding, and would not be thought ignorant of what is 
fashionable and becoming in conversation; and, if I mistake not, it has often its rise from 
the lazy admonitions of those who give rules, and propose examples, without joining 
practice with their instructions and making their pupils repeat the action in their sight, 
that they may correct what is indecent or constrained in it, till it be perfected into an 
habitual and becoming easiness. 

§ 67 Manners. — Manners, as they call it, about which children are so often perplexed, 
and have so many goodly exhortations made them, by their wise maids and governesses, I 
think, are rather to be learnt by example than rules; and then children, if kept out of ill 
company, will take a pride to behave themselves prettily, after the fashion of others, 
perceiving themselves esteemed and commended for it. But if, by a little negligence in 
this part, the boy should not put off his hat, nor make legs very gracefully, a dancing- 
master would cure that defect; and wipe off all that plainness of nature, which the a-la- 
mode people call clownishness. And since nothing appears to me to give children so 




much becoming confidence and behaviour, and so to raise them to the conversation of 
those above their age, as dancing I think they should be taught to dance, as soon as they 
are capable of learning it. For, though this consist only in outward gracefulness of 
motion, yet, I know not how, it gives children manly thoughts and carriage, more than 
any thing. But otherwise I would not have children much tormented about punctilios, or 
niceties of breeding. Never trouble yourself about those faults in them, which you know 
age will cure. And therefore want of well-fashioned civility in the carriage, whilst civility 
is not wanting in the mind (for there you must take care to plant it early), should be the 
parent's and tutor's least care, whilst they are young. If his tender mind be filled with a 
veneration for his parents and teachers, which consists in love and esteem, and a fear to 
offend them; and with respect and good-will to all people; that respect will of itself teach 
those ways of expressing it, which he observes most acceptable. Be sure to keep up in 
him the principles of good-nature and kindness; make them as habitual as you can, by 
credit and commendation, and the good things accompanying that state: and when they 
have taken root in his mind, and are settled there by a continued practice, fear not; the 
ornaments of conversation, and the outside of fashionable manners, will come in their 
due time. 

Whilst they are young, any carelessness is to be borne with in children, that carries not 
with it the marks of pride or ill nature; but those, when they appear in any action, are to 
be corrected immediately, by the ways above mentioned; and what else remains like 
clownishness, or want of good breeding, time and observation will of itself reform in 
them, as they ripen in years, if they are bred in good company; but if in ill, all the rules in 
the world, all the correction imaginable, will not be able to polish them. For you must 
take this for a certain truth, that let them have what instructions you will, what teachers 
soever you please, that which will most influence their carriage, will be the company they 
converse with. Children (nay, and men too) do most by example. We are all a sort of 
chameleons, that still take a tincture from things near us: nor is it to be wondered at in 
children, who better understand what they see, than what they hear. 

§ 68 Company. — I mentioned above, one great mischief that came by servants to 
children, when by their flatteries they take off the edge and force of the parents' rebukes, 
and so lessen their authority; And here is another great inconvenience, which children 
receive from the ill examples which they meet with, amongst the meaner servants. They 
are wholly, if possible, to be kept from such conversation: for the contagion of these ill 
precedents, both in civility and virtue, horribly infects children, as often as they come 
within reach of it. They frequently learn from unbred or debauched servants such 
language, untowardly tricks and vices, as otherwise they possibly would be ignorant of, 
all their lives. 

§ 69 'Tis a hard matter wholly to prevent this mischief. You will have very good luck, if 
you never have a clownish or vicious servant, and if from them your children never get 
any infection. But yet, as much must be done towards it, as can be; and the children kept 
as much as may be in the company of their parents, and those to whose care they are 
committed. To this purpose, their being in their presence should be made easy to them: 
they should be allowed the liberties and freedom suitable to their ages, and not be held 




under unnecessary restraints when in their parents' or governor's sight. If it be a prison to 
them, 'tis no wonder they should not like it. They must not be hindered from being 
children, or from playing, or doing as children, but from doing ill; all other liberty is to be 
allowed them. Next, to make them in love with the company of their parents, they should 
receive all their good things there, and from their hands. The servants should be hindered 
from making court to them, by giving them strong drink, wine, fruit, play-things, and 
other such matters, which may make them in love with their conversation. 

§70 Having named company, I am almost ready to throw away my pen, and trouble 
you no farther on this subject. For since that does more than all precepts, rules, and 
instructions, methinks 'tis almost wholly in vain to make a long discourse of other things, 
and to talk of that almost to no purpose. For you will be ready to say, What shall I do 
with my son? If I keep him always at home, he will be in danger to be my young master; 
and if I send him abroad, how is it possible to keep him from the contagion of rudeness 
and vice, which is so every where in fashion? In my house, he will perhaps be more 
innocent, but more ignorant, too, of the world, and being used constantly to the same 
faces, and little company will, when he comes abroad, be a sheepish or conceited 
creature. 

[I confess, both sides have their inconveniences. Being abroad, it is true, will make him 
bolder, and better able to bustle and shift amongst boys of his own age; and the emulation 
of school-fellows often puts life and industry into young lads. But till you can find a 
school, wherein it is possible for the master to look after the manners of his scholars, and 
can show as great effects of his care of forming their minds to virtue, and their carriage to 
good breeding, as of forming their tongues to the learned languages; you must confess, 
that you have a strange value for words, when preferring the languages of the ancient 
Greeks and Romans, to that which made them such brave men, you think it worth while 
to hazard your son's innocence and virtue for a little Greek and Latin. For, as for that 
boldness and spirit, which lads get amongst their play-fellows at school, it has ordinarily 
such a mixture of rudeness, and an ill-turned confidence, that those misbecoming and 
disingenuous ways of shifting in the world must be unlearned, and all the tincture washed 
out again, to make way for better principles, and such manners as make a truly worthy 
man. He that considers how diametrically opposite the skill of living well, and managing, 
as a man should do, his, affairs in the world, is to that malapertness, tricking, or violence, 
learnt among school-boys, will think the faults of a privater education infinitely to be 
preferred to such improvements; and will take care to preserve his child's innocence and 
modesty at home, as being nearer of kin; and more in the way of those qualities, which 
make an useful and able man. Nor does any one find, or so much as suspect, that that 
retirement and bashfulness, which their daughters are brought up in, makes them less 
knowing or less able women. Conversation, when they come into the world, soon gives 
them a becoming assurance; and whatsoever, beyond that, there is of rough and 
boisterous, may in men be very well spared too: for courage and steadiness, as I take it, 
lie not in roughness and ill breeding. 

Virtue is harder to be got than a knowledge of the world; and if lost in a young man, is 
seldom recovered. Sheepishness and ignorance of the world, the faults imputed to a 




private education, are neither the necessary consequences of being bred at home; nor, if 
they were, are they incurable evils. Vice is the more stubborn, as well as the more 
dangerous evil of the two; and therefore, in the first place, to be fenced against. If that 
sheepish softness, which often enervates those, who are bred like fondlings at home, be 
carefully to be avoided, it is principally so for virtue's sake; for fear lest such a yielding 
temper should be too susceptible of vicious impressions, and expose the novice too easily 
to be corrupted. A young man, before he leaves the shelter of his father's house, and the 
guard of a tutor, should be fortified with resolution, and made acquainted with men, to 
secure his virtue; lest he should be led into some ruinous course, or fatal precipice, before 
he is sufficiently acquainted with the dangers of conversation, and has steadiness enough 
not to yield to every temptation. Were it not for this, a young man's bashfulness and 
ignorance in the world would not so much need an early care. Conversation would cure it 
in a great measure; or if that will not do it early enough, it is only a stronger reason for a 
good tutor at home. For, if pains be to be taken to give him a manly air and assurance 
betimes, it is chiefly as a fence to his virtue, when he goes into the world, under his own 
conduct. 

It is preposterous, therefore, to sacrifice his innocency to the attaining of confidence, and 
some little skill of bustling for himself among others, by his conversation with ill-bred 
and vicious boys; when the chief use of that sturdiness and standing upon his own legs, is 
only for the preservation of his virtue. For if confidence or cunning come once to mix 
with vice, and support his miscarriages he is only the surer lost; and you must undo again, 
and strip him of that he has got from his companions, or give him up to ruin. Boys will 
unavoidably be taught assurance by conversation with men, when they are brought into it; 
and that is time enough. Modesty and submission, till then, better fits them for 
instruction; and therefore there needs not any great care to stock them with confidence 
beforehand. That which requires most time, pains, and assiduity, is to work into them the 
principles and practice of virtue and good breeding. This is the seasoning they should be 
prepared with, so as not easily to be got out again: this they had need to be well provided 
with. For conversation, when they come into the world, will add to their knowledge and 
assurance, but be too apt to take from their virtue; which therefore they ought to be 
plentifully stored with, and have that tincture sunk deep into them. 

How they should be fitted for conversation, and entered into the world, when they are 
ripe for it, we shall consider in another place. But how any one's being put into a mixed 
herd of unruly boys, and then learning to wrangle at trap, or rookl at span farthing, fits 
him for civil conversation or business I do not see. And what qualities are ordinarily to be 
got from such a troop of play-fellows as schools usually assemble together, from parents 
of all kinds, that a father should so much covet it, is hard to divine. I am sure, he who is 
able to be at the charge of a tutor at home, may there give his son a more genteel carriage, 
more manly thoughts, and a sense of what is worthy and becoming, with a greater 
proficiency in learning into the bargain, and ripen him up sooner into a man, than any at 
school can do. Not that I blame the school-master in this, or think it to be laid to his 
charge. The difference is great between two or three pupils in the same house, and three 
or fourscore boys lodged up and down. For, let the master's industry and skill be ever so 
great, it is impossible he should have 50 or 100 scholars under his eye any longer than 




they are in the school together: nor can it be expected, that he should instruct them 
successfully in any thing but their books; the forming of their minds and manners 
requiring a constant attention, and particular application to every single boy; which is 
impossible in a numerous flock, and would be wholly in vain (could he have time to 
study and correct every one's particular defects and wrong inclinations) when the lad was 
to he left to himself, or the prevailing infection of his fellows, the greatest part of the four 
and twenty hours. 

But fathers, observing that fortune is often most successfully courted by bold and bustling 
men, are glad to see their sons pert and forward betimes; take it for a happy omen, that 
they will be thriving men, and look on the tricks they play their school-fellows, or learn 
from them, as a proficiency in the art of living, and making their way through the world. 
But I must take the liberty to say, that he that lays the foundation of his son's fortune in 
virtue and good breeding takes the only sure and warrantable way. And it is not the 
waggeries or cheats practised among school-boys, it is not their roughness one to another, 
nor the well-laid plots of robbing an orchard together, that make an able man; but the 
principles of justice, generosity and sobriety, joined with observation and industry, 
qualities which I judge schoolboys do not learn much of one another. And if a young 
gentleman, bred at home, be not taught more of them than he could learn at school, his 
father has made a very ill choice of a tutor. Take a boy from the top of a grammar-school, 
and one of the same age, bred as he should be in his father's family, and bring them into 
good company together; and then see which of the two will have the more manly 
carriage, and address himself with the more becoming assurance to strangers. Here I 
imagine the school-boy's confidence will either fail or discredit him; and if it be such as 
fits him only for the conversation of boys, he had better be without it. 

Vice, if we may believe the general complaint, ripens so fast now-a-days, and runs up to 
seed so early in young people, that it is impossible to keep a lad from the spreading 
contagion, if you will venture him abroad in the herd, and trust to chance, or his own 
inclination, for the choice of his company at school. By what fate vice has so thriven 
amongst us these few years past, and by what hands it has been nursed up into so 
uncontrolled a dominion, I shall leave to others to enquire. I wish that those who 
complain of the great decay of Christian piety and virtue everywhere, and of learning and 
acquired improvements in the gentry of this generation, would consider how to retrieve 
them in the next. This I am sure, that, if the foundation of it be not laid in the education 
and principling of the youth, all other endeavours will be in vain. And if the innocence, 
sobriety, and industry of those who are coming up, be not taken care of and preserved, it 
will be ridiculous to expect, that those who are to succeed next on the stage, should 
abound in that virtue, ability, and learning, which has hitherto made England 
considerable in the world. I was going to add courage, too, though it has been looked on 
as the natural inheritance of Englishmen. What has been talked of some late actions at 
sea, of a kind unknown to our ancestors, gives me occasion to say, that debauchery sinks 
the courage of men; and when dissoluteness has eaten out the sense of true honour, 
bravery seldom stays long after it. And I think it impossible to find an instance of any 
nation, however renowned for their valour, who ever kept their credit in arms, or made 
themselves redoubt able amongst their neighbours, after corruption had once broken 




through, and dissolved the restraint of discipline; and vice was grown to such a head, that 
it durst show itself barefaced, without being out of countenance. 



It is virtue then, direct virtue, which is the hard and valuable part to be aimed at in 
education; and not a forward pertness, or any little arts of shifting. All other 
considerations and accomplishments should give way and be postponed to this. This is 
the solid and substantial good, which tutors should not only read lectures, and talk of; but 
the labour and art of education should furnish the mind with, and fasten there, and never 
cease till the young man had a true relish of it, and placed his strength, his glory, and his 
pleasure in it. 

The more this advances, the easier way will be made for other accomplishments in their 
turns. For he that is brought to submit to virtue, will not be refractory, or resty, in any 
thing that becomes him. And therefore I cannot but prefer breeding of a young gentleman 
at home in his father's sight, under a good governor, as much the best and safest way to 
this great and main end of education, when it can be had, and is ordered as it should be. 
Gentlemen's houses are seldom without variety of company: they should use their sons to 
all the strange faces that come there, and engage them in conversation, with men of parts 
and breeding, as soon as they are capable of it. And why those, who live in the country, 
should not take them with them, when they make visits of civility to their neighbours, I 
know not this I am sure, a father that breeds his son at home, has the opportunity to have 
him more in his own company, and there give him what encouragement he thinks fit; and 
can keep him better from the taint of servants, and the meaner sort of people, than is 
possible to be done abroad. But what shall be resolved in the case, must in great measure 
be left to the parents, to be determined by their circumstances and conveniences. Only I 
think it the worst sort of good husbandry, for a father not to strain himself a little for his 
son's breeding; which, let his condition be what it will, is the best portion he can leave 
him. But if, after all, it shall be thought by some, that the breeding at home has too little 
company, and that at ordinary schools, not such as it should be for a young gentleman; I 
think there might be ways found out to avoid the inconveniences on the one side and the 
other. 

§71 Example. — Having under consideration how great the influence of company is, 
and how prone we are all, especially children, to imitation, I must here take the liberty to 
mind parents of this one thing, viz. That he that will have his son have a respect for him 
and his orders, must himself have a great reverence for his son. Maxima debetur pueris 
reverentia [The most scrupulous respect is due to boyhood]. You must do nothing before 
him, which you would not have him imitate. If anything 'scape you, which you would 
have pass for a fault in him, he will be sure to shelter himself under your example, and 
how then, you will be able to come at him, to correct it in the right way, I do not easily 
see. And if you will punish him for it, he cannot look on it as a thing which reason 
condemns, since you practise it; but he will be apt to interpret it the peevishness and 
arbitrary imperiousness of a father, which, without any ground for it, would deny his son 
the liberty and pleasures he takes himself. Or if you would have it thought it is a liberty 
belonging to riper years, and not to a child, von add but a new temptation, since, you 
must always remember, that children affect to be men earlier than is thought: and they 




love breeches, not for their cut or ease, hut because the having them is a mark or a step 
towards manhood. What I say of the father's carriage before his children, must extend 
itself to all those who have any authority over them, or for whom he would have them 
have any respect. 

§ 72 Thus all the actions of childishness, and unfashionable carriage, and whatever time 
and age will of itself be sure to reform, being exempt from the discipline of the rod, there 
will not be so much need of beating children, as is generally made use of. To which, if we 
add learning to read, write, dance, foreign language, etc., as under the same privilege, 
there will be but very rarely any occasion for blows or force in an ingenuous education. 
The right way to teach them those things, is, to give them a liking and inclination to what 
you propose to them to be learned, and that will engage their industry and application. 
This I think no hard matter to do, if children be handled as they should be, and the 
rewards and punishments above-mentioned be carefully applied, and with them these few 
rules observed in the method of instructing them. 

§73 1. Task. None of the things they are to learn should ever be made a burden to 

them, or imposed on them as a task. Whatever is so proposed, presently becomes 
irksome: the mind takes an aversion to it, though before it were a thing of delight or 
indifferency. Let a child be but ordered to whip his top at a certain time every day, 
whether he has, or has not a mind to it; let this be but required of him as a duty, wherein 
he must spend so many hours morning and afternoon, and see whether he will not soon 
be weary of any play at this rate. Is it not so with grown men? What they do cheerfully of 
themselves, do they not presently grow sick of, and can no more endure, as soon as they 
find it is expected of them as a duty? Children have as much a mind to show that they are 
free, that their own good actions come front themselves, that they are absolute and 
independent, as any of the proudest of you grown men, think of them as you please. 

§ 74 2. Disposition. As a consequence of this, they should seldom be put upon doing 

even those things you have got an inclination in them to, but when they have a mind and 
disposition to it. He that loves reading, writing, music, etc., finds yet in himself certain 
seasons wherein those things have no relish to him; and, if at that time he forces himself 
to it, he only pothers and wearies himself to no purpose. So it is with children. This 
change of temper should be carefully observed in them, and the favourable seasons of 
aptitude and inclination be heedfully laid hold of, to set them upon anything. By this 
means a great deal of time and tiring would be saved: for a child will learn three times as 
much when he is in tune, as he will with double the time and pains, when he goes 
awkwardly, or is dragged unwillingly to it. If this were minded as it should, children 
might be permitted to weary themselves with play, and yet have time enough to learn 
what is suited to the capacity of each age. And if things were ordered right, learning 
anything they should be taught, might be made as much a recreation to their play, as their 
play is to their learning. The pains are equal on both sides: nor is it that which troubles 
them, for they love to be busy, and the change and variety is that which naturally delights 
them. The only odds is, in that which we call play they act at liberty, and employ their 
pains (whereof you may observe them never sparing) freely; but what they are to learn, 
they are driven to it, called on or compelled. This is that, that at first entrance balks and 




cools them; they want their liberty: get them but to ask their tutor to teach them, as they 
do often their play-fellows, instead of this calling upon them to learn, and they being 
satisfied that they act as freely in this, as they do in other things) they will go on with as 
much pleasure in it, and it will not differ from their other sports and play. By these ways, 
carefully pursued, I guess a child may be brought to desire to be taught any thing you 
have a mind he should learn. The hardest part, I confess, is with the first or eldest; but 
when once he is set right, it is easy by him to lead the rest whither one will. 

§75 Task. — Though it be past doubt, that the fittest time for children to learn anything 
is when their minds are in tune; and well disposed to it; when neither flagging of spirit, 
nor intentness of thought upon something else, makes them awkward and averse; yet two 
things are to be taken care of: 1. That these seasons either not being warily observed and 
laid hold on as often as they return; or else not returning as often as they should (as 
always happens in the ordinary method and discipline of education, when blows and 
compulsion have raised an aversion in the child to the thing he is to learn), the 
improvement of the child be not thereby neglected, and so he be let grow into a habitual 
idleness, and confirmed in this indisposition. 2. That though other things are ill learned 
when the mind is either indisposed, or otherwise taken up; yet it is a great matter, and 
worth our endeavours to teach the mind to get the mastery over itself; and to be able, 
upon choice, to take itself off from the hot pursuit of one thing, and set itself upon 
another with facility and delight; or at any time to shake off its sluggishness, and 
vigorously employ itself about what reason, or the advice of another, shall direct. This is 
to be done in children, by trying them sometimes, when they are by laziness unbent: or by 
avocation bent another way, and endeavouring to make them buckle to the thing 
proposed. If by this means the mind can get a habitual dominion over it self, lay by ideas 
or business, as occasion requires, and betake itself to new and less acceptable 
employments, without reluctancy or discomposure, it will be an advantage of more 
consequence than Latin, or logic, or most of those things children are usually required to 
learn. 

§ 76 Compulsion. — Children being more active and busy in that age, than [in] any 
other part of their life, and being indifferent to anything they can do, so they may be but 
doing, dancing and Scotch-hoppers would he the same thing to them, were the 
encouragements and discouragements equal. But to things we would have them learn, the 
great and only discouragement I can observe, is, that they are called to it, 'tis made their 
business; they are teased and chid about it, and do it with trembling and apprehension; or, 
when they come willingly to it, are kept too long at it, till they are quite tired; all which 
intrenches too much on that natural freedom they extremely affect, and 'tis that liberty 
alone, which gives the true relish and delight to their ordinary play-games. Turn the 
tables, and you will find they will soon change their application; especially if they see the 
examples of others, whom they esteem and think above themselves. And if the things 
they see others do, be ordered so that they are persuaded it is the privilege of an age or 
condition above theirs, then ambition, and the desire still to get forward, and higher, and 
to be like those above them, will give them an inclination which will set them on work in 
a way wherein they will go on with vigour and pleasure, enjoying in it their dearly 
beloved freedom; which if it brings with it also the satisfaction of credit and reputation, I 




am apt to think there will need no other spur to excite their application and assiduity, as 
much as is necessary. I confess, there needs patience and skill, gentleness and attention, 
and a prudent conduct to attain this at first. But why have you a tutor if there needed no 
pains? But when this is once established, all the rest will follow more easily, than in any 
more severe and imperious discipline. And I think it no hard matter, to gain this point; I 
am sure it will not be, where children have no ill examples set before them. The great 
danger therefore I apprehend, is only from servants and other ill-ordered children, or such 
other vicious or foolish people, who spoil children, both by the ill pattern they set before 
them in their own ill manners, and by giving them together, the two things they should 
never have at once; I mean vicious pleasures, and commendation. 

§ 77 Chiding. — As children should very seldom be corrected by blows; so, I think, 
frequent, and especially, passionate chiding, of almost as ill consequence. It lessens the 
authority of the parents and the respect of the child; for I bid you still remember, they 
distinguish early between passion and reason: and as they cannot but have a reverence for 
what comes from the latter, so they quickly grow into a contempt of the former: or if it 
causes a present terror, yet it soon wears off; and natural inclination will easily learn to 
slight such scare-crows, which make a noise, but are not animated by reason. Children 
being to be restrained by the parents only in vicious (which, in their tender years, are only 
a few) things, a look or nod only ought to correct them, when they do amiss: or, if words 
are sometimes to be used, they ought to be grave, kind, and sober, representing the ill or 
unbecomingness of the fault, rather than a hasty rating of the child for it, which makes 
him not sufficiently distinguish whether your dislike be not more directed to him than his 
fault. 

§78 Obstinacy. — I foresee here it will be objected to me: What then, will you have 
children never beaten nor chid for any fault? This will be to let loose the reins to all kind 
of disorder. Not so much as is imagined, if a right course has been taken in the first 
seasoning of their minds, and implanting that awe of their parents above mentioned. For 
beating, by constant observation is found to do little good, where the smart of it is all the 
punishment that is feared or felt in it; for the influence of that quickly wears out, with the 
memory of it But yet there is one, and but one fault, for which I think children should be 
beaten; and that is obstinacy or rebellion. And in this, too, I would have it ordered so, if it 
can be, that the shame of the whipping, and not the I pain, should be the greatest part of 
the punishment. Shame of doing amiss, and deserving chastisement, is the only true 
restraint belonging to virtue. The smart of the rod, if shame accompanies it not soon 
ceases, and is forgotten; and will quickly, by use, lose its terror. I have known the 
children of a person of quality kept in awe, by the fear of having their shoes pulled off, as 
much as others by apprehension of a rod hanging over them. Some such punishment I 
think better than beating; for 'tis shame of the fault and the disgrace that attends it, that 
they should stand in fear of, rather than pain, if you would have them have a temper truly 
ingenuous. But stubbornness and an obstinate disobedience must be mastered with force 
and blows: for this there is no other remedy. Whatever particular action you bid him do, 
or forbear, you must be sure to see yourself obeyed; no quarter in this case, no resistance. 
For when once it comes to be a trial of skill, a contest for mastery betwixt you, as it is, if 
you command, and he refuses, you must be sure to carry it, whatever blows it costs, if a 




nod or words will not prevail; unless, for ever after, you intend to live in obedience to 
your son. A prudent and kind mother, of my acquaintance, was on such an occasion, 
forced to whip her little daughter, at her first coming home from nurse, eight times 
successively, the same morning, before she could master her stubbornness, and obtain a 
compliance in a very easy and indifferent matter. If she had left off sooner, and stopped at 
the seventh whipping, she had spoiled the child for ever; and, by her unprevailing blows, 
only confirmed her refractoriness, very hardly afterwards to be cured: but wisely 
persisting, till she had bent her mind and suppled her will, the only end of correction and 
chastisement she established her authority throughly in the very first occasions, and had 
ever after a very ready compliance and obedience in all things from her daughter, for, as 
this was the first time, so, I think, it was the last too she ever struck her. 

This, if well reflected on, would make people more wary in the use of the rod and the 
cudgel; and keep them from being so art to think beating the safe and universal remedy, 
to be applied at random, on all occasions. This is certain, however, if it does no good, it 
does great harm; if it reaches not the mind, and makes not the will supple, it hardens the 
offender; and whatever pain he has suffered for it, it does but endear to him his beloved 
stubbornness, which has got him this time the victory, and prepares him to contest and 
hope for it for the future. Thus, I doubt not but by ill-ordered correction, many have been 
taught to be obstinate and refractory, who otherwise would have been very pliant and 
tractable. For, if you punish a child, so as if it were only to revenge the past fault, which 
has raised your choler, what operation can this have upon his mind, which is the part to 
be amended? If there were no sturdy wilfulness of mind mixed with his fault, there was 
nothing in it that needed the severity of blows. A kind, or grave admonition would have 
been enough to remedy the faults of frailty, forgetfulness, or inadvertency, as much as 
they needed. But, if there were a perverseness in the will, if it were a designed, resolved 
disobedience, the punishment is not to be measured by the greatness or smallness of the 
matter wherein it appeared, but by the opposition it carries, and stands in, to that respect 
and submission [that] is due to the father's orders, and must always be rigorously exacted, 
and the blows by pauses laid on, till they reach the mind, and you perceive the signs of a 
true sorrow, shame, and resolution of obedience. This, I confess, requires something 
more than setting children a task) and whipping them without any more ado, if it be not 
done, and done to our fancy. This requires care, attention, observation, and a nice study 
of children's tempers, and weighing their faults well, before we come to this sort of 
punishment. But is not that better, than always to have the rod in hand, as the only 
instrument of government; and, by frequent use of it, on all occasions, misapply and 
render inefficacious this last and useful remedy where there is need of it? For, what else 
can be expected, when it is promiscuously used upon every little slip, when a mistake in 
concordance, or a wrong position in verse, shall have the severity of the, lash, in a well- 
tempered and industrious lad, as surely as a wilful crime in an obstinate and perverse 
offender? How can such a way of correction be expected to do good on the mind, and set 
that right which is the only thing to, be looked after; and, when set right, brings all the 
rest that you can desire along with it? 

§ 79 Where a wrong bent of the will wants not amendment, there can be no need of 
blows. All other faults, where the mind is rightly disposed, and refuses not the 




government and authority of the father or tutor, are but mistakes, and may often be, 
overlooked; or, when they are taken notice of, need no other but the gentle remedies of 
advice, direction, and reproof; till the repeated and wilful neglect of those, shows the 
fault to be in the mind, and that a rianifest perverseness of the will lies at the root of their 
disobedience. But when ever obstinacy, which is an open defiance, appears, that cannot 
be winked at or neglected, but must, in the first instance, be subdued and mastered; only 
care must be had, that we mistake not; and we must be sure it is obstinacy, and nothing 
else. 

§ 80 But since the occasions of punishment, especially beating, are as much to be 
avoided as may be, I think it should not be often brought to this point. If the awe I spoke 
of be once got, a look will be sufficient in most cases. Nor indeed should the same 
carriage, seriousness or application be expected from young children as from those of 
riper growth. They must be permitted, as I said, the foolish and childish actions, suitable 
to their years, without taking notice of them; inadvertency, carelessness, and gaiety, is the 
character of that age. I think the severity I spoke of, is not to extend it self to such 
unseasonable restraints. Keep them from vice and vicious dispositions, and such a kind of 
behaviour in general will come, with every degree of their age, as is suitable to that age, 
and the company they ordinarily converse with; and as they grow in years, they will grow 
in attention and application. But that your words may always carry weight and authority 
with them, if it shall happen, upon any occasion, that you bid him leave off the doing of 
any even childish things, you must be sure to carry the point, and not let him have the 
mastery. But yet, I say, I would have the father seldom interpose his authority and 
command in these cases, or in any other, but such as have a tendency to vicious habits. I 
think there are better ways of prevailing with them; and a gentle persuasion in reasoning 
(when the first point of submission to your will is got) will most times do much better. 

§81 Reasoning. — It will perhaps be wondered, that I mention reasoning with children: 
and yet I cannot but think that the true way of dealing with them. They understand it as 
early as they do language; and, if I misobserve not, they love to be treated as rational 
creatures, sooner than is imagined. 'Tis a pride should be cherished in them, and, as much 
as can be, made the greatest instrument to turn them by. 

But when I talk of reasoning, I do not intend any other, but such as is suited to the child's 
capacity and apprehension. Nobody can think a boy of three or seven years old, should be 
argued with, as a grown man. Long discourses, and philosophical reasonings, at best, 
amaze and confound, but do not instruct, children. When I say therefore, that they must 
be treated as rational creatures, I mean, that you should make them sensible, by the 
mildness of your carriage, and the composure, even in your correction of them, that what 
you do is reasonable in you, and useful and necessary for them; and that it is not out of 
caprice, passion, or fancy, that you command or forbid them any thing. This they are 
capable of understanding; and there is no virtue they should be excited to, nor fault they 
should be kept from, which I do not think they may be convinced of: but it must be by 
such reasons as their age and understanding are capable of, and those proposed always in 
very few and plain words. The foundations on which several duties are built, and the 
fountains of right and wrong, from which they spring, are not, perhaps, easily to be let 




into the minds of grown men, not used to abstract their thoughts from common received 
opinions. Much less are children capable of reasonings from remote principles. They 
cannot conceive the force of long deductions: the reasons that move them must be 
obvious, and level to their thoughts, and such as may (if I may so say) be felt and 
touched. But yet, if their age, temper, and inclinations, be considered, they will never 
want such motives, as may be sufficient to convince them. If there be no other more 
particular, yet these will always be intelligible, and of force, to deter them from any fault, 
fit to be taken notice of in them, (viz.) that it will be a discredit and disgrace to them, and 
displease you. 

§ 82 Examples. — But, of all the ways whereby children are to be instructed, and their 
manners formed, the plainest, easiest, and most efficacious, is to set before their eyes the 
examples of those things you would have them do or avoid. Which, when they are 
pointed out to them, in the practice of persons within their knowledge, with some 
reflections on their beauty or unbecomingness, are of more force to draw or deter their 
imitation, than any discourses which can be made to them. Virtues and vices can by no 
words be so plainly set before their understandings, as the actions of other men will show 
them, when you direct their observation, and bid them view this or that good or bad 
quality in their practice. And the beauty or uncomeliness of many things, in good and ill 
breeding, will be better learnt, and make deeper impressions on them, in the examples of 
others, than from any rules or instructions that can be given about them. 

This is a method to be used, not only whilst they are young, but to be continued, even as 
long as they shall be under another's tuition or conduct. Nay, I know not whether it be not 
the best way to be used by a father, as long as he shall think fit, on any occasion, to 
reform any thing he wishes mended in his son; nothing sinking so gently and so deep, 
into men's minds, as example. And what ill they either overlook, or indulge in them 
themselves, they cannot but dislike, and be ashamed of, when it is set before them in 
another. 

§ 83 Whipping. — It may be doubted concerning whipping, when, as the last remedy, it 
comes to be necessary, at what times, and by whom it should be done: whether presently 
upon the committing the fault, whilst it is yet fresh and hot; and whether parents 
themselves should beat their children. As to the first, I think it should not be done 
presently, lest passion mingle with it and so, though it exceed the just proportion, yet it 
lose the authority; for even children discern when we do things in passion. But, as I said 
before, that has most weight with them, that appears sedately to come from their parents' 
reason; and they are not without this distinction. Next, if you have any discreet servant 
capable of it, and has the place of governing your child (for if you have a tutor, there is 
no doubt) I think it is best the smart should come more immediately from another's hand, 
though by the parent's order, who should see it done; whereby the parent's authority will 
be preserved, and the child's aversion for the pain it suffers rather be turned on the person 
that immediately inflicts it. For I would have a father seldom strike his child, but upon 
very urgent necessity, and as the last remedy: and then perhaps it will be fit to do it so 
that the child should not quickly forget it. 




§ 84 But, as I said before, beating is the worst, and therefore the last, means to be used 
in the correction of children; and that only in cases of extremity, after all gentler ways 
have been tried, and proved unsuccessful: which, if well observed, there will be very 
seldom any need of blows. For, it not being to be imagined that a child will often, if ever, 
dispute his father's present command in any particular instance; and the father not 
rigorously interposing his absolute authority in positive rules, concerning childish or 
indifferent actions, wherein his son is to have his liberty: nor concerning his learning or 
improvement wherein there is no compulsion to be used, there remains only the 
prohibition of some vicious actions, wherein a child is capable of obstinacy, and 
consequently can deserve beating: and so there will be but very few occasions of that 
discipline to be used by any one, who considers well, and orders his child's education as 
it should be. For the first seven years, what vices can a child be guilty of, but lying, or 
some ill-natured tricks; the repeated, commission whereof, after his father's direct 
command against it, shall bring him into the condemnation of obstinacy, and the 
chastisement of the rod? If any vicious inclination in him be, in the first appearance and 
instances of it, treated as it should be, first with your wonder, and then, if returning again 
a second time, discountenanced with the severe brow of the father, tutor, and all about 
him, and a treatment suitable to the state of discredit before-mentioned, and this 
continued till he be made sensible and ashamed of his fault, I imagine there will be no 
need of any other correction, nor ever any occasion to come to blows. The necessity of 
such chastisement is usually the consequence only of former indulgencies or neglects. If 
vicious inclinations were watched from the beginning, and the first irregularities which 
they caused corrected by those gentler ways, we should seldom have to do with more 
than one disorder at once, which would be easily set right without any stir or noise, and 
not require so harsh a discipline as beating. Thus, one by one, as they appeared, they, 
might all be weeded out without any signs or memory that ever they had been there. But 
we letting their faults (by indulging and humouring our little ones) grow up till they are 
sturdy and numerous, and the deformity of them makes us ashamed and uneasy, we are 
fain to come to the plough and the harrow; the spade and the pick-ax must go deep to 
come at the roots, and all the force, skill, and diligence we can use, is scarce enough to 
cleanse the vitiated seed-plat overgrown with weeds, and restore us the hopes of fruits to 
reward our pains in its season. 

§ 85 This course, if observed, will spare both father and child the trouble of repeated 
injunctions, and multiplied rules of doing and forbearing. For I am of opinion, that of 
those actions which tend to vicious habits (which are those alone that a father should 
interpose his authority and commands in), none should be forbidden children till they are 
found guilty of them. For such untimely prohibitions, if they do nothing worse, do at least 
so much towards teaching and allowing them, that they suppose that children may be 
guilty of them, who would possibly be safer in the ignorance of any such faults. And the 
best remedy to stop them, is, as I have said, to show wonder and amazement at any such 
action as hath a vicious tendency, when it is first taken notice of in a child. For example, 
when he is first found in a lie, or any ill-natured trick, the first remedy should be, to talk 
to him of it as a strange, monstrous matter, that it could not be imagined he would have 
done; and so shame him out of it. 




§ 86 It will be ('tis like) objected, That whatever I fancy of the tractableness of children, 
and the prevalency of those softer ways of shame and commendation; yet there are many, 
who will never apply themselves to their books, and to what they ought to learn, unless 
they are scourged to it. This I fear is nothing but the language of ordinary schools and 
fashion, which have never suffered the other to be tried as it should be, in places where it 
could be taken notice of. Why, else, does the learning of Latin and Greek need the rod, 
when French and Italian needs it not? Children learn to dance and fence without 
whipping: nay, arithmetic, drawing, etc., they apply themselves well enough to, without 
beating: which would make one suspect that there is something strange, unnatural, and 
disagreeable to that age, in the things required in Grammar-Schools, or the methods used 
there, that children cannot be brought to, without the severity of the lash, and hardly with 
that too; or else that it is a mistake, that those tongues could not be taught them without 
beating. 

§ 87 But let us suppose some so negligent or idle, that they will not be brought to learn 
by the gentle ways proposed; for we must grant, that there will be children found of all 
tempers, yet it does not thence follow, that the rough discipline of the cudgel is to be used 
at all. Nor can any one be concluded unmanageable by the milder, methods of 
government, till they have been throughly tried upon him; and, if they will not prevail 
with him to use his endeavours, and do what is in his power to do, we make no excuse for 
the obstinate: blows are the proper remedies for those: but blows laid on in a way 
different from the ordinary. He that wilfully neglects his book, and stubbornly refuses 
any thing he can do, required of him by his father expressing himself in a positive serious 
command, should not be corrected with two or three angry lashes, for not performing his 
task, and the same punishment repeated again and again, upon every the like default. But, 
when it is brought to that pass, that wilfulness evidently shows itself and makes blows 
necessary, I think the chastisement should be a little more sedate, and a little more severe, 
and the whipping (mingled with admonitions between) so continued, till the impressions 
of it on the mind were found legible in the face, voice, and submission of the child, not so 
sensible of the smart as of the fault he has been guilty of, and melting in true sorrow 
under it. If such a correction as this, tried some few times at fit distances, and carried to 
the utmost severity, with the visible displeasure of the father all the while, will not work 
the effect, turn the mind, and produce a future compliance, what can be hoped from 
blows, and to what purpose should they be any more used? Beating, when you can expect 
no good from it will look more like the fury of an enraged enemy, than the good-will of a 
compassionate friend; and such chastisement carries with it only provocation without any 
prospect of amendment. If it be any father's misfortune to have a son thus perverse and 
untractable, I know not what more he can do but pray for him. But I imagine, if a right 
course be taken with children from the beginning, very few will be found to be such; and 
when there are any such instances, they are not to be the rule for the education of those 
who are better natured, and may be managed with better usage. 

§88 Tutor. — If a tutor can be got, that, thinking himself in the father's place, charged 
with his care, and relishing these things, will at the beginning apply himself to put them 
in practice, he will afterwards find his work very easy: and you will, I guess, have your 




son in a little time, a greater proficient in both learning and breeding, than perhaps you 
imagine. But let him by no means beat him, at any time, without your consent and 
direction. 

§ 89 He must be sure also to show him the example of the things he would have the 
child practise, and carefully preserve him from the influence of ill precedents, especially 
the most dangerous of all, that of the servants, from whose company he is to be kept, not 
by prohibitions, for that will but give him an itch, but by other ways I have mentioned. 

§ 90 Governor. — In all the whole business of education, there is nothing like to be less 
hearkened to, or harder to be well observed, than what I am now going to say; and that is, 
That I would from their first beginning to talk, have some discreet, sober, nay wise 
person about children, whose care it should be to fashion them aright, and keep them 
from all ill, especially the infection of bad company. I think this province requires great 
sobriety, temperance, tenderness, diligence, and discretion, qualities hardly to be found 
united in persons that are to be had for ordinary salaries, nor easily to be found any 
where. As to the charge of it, I think it will be the money best laid out that can be about 
our children; and therefore, though it may be expensive more than is ordinary, yet it 
cannot be thought dear. He that at any rate procures his child a good mind, well- 
principled, tempered to virtue and usefulness, and adorned with civility and good 
breeding, makes a better purchase for him, than if he laid out the money for an addition 
of more earth to his former acres. Spare it in toys and play-games, in silk and ribbons, 
laces and other useless expenses, as much as you please; but be not sparing in so 
necessary a part as this. 'Tis not good husbandry to make his fortune rich, and his mind 
poor. I have often, with great admiration, seen people lavish it profusely in tricking up 
their children in fine clothes, lodging and feeding them sumptuously, allowing them more 
than enough of useless servants, and yet at the same time starve their minds, and not take 
sufficient care to cover that, which is the most shameful nakedness, viz., their natural 
wrong inclinations and ignorance. This I can look on as no other than a sacrificing to 
their own vanity; it showing more their pride, than true care of the good of their children. 
Whatsoever you employ to the advantage of your son's mind, will show your true 
kindness, though it be, to the lessening of his estate. A wise and good man can hardly 
want either the opinion or reality of being great and happy. But he that is foolish or 
vicious, can be neither great nor happy, what estate soever you leave him: and I ask you, 
whether there be not men in the world, whom you had rather have your son be, with £500 
per annum, than some other you know, with £5,000? 

§91 The consideration of charge ought not, therefore, to deter those who are able: the 
great difficulty will be, where to find a proper person. For those of small age, parts, and 
virtue, are unfit for this employment: and those that have greater, will hardly be got to 
undertake such a charge. You must therefore look out early, and enquire everywhere; for 
the world has people of all sorts: and I remember, Montaigne says in one of his essays, 
that the learned Castalio was fain to make trenchers at Basle, to keep himself from 
starving, when his father would have given any money for such a tutor for his son, and 
Castalio have willingly embraced such an employment upon very reasonable terms: but 
this was for want of intelligence. 




§ 92 If you find it difficult to meet with such a tutor as we desire, you are not to 
wonder. I only can say, Spare no care nor cost to get such an one. All things are to be had 
that way: and I dare assure you, that, if you can get a good one, you will never repent the 
charge; but will always have the satisfaction to think it the money of all other the best 
laid out. But be sure take no body upon friends, or charitable, no, nor bare great 
commendations. Nor will the reputation of a sober man, with learning enough (which is 
all usually required in a tutor), serve the turn. In this choice be as curious, as you would 
in that of a wife for him: for you must not think of trial, or changing afterwards; that will 
cause great inconvenience to you, and greater to your son. When I consider the scruples 
and cautions I here lay in your way, methinks it looks as if I advised you to some thing, 
which I would have offered at, but in effect not done. But he that shall consider, how 
much the business of a tutor, rightly employed, lies out of the road, and how remote it is 
from the thoughts of many, even of those who propose to themselves this employment, 
will perhaps be of my mind, that one fit to educate and form the mind of a young 
gentleman, is not every where to be found; and that more than ordinary care is to be taken 
in the choice of him, or else you may fail of your end. 

§ 93 The character of a sober man and a scholar, is, as I have above observed, what 
every one expects in a tutor. This generally is thought enough, and is all that parents 
commonly look for: but when such a one has emptied out into his pupil all the latin and 
logic he has brought from the university, will that furniture make him a fine gentleman? 
Or, can it be expected that he should be better bred, better skilled in the world, better 
principled in the grounds and foundations of true virtue and generosity, than his young 
tutor is? 

To form a young gentleman as he should be, 'tis fit his governor should himself be well- 
bred, understanding the ways of carriage, and measures of civility in all the variety of 
persons, times and places, and keep his pupil; as much as his age requires, constantly to 
the observation of them. This is an art not to be learnt nor taught by books. Nothing can 
give it, but good company and observation, joined together. The taylor may make his 
clothes modish, and the dancing-master give fashion to his motions; yet neither of these, 
though they set off well, make a well-bred gentleman. No; though he have learning to 
boot, which, if not well managed, makes him more impertinent and intolerable in 
conversation. Breeding is that which sets a gloss upon all his other good qualities, and 
renders them useful to him, in procuring him the esteem and goodwill of all that he 
comes near. Without good breeding, his other accomplishments make him pass but for 
proud, conceited, vain, or foolish. 

Courage in an ill-bred man, has the air, and escapes not the opinion of brutality. Learning 
becomes pedantry; wit, buffoonry; plainness, rusticity; good nature, fawning. And there 
cannot be a good quality in him, which want of breeding will not warp, and, disfigure to 
his disadvantage. Nay, virtue and parts, though they are allowed their due commendation, 
yet are not enough to procure a man a good reception, and make him welcome wherever 
he comes. No body contents himself with rough diamonds, and wears them so, who 
would appear with advantage. When they are polished and set, then they give a lustre. 




Good qualities are the substantial riches of the mind, but 'tis good breeding sets them off: 
and he that will be acceptable, must give beauty, as well as strength to his actions. 
Solidity; or even usefulness, is not enough: a graceful way and fashion in every thing, is 
that which gives the ornament and liking. And in most cases, the manner of doing is of 
more consequence, than the thing done; and upon that depends the satisfaction or disgust 
wherewith it is received. This therefore, which lies not in the putting off the hat, nor 
making of compliments, but in a due and free composure of language, looks, motion, 
posture, place, &c. suited to persons and occasions, and can be learned only by habit and 
use, though it be above the capacity of children, and little ones should not be perplexed 
about it; yet it ought to be begun, and in a good measure learned by a young gentleman, 
whilst he is under a tutor, before he comes into the world upon his own legs: for then 
usually it is too late to hope to reform several habitual indecencies, which lie in little 
things. For the carriage is not as it should be, till it is become natural in every part, 
falling, as skilful musicians fingers do into harmonious order, without care, and without 
thought. If in conversation a man's mind be kept up with a solicitous watchfulness about 
any part of his behaviour, instead of being mended by it, it will be constrained, uneasy, 
and ungraceful. 

Besides, this part is most necessary to be formed by the hands and care of a governor; 
because, though the errors committed in breeding are the first that are taken notice of by 
others, yet they are the last that any one is told of: not but that the malice of the world is 
forward enough to tattle of them; but it is always out of his hearing, who should make 
profit of their judgment, and reform himself by their censure. And indeed, this is so nice a 
point to be meddled with, that even those who are friends, and with it were mended, 
scarce ever dare mention it, and tell those they love, that they are guilty in such or such 
cases of ill breeding. Errors in other things may often with civility be shown another; and 
'tis no breach of good manners or friendship, to let him right in other mistakes: but good 
breeding itself allows not a man to touch upon this, or to insinuate to another, that he is 
guilty of want of breeding. Such information can come only from those who have 
authority over them; and from them too it comes very hardly and harshly to a grown man; 
and however softened, goes but ill down with any one, who has lived ever so little in the 
world. Wherefore it is necessary, that this part should be the governor's principal case, 
that an habitual gracefulness and politeness in all his carriage, may be settled in his 
charge; as much as may be, before he goes out of his hands; and that he may not need 
advice in this point, when he has neither time nor disposition to receive it, nor has any 
body left to give it him. The tutor therefore ought, in the first place, to be well-bred: and a 
young gentleman, who gets this one qualification from his governor, lets out with great 
advantage, and will find, that this one accomplishment will more open his way to him, 
get him more friends, and carry him farther it the world, than all hard words, or real 
knowledge he has got from the liberal arts, or his tutors learned encyclopaedia. Not that 
those should be neglected, but by no means preferred, or suffered to thrust out the other. 

§ 94 Besides being well-bred, the tutor should know the world well: the ways, the 
humours, the follies, the cheats, the faults of the age he has fallen into, and particularly of 
the country he lives in. These he should be able to show to his pupil, as he finds him 
capable; teach him skill in men, and their manners; pull off the mask which their several 




callings and pretences cover them with, and make his pupil discern what lies at the 
bottom, under such appearances, that he may not, as unexperienced young men are apt to 
do, if they are unwarned, take one thing for another, judge by the outside, and give 
himself up to show, and the insinuation of a fair carriage, or an obliging application. A 
governor should teach his scholar to guess at, and beware of the designs of men he has to 
do with, neither with too much suspicion, nor too much confidence; but, as the young 
man is by nature most inclined to either side, rectify him, and bend him the other way. He 
should accustom him to make, as much as is possible, a true judgment of men by those 
marks which serve best to show what they are, and give a prospect into their inside; 
which often shows itself in little things, especially when they are not in parade, and upon 
their guard. He should acquaint him with the true state of the world, and dispose him to 
think no man better or worse, wiser or foolisher, than really he is. Thus, by safe and 
insensible degrees, he will pass from a boy to a man; which is the most hazardous step in 
all the whole course of life. This therefore should be carefully watched, and a young man 
with great diligence handed over it; and not, as now usually is done, be taken from a 
governor's conduct, and all at once thrown into the world under his own, not without 
manifest dangers of immediate spoiling; there being nothing more frequent, than 
instances of the great looseness, extravagancy and debauchery, which young men have 
run into, as soon as they have been let loose from a severe and strict education: which, I 
think, may be chiefly imputed to their wrong way of breeding, especially in this part; for 
having been bred up in a great ignorance of what the world truly is, and finding it quite 
another thing, when they come into it, than what they were taught it should be, and so 
imagined it was, are easily persuaded, by other kind of tutors, which they are sure to meet 
with, that the discipline they were kept under, and the lectures that were read to them, 
were but the formalities of education, and the restraints of childhood; that the freedom 
belonging to men, is to take their swing in a full enjoyment of what was before forbidden 
them. They show the young novice the world full of fashionable and glittering examples 
of this every where, and he is presently dazzled with them. My young master failing not 
to be willing to show himself a man, as much as any of the sparks of his years, lets 
himself loose to all the irregularities he finds in the most debauched; and thus courts 
credit and manliness; in the casting off the modesty and sobriety he has till then been kept 
in; and thinks it brave, at his first setting out, to signalize himself in running counter to 
the rules of virtue, which have been preached to him by his tutor. 

The showing him the world as really it is, before he comes wholly into it, is one of the 
best means, I think, to prevent this mischief. He should by degrees be informed of the 
vices in fashion, and warned of the applications and designs of those who will make it 
their business to corrupt him. He should be told the arts they use, and the trains they lay; 
and now and then have set before him the tragical or ridiculous examples of those who 
are ruining or ruined this way. The age is not like to want instances of this kind; which 
should be made land-marks to him, that by the disgraces, diseases, beggary, and shame of 
hopeful young men, thus brought to ruin, he may be precautioned, and be made see, how 
those join in the contempt and neglect of them that are undone, who, by pretences of 
friendship and respect, led them to it, and help to prey upon them whilst they were 
undoing: that he may see, before he buys it by a too dear experience, that those who 
persuade him not to follow the sober advices he has received from his governors, and the 




counsel of his own reason, which they call being governed by others, do it only, that they 
may have the government of him themselves; and make him believe, he goes like a man 
of himself, by his own conduct, and for his own pleasure, when in truth he is wholly as a 
child led by them into those vices which best serve their purposes. This is a knowledge, 
which, upon all occasions, a tutor should endeavour to instill, and by all methods try to 
make him comprehend, and thoroughly relish. 

I know it is often said, that to discover to a young man the vices of the age, is to teach 
them him. That, I confess, is a good deal so, according as it is done; and therefore 
requires a discreet man of parts, who knows the world, and can judge of the temper, 
inclination, and weak side of his pupil. This farther is to be remembered, that it is not 
possible now (as perhaps formerly it was) to keep a young gentleman from vice, by a 
total ignorance of it, unless you will all his life mue him up in a closet, and never let him 
go into company. The longer he is kept thus hood-winked, the less he will see when he 
comes abroad into open daylight and be the more exposed to be a prey to himself and 
others: and an old boy, at his first appearance, with all the gravity of his ivy-bush about 
him, is sure to draw on him the eyes and chirping of the whole town vollery; amongst 
which, there will not be wanting some birds of prey, that will presently be on the wing for 
him. 

The only fence against the world is a thorough knowledge of it, into which a young 
gentleman should be entered by degrees, as he can bear it; and the earlier the better, so he 
be in safe and skilful hands to guide him. The scene should be gently opened, and his 
entrance made step by step, and the dangers pointed out that attend him, from the several 
degrees, tempers, designs, and clubs of men. He should be prepared to be shocked by 
some, and caressed by others; warned who are like to oppose, who to mislead, who to 
undermine him, and who to serve him. He should be instructed how to know and 
distinguish them; where he should let them see, and when to dissemble the knowledge of 
them, and their aims and workings. And if he be too forward to venture upon his own 
strength and skill, the perplexity and trouble of a misadventure now and then, that reaches 
not his innocence, his health, or reputation, may not be an ill way to teach him more 
caution. 

This, I confess, containing one great part of wisdom, is not the product of some 
superficial thoughts, or much reading; but the effect of experience and observation in a 
man, who has lived in the world with his eyes open, and conversed with men of all sorts. 
And therefore I think it of most value to be instilled into a young man, upon all occasions 
which offer themselves, that, when he comes to launch into the deep himself, he may not 
be like one at sea without a line, compass, or sea-chart; but may have some notice 
beforehand of the rocks and shoals, the currents and quicksands, and know a little how to 
steer, that he sink not, before he get experience. He that thinks not this of more moment 
to his son, and for which he more needs a governor, than the languages and learned 
sciences, forgets of how much more use it is to judge right of men, and manage his affairs 
wisely with them, than to speak Greek and Latin, or argue in mood and figure; or to have 
his head filled with the abstruse speculations of natural philosophy, and metaphysics; 
nay, than to be well versed in Greek and Roman writers, though that be much better for a 




gentleman, than to be a good Peripatetic or Cartesian: because those ancient authors 
observed and painted mankind well, and give the best light into that kind of knowledge. 
He that goes into the eastern parts of Asia, will find able and acceptable men, without any 
of these: But without virtue, knowledge of the world, and civility, an accomplished and 
valuable man can be found nowhere. 

A great part of the learning now in fashion in the schools of Europe, and that goes 
ordinarily into the round of education, a gentleman may, in a good measure, be 
unfurnished with, without any great disparagement to himself, or prejudice to his affairs. 
But prudence and good breeding are, in all the stations and occurrences of life, necessary; 
and most young men suffer in the want of them; and come rawer, and more awkward, 
into the world, than they should, for this very reason; because these qualities, which are, 
of all other, the most necessary to be taught, and stand most in need of the assistance and 
help of a teacher, are generally neglected, and thought but a slight, or no part of a tutor’s 
business. Latin and learning make all the noise: and the main stress is laid upon his 
proficiency in things, a great part whereof belongs not to a gentleman's calling; which is, 
to have the knowledge of a man of business, a carriage suitable to his rank, and to be 
eminent and useful in his country, according to his station. Whenever either spare hours 
from that, or an inclination to perfect himself in some parts of knowledge, which his tutor 
did but just enter him in, set him upon any study; the first rudiments of it, which he 
learned before, will open the way enough for his own industry to carry him as far as his 
fancy will prompt, or his parts enable him to go: or, if he thinks it may save his time and 
pains, to be helped over some difficulties by the hand of a master, he may then take a 
man that is perfectly well skilled in it, or choose such an one as he thinks fittest for his 
purpose. But to initiate his pupil in any part of learning, as far as is necessary for a young 
man in the ordinary course of his studies, an ordinary skill in the governor is enough. Nor 
is it requisite that he should be a thorough scholar, or possess in perfection all those 
sciences, which it is convenient a young gentleman should have a taste of, in some 
general view, or short system. A gentleman, that would penetrate deeper, must do it by 
his own genius and industry afterwards; for nobody ever went far in knowledge, or 
became eminent in any of the sciences, by the discipline, and constraint of a master. 

The great work of a governor is to fashion the carriage, and form the mind; to settle in his 
pupil good habits, and the principles of virtue and wisdom; to give him, by little and 
little, a view of mankind; and work him into a love and imitation of what is excellent and 
praise-worthy; and in the prosecution of it, to give him vigour, activity, and industry. The 
studies which he sets him upon, are but as it were, the exercises of his faculties, and 
employment of his time, to keep him from sauntering and idleness, to teach him 
application, and accustom him to take pains, and to give him some little taste of what his 
own industry must perfect. For who expects, that under a tutor a young gentleman should 
be an accomplished critic, orator, or logician; go to the bottom of metaphysics, natural 
philosophy, or mathematics; or be a master in history or chronology? Though something 
of each of these is to be taught him: but it is only to open the door, that he may look in, 
and, as it were, begin, an acquaintance, but not to dwell there: and a governor (would be 
much blamed, that should keep his pupil too long, and lead him too far in most of them. 
But of good breeding, knowledge of the world, virtue, industry, and he have these, he will 




not long want what he needs or a love of reputation, he cannot have too much: and if he 
have these, he will not long want what he needs or desires of the other. 

And since it cannot be hoped, he should have time and strength to learn all things, most 
pains should be taken about that which is most necessary; and that principally looked 
after, which will be of most and frequentest use to him in the world. 

Seneca complains of the contrary practice in his time; and yet the Burgersdiciuses and the 
Scheiblers did not swarm in those days, as they do now in these. What would he have 
thought, if he had lived now, when the tutors think it their great business to fill the studies 
and heads of their pupils with such authors as these? He would have had much more 
reason to say, as he does, "Non vitae, sed scholae discimus," we learn not to live, but to 
dispute, and our education fits us rather for the university than the world. But it is no 
wonder, if those who make the fashion suit it to what they have, and not to what their 
pupils want. The fashion being once established, who can think it strange, that in this, as 
well as in all other things, it should prevail; and that the greatest part of those, who find 
their account in an easy submission to it, should be ready to cry out heresy, when anyone 
departs from it? It is nevertheless matter of astonishment, that men of quality and parts 
should suffer themselves to be so far misled by custom and implicit faith. Reason, if 
consulted with, would advise that their children's time should be spent in acquiring what 
might be useful to them, when they come to be men, rather than to have their heads 
stuffed with a deal of trash, a great part whereof they usually never do (it is certain they 
never need to) think on again as long as they live; and so much of it, as does stick by 
them, they are only the worse for. This is so well known that I, appeal to parents 
themselves, who have been at cost to have their young heirs taught it, whether it be not 
ridiculous for their sons to have any tincture of that sort of learning, when they come 
abroad into the world: whether any appearance of it would not lessen and disgrace them 
in company. And that certainly must be an admirable acquisition, and deserves well to 
make a part in education, which men are ashamed of, where they are most concerned to 
show their parts and breeding. 

There is yet another reason why politeness of manners and knowledge of the world 
should principally be looked after in a tutor: and that is, because a man of parts and years 
may enter a lad far enough in any of those sciences which he has no deep insight into 
himself. Books in these will be able to furnish him, and give him light and precedency 
enough, to go before a young follower; but he will never be able to set another right in 
the knowledge of the world, and above alt in breeding, who is a novice in them himself. 

This is a knowledge he must have about him, worn into him by use and conversation, and 
a long forming himself by what he has observed to be practised and allowed in the best 
company. This, if he has it not of his own, is no where to be borrowed, for the use of his 
pupil; or if he could find pertinent treatises of it in books, that would reach all the 
particulars of an English gentleman's behaviour, his own ill-fashioned example, if he be 
not well-bred himself would spoil all his lectures; it being impossible, that any one 
should come forth well-fashioned out of unpolished, ill-bred company. 




I say this, not that I think such a tutor is every day to be met with, or to be had at the 
ordinary rates: but that those, who are able, may not be sparing of inquiry or cost, in what 
is of so great moment; and that other parents, whose estates will not reach to greater 
salaries, may yet remember what they should principally have an eye to in the choice of 
one to whom they would commit the education of their children; and what part they 
should chiefly look after themselves, whilst they are under their care, and as often as they 
come within their observation; and not think that all lies in Latin and French, or some dry 
systems of logic and philosophy. 

§ 95 Familiarity. — But to return to our method again. Though I have mentioned the 
severity of the father's brow, and the awe settled thereby in the mind of children when 
young, as one main foundation whereby their education is to be managed; yet I am far 
from being of an opinion that it should be continued all along to them, whilst they are 
under the discipline and government of pupilage. I think it should be relaxed, as fast as 
their age, discretion, and good behaviour could allow it; even to that degree, that a father 
will do well, as his son grows up and is capable of it, to talk familiarly with him; nay, ask 
his advice and consult with him about those things wherein he has any knowledge or 
understanding. By this the father will gain two things, both of great moment. The one is, 
that it will put serious considerations into his son's thoughts, better than any rules or 
advices he can give him. The sooner you treat him as a man, the sooner he will begin to 
be one: and if you admit him into serious discourses sometimes with you, you will 
insensibly raise his mind above the usual amusements of youth, and those trifling 
occupations which it is commonly wasted in. For it is easy to observe, that many young 
men continue longer in the thought and conversation of school-boys, than otherwise they 
would, because their parents keep them at that, distance, and in that low rank, by all their 
carriage to them. 



§ 96 Another thing of greater consequence, which you will obtain by such a way of 
treating him, will be his friendship. Many fathers, though they proportion to their sons 
liberal allowances, according to their age and condition; yet they keep them as much 
unacquainted with their estates and all other concernments as if they were strangers. This 
if it looks not like jealousy, yet it wants those marks of kindness and intimacy, which a 
father should show to his son; and, no doubt, often hinders or abates that cheerfulness and 
satisfaction, wherewith a son should address himself to, and rely upon, his father. And I 
cannot but often wonder to see fathers, who love their sons very well, yet so order the 
matter, by a constant stiffness, and a mien of authority and distance to them all their lives, 
as if they were never to enjoy or have any comfort from those they love best in the 
World, till they had lost them by being removed into another. Nothing cements and 
establishes friendship and good-will, so much as confident communication of 
concernments and affairs. Other kindnesses without this, leave still some doubts; but 
when your son sees you open your mind to him, that you interest him in your affairs, as 
things you are willing should in their turn come into his hands, he will be concerned for 
them as for his own; wait his season with patience, and love you in the meantime, who 
keep him not at the distance of a stranger. This will also make him see, that the 
enjoyment you have is not without care; which the more he is sensible of, the less will he 




envy you the possession, and the more think himself happy under the management of so 
favourable a friend, and so careful a father. There is scarce any young man of so little 
thought, or so void of sense, that would not be glad of a sure friend, that he might have 
recourse to, and freely consult on occasion. The reservedness and distance that fathers 
keep, often deprives their sons of that refuge, which would be of more advantage to them 
than an hundred rebukes and chidings. Would your son engage in some frolic, or take a 
vagary, were it not much better he should do it with, than without your knowledge? For 
since allowances for such things must be made to young men, the more you know of his 
intrigues and designs, the better will you be able to prevent great mischiefs; and, by 
letting him see what is like to follow, take the right way of prevailing with him to avoid 
less inconveniences. Would you have him open his heart to you, and ask your advice? 
You must begin to do so with him first and by your carriage beget that confidence. 



§ 97 But whatever he consults you about, unless it lead to some fatal and irremediable 
mischief, be sure you advise only as a friend of more experience; but with your advice 
mingle nothing of command or authority, no more than you would to your equal or a 
stranger. That would be to drive him for ever from any farther demanding, or receiving 
advantage from your counsel. You must consider, that he is a young man, and has 
pleasures and fancies, which you are past. You must not expect his inclinations should be 
just as yours, nor that at twenty he should have the same thoughts you have at fifty. All 
that you can wish is, that since youth must have some liberty, some out-leaps, they might 
be with the ingenuity of a son, and under the eye of a father, and then no very great harm 
can come of it. The way to obtain this, as I said before, is (according as you find him 
capable) to talk with him about your affairs, propose matters to him familiarly, and ask 
his advice; and when he ever lights on the right follow it as his, and if it succeeds well, let 
him have the commendation. This will not at all lessen your authority, but increase his 
love and esteem of you. Whilst you keep your estate, the staff will still be in your own 
hands; and your authority the surer, the more it is strengthened with confidence and 
kindness. For you have not that power you ought to have over him, till he comes to be 
more afraid of offending so good a friend, than of losing some part of his future 
expectation. 



§ 98 Familiarity of discourse, if it can become a father to his son, may much more be 
condescended to by a tutor to his pupil. All their time together should not be spent in 
reading of lectures, and magisterially dictating to him, what he is to observe and follow. 
Hearing him in his turn, and using him to reason about what is proposed, will make the 
rule go down the easier, and sink the deeper, and will give him a liking to study and 
instruction: and he will then begin to value knowledge, when he sees that it enables him 
to discourse, and he finds the pleasure and credit of bearing a part in the conversation; 
and of having his reasons sometimes approved, and hearkened to; particularly in 
morality; prudence, and breeding, cases should be put to him, and his judgment asked. 
This opens the understanding better than maxims, how well soever explained, and settles 
the rules better in the memory for practice. This way lets things into the mind, which 
stick there, and retain their evidence with them; whereas words at best are faint 




representations, being not so much as the true shadows of things; and are much sooner 
forgotten. He will better comprehend the foundations and measures of decency and 
justice, and have livelier and more lasting impressions of what he ought to do, by giving 
his opinion on cases proposed, and reasoning with his tutor on fit instances, than by 
giving a silent, negligent, sleepy audience to his tutor's lectures; and much more than by 
captious logical disputes, or set declamations of his own, upon any question. The one sets 
the thoughts upon wit and false colours, and not upon truth; the other, teaches fallacy, 
wrangling, and opiniatry; and they are both of them things that spoil the judgment, and 
put a man out of the way of right and fair reasoning; and therefore carefully to be avoided 
by one who would approve himself, and be acceptable to others. 

§ 99 Reverence. — When, by making your son sensible that he depends on you, and is 
in your power, you have established your authority; and by being inflexibly severe in 
your carriage to him, when obstinately persisting in any ill-natured trick which you have 
forbidden, especially lying, you have imprinted on his mind that awe which is necessary; 
and on the other side, when (by permitting him the full liberty due to his age, and laying 
no restraint in your presence to those childish actions, and gaiety of carriage, which, 
whilst he is very young, is as necessary to him as meat or sleep) you have reconciled him 
to your company, and made him sensible of your care and love of him by indulgence and 
tenderness, especially caressing him on all occasions wherein he does any thing well, and 
being kind to him after a thousand fashions, suitable to his age, which nature teaches 
parents better than I can: when, I say, by these ways of tenderness and affection, which 
parents never want for their children, you have also planted in him a particular affection 
for you, he is then in the state you could desire, and you have formed in his mind that true 
reverence, which is always afterwards carefully to be increased and maintained in both 
parts of it, love and fear, as the great principles whereby you will always have hold upon 
him to turn his mind to the ways of virtue and honour. 

§ 100 Temper. — When this foundation is once well laid, and you find this reverence 
begin to work in him, the next thing to be done, is carefully to consider his 
temper [ament], and the particular constitution of his mind. Stubbornness, lying, and ill- 
natured actions, are not (as has been said) to be permitted in him from the beginning, 
whatever his temper be: those seeds of vices, are not to be suffered to take any root but 
must be suppressed in their appearance; and your authority is to be established from the 
very dawning of any knowledge in him, that it may operate as a natural principle, 
whereof he never perceived the beginning, never knew what it was, or could be 
otherwise. By this, if the reverence he owes you be established early, it will always be 
sacred to him, and it will be as hard for him to resist it as the principles of his nature. 

§ 101 Having thus very early established your authority, and, by the gentler 
applications of it, shamed him out of what leads towards any immoral habit; as soon as 
you have observed it in him (for I would by no means have chiding used, much less 
blows, till obstinacy and incorrigibleness make it absolutely necessary), it will be fit to 
consider which way the natural make of his mind inclines him. Some men, by the 
unalterable frame of their constitutions, are stout, others timorous; some confident others 
modest, tractable or obstinate, curious or careless. There are not more differences in 




men's faces, and the outward lineaments of their bodies, than there are in the makes and 
tempers of their minds; only there is this difference, that the distinguishing characters of 
the face; and the lineaments of the body, grow more plain and visible with time and age 
but the peculiar physiognomy of the mind is most discernible in children; before art and 
cunning have taught them to hide their deformities, and conceal their ill inclinations 
under a dissembled outside. 

§102 Begin therefore betimes nicely to observe your son's temper, and that, when he is 
under least restraint. See what are his predominant passions and prevailing inclinations; 
whether he be fierce or mild, bold or bashful, compassionate or cruel, open or reserved, 
etc. For as these are different in him, so are your methods to be different, and your 
authority must hence take measures to apply it self [in] different ways to him. These 
native propensities, these prevalences of constitution, are not to be cured by rules, or a 
direct contest, especially those of them that are the humbler and meaner sort, which 
proceed from fear and lowness of spirit; though with art they may be much mended, and 
turned to good purposes. But of this be sure, after all is done, the bias will always hang 
on that side that nature first placed it: and, if you carefully observe the characters of his 
mind now in the first scenes of his life, you will ever after be able to judge which way his 
thoughts lean, and what he aims at even hereafter, when, as he grows up, the plot 
thickens, and he puts on several shapes to act it. 

§103 Dominion. — I told you before, that children love liberty, and therefore they 
should be brought to do the things that are fit for them, without feeling any restraint laid 
upon them. I now tell you, they love something more; and that is dominion: and this is 
the first original of most vicious habits, that are ordinary and natural. This love of power 
and dominion shews itself very early, and that in these two things. 

§104 We see children (as soon almost as they are born, I am sure long before they can 
speak) cry, grow peevish, sullen, and out of humour, for nothing but to have their wills. 
They would have their desires submitted to by others; they contend for a ready 
compliance from all about them, especially from those that stand near or beneath them in 
age or degree, as soon as they come to consider others with those distinctions. 

§105 Another thing, wherein they show their love of dominion, is their desire to have 
things to be theirs; they would have propriety and possession, pleasing themselves with 
the power [which] that seems to give, and the right they thereby have to dispose of them 
as they please. He that has not observed these two humours working very betimes in 
children, has taken little notice of their actions: and he that thinks that these two roots of 
almost all the injustice and contention that so disturb human life, are not early to be 
weeded out, and contrary habits introduced, neglects the proper season to lay the 
foundations of a good and worthy man. To do this, I imagine, these following things may 
somewhat conduce. 

§106 1. Craving. — That a child should never be suffered to have what he craves, or so 

much as speaks for, much less if he cries for it. What then, would you not have them 
declare their wants? Yes, that is very fit; and 'tis as fit that with all tenderness they should 




be hearkened to, and supplied, at least whilst they are very little. But 'tis one thing to say, 

I am hungry; another to say, I would have roast-meat. Having declared their wants, their 
natural wants, the pain they feel from hunger, thirst, cold, or any other necessity of 
nature, 'tis the duty of their parents, and those about them, to relieve them: but children 
must leave it to the choice and ordering of their parents what they think properest for 
them, and how much; and must not be permitted to choose for themselves, and say, I 
would have wine, or white-bread; the very naming of it should make them lose it. 

§107 This is for natural wants which must be relieved; but for all wants of fancy and 
affectation, they should never, if once declared, be hearkened to, or complied with. By 
this means they will be brought to get mastery over their inclinations, and learn the art of 
stifling their desires as soon as they rise up in them, and before they take vent, when they 
are easiest to be subdued, which will be of great use to them in the future course of their 
lives. By this I do not mean that they should not have the things that one perceives would 
delight them; 'twould be inhumanity and not prudence to treat them so. But they should 
not have the liberty to carve or crave anything to themselves; they should be exercised in 
keeping their desires under, till they have got the habit of it, and it be grown easy; they 
should accustom themselves to be content in the want of what they wished for; and the 
more they practised modesty and temperance in this, the more should those about them 
study to reward them with what is suited and acceptable to them; which should be 
bestowed on them, as if it were a natural consequence of their good behaviour; and not a 
bargain about it. But you will lose your labour, and what is more, their love and 
reverence too, if they can receive from others what you deny them. This is to be kept very 
stanch, and carefully to be watched. And here the servants come again in my way. 

§108 Curiosity. — If this be begun betimes, and they accustom themselves early to 
silence their desires, this useful habit will settle in them; and, as they come to grow up in 
age and discretion, they may be allowed greater liberty; when reason comes to speak in 
them, and not passion. For whenever reason would speak, it should be hearkened to. But, 
as they should never be heard, when they speak for any thing they would have, unless it 
be first proposed to them; so they should always he heard, and fairly and kindly 
answered, when they ask after anything they would know, and desire to be informed 
about. Curiosity should be as carefully cherished in children, as other appetites 
suppressed. 

§ 109 2. Complaints. — Children, who live together, often strive for mastery, whose 

wills shall carry it over the rent; whoever begins the contest, should be sure to be crossed 
in it. But not only that, but they should be taught to have all the deference, complaisance 
and civility one for the other imaginable. This, when they see it procures them respect 
and that they lose no superiority by it but on the contrary, they grow into love and esteem 
with every body, they will take more pleasure in, than in insolent domineering; for so 
plainly is the other. 

The complaints of children once against another, which is usually but the desiring the 
assistance of another to revenge them, should not be favourably received, nor hearkened 
to. It weakens and effeminates their minds to suffer them to complain: and if they endure 




sometimes crossing or pain from others, without being permitted to think it strange or 
intolerable, it will do them no harm to learn sufferance, and harden them early. But, 
though you give no countenance to the complaints of the querulous, yet take care to 
suppress all insolence and ill-nature. When you observe it yourself, reprove it before the 
injured party: but if the complaint be of something really worth your notice and 
prevention another time, then reprove the offender by himself alone, out of sight of him 
that complained, and make him go and ask pardon, and make reparation. Which coming 
thus, as it. were, from himself, will be the more cheerfully performed, and more kindly 
received, the love strengthened between them, and a custom of civility grow familiar 
amongst your children. 

§110 3. Liberality. — As to the having and possessing of things, teach them to part 

with what they have easily and freely to their friends; and let them find by experience, 
that the most liberal has always most plenty, with esteem and commendation to boot, and 
they will quickly learn to practise it. This, I imagine, will make brothers and sisters 
kinder and civiller to one another and consequently to others, than twenty rules about 
good manners, with which children are ordinarily perplexed and cumbered. 

Covetousness, and the desire of having in our possession, and under our dominion, more 
than we have need of, being the root of all evil, should be early and carefully weeded out; 
and the contrary quality, of a readiness to impart to others, implanted. This should be 
encouraged by great commendation and credit, and constantly taking care, that he loses 
nothing by his liberality. Let all the instances he gives of such freeness be always repaid, 
and with interest; and let him sensibly perceive, that the kindness he shows to others is no 
ill husbandry for himself; but that it brings a return of kindness, both from those that 
receive it, and those who look on. Make this a contest among children, who shall out-do 
one another this way. And by this means, by a constant practice, children having made it 
easy to themselves to part with what they have, good-nature may be settled in them into 
an habit, and they may take pleasure, and pique themselves in being kind, liberal, and 
civil to others. 

§ 1 1 1 Crying. — Crying is a fault that should not be tolerated in children; not only for 
the unpleasant and unbecoming noise it fills the house with, but for more considerable 
reasons, in reference to the children themselves, which is to be our aim in education. 

Their crying is of two sorts; either stubborn and domineering, or querulous and whining. 

1 . Their crying is very often a contention for mastery, and an open declaration of their 
insolence or obstinacy; when they have not the power to obtain their desire, they will, by 
their clamour and sobbing, maintain their title and right to it. This is open justifying 
themselves, and a sort of remonstrance of the unjustness of the oppression which denies 
them what they have a mind to. 



§112 2. Sometimes their crying is the effect of pain or true sorrow, and a bemoaning 

themselves under it. 




These two; if carefully observed, may, by the mien, looks, and actions, and particularly 
by the tone of their crying, be easily distinguished; but neither of them must be suffered, 
much less encouraged. 

1. The obstinate or stomachful crying should by no means be permitted; because it is but 
another way of flattering their desires, and encouraging those passions, which 'tis our 
main business to subdue: and if it be, as often it is, upon the receiving any correction, it 
quite defeats all the good effects of it; for any chastisement, which leaves them in this 
declared opposition, only serves to make them worse. The restraints and punishments laid 
on children are all misapplied and lost, as far as they do not prevail over their wills, teach 
them to submit their passions, and make their minds supple and pliant to what their 
parent's reason advises them now, and so prepare them to obey what their own reason 
shall advise hereafter. But if, in anything wherein they are crossed, they may be suffered 
to go away crying, they confirm themselves in their desires, and cherish the ill humour, 
with a declaration of their right, and a resolution to satisfy their inclination the first 
opportunity. This therefore is another reason why you should seldom chastise your 
children: for, whenever you come to that extremity, 'tis not enough to whip or beat them; 
you must do it till you find you have subdued their minds; till with submission and 
patience they yield to the correction; which you shall best discover by their crying, and 
their ceasing from it upon your bidding. Without this, the beating of children is but a 
passionate tyranny over them: and it is mere cruelty, and not correction, to put their 
bodies in pain, without doing their minds any good. As this gives us a reason why 
children should seldom be corrected, so it also prevents their being so. For if, whenever 
they are chastised, it were done thus without passion, soberly and yet effectually too, 
laying on the blows and smart, not all at once, but slowly, with reasoning between, and 
with observation how it wrought, stopping when it had made them pliant, penitent and 
yielding; they would seldom need the like punishment again, being made careful to avoid 
the fault that deserved it. Besides, by this means, as the punishment would not be lost, for 
being too little, and not effectual so it would be kept from being too much, if we gave off 
as soon as we perceived that it reached the mind, and that was bettered. For since the 
chiding or beating of children should be always the least that possibly may be, that which 
is laid on in the heat of anger, seldom observes that measure, but is commonly more than 
it should be, though it prove less than enough. 

§113 2. Many children are apt to cry, upon any little pain they suffer; and the least 

harm that befalls them, ruts them into complaints and bawling. This few children avoid: 
for it being the first and natural way to declare their sufferings or wants, before they can 
speak, the compassion that is thought due to that tender age, foolishly encourages, and 
continues it in them long after they can speak. 'Tis the duty, I confess, of those about 
children, to compassionate them, whenever they suffer any hurt; but not to show it in 
pitying them. Help and ease them the best, you can, but by no means bemoan them. This 
softens their minds, and makes the little harms that happen to them sink deep into that 
part which alone feels, and make larger wounds there, than: otherwise they would. They 
should be hardened against all sufferings, especially of the body, and have a tenderness 
only of shame and for reputation. The many inconveniences this life is exposed to, 
require we should not be too sensible of every little hurt. What our minds yield not to, 




makes but a slight impression, and does us but. very little harm; 'tis the suffering of our 
spirits that gives and continues the pain. This brawniness and insensibility of mind, is the 
best armour we can have against the common evils and accidents of life; and being a 
temper that is to be got by exercise and custom, mote than any other way, the practice of 
it should be begun betimes, and happy is he that is taught it early. That effeminacy of 
spirit, which is to be prevented or cured, as nothing, that I know, so much increases in 
children as crying; so nothing, on the other side, so much checks and restrains, as their 
being hindered from that sort of complaining. In the little harms they suffer, from knocks 
and falls, they should not be pitied for falling, but bid do so again; which is a better way 
to cure their falling than either chiding or bemoaning them. But, let the hurts they receive 
be what they will, stop their crying, and that will give them more quiet and ease at 
present, and harden them for the future. 

§ 1 14 The former sort of crying requires severity to silence it; and where a look, or a 
positive command, will not do it, blows must. For it proceeding from pride, obstinacy and 
wilfulness, the will, where the fault lies, mnst be tent and made to comply, by a rigour 
sufficient to, subdue it: but this latter, being ordinarily from softness of mind, a quite 
contrary cause, ought to be treated with a gentler hand. Persuasion, or diverting the 
thoughts another way, or laughing at their whining, may perhaps be at first the proper 
method. But for this, the circumstances of the thing, and the particular temper of the 
child, must be considered: no certain unvariable rules can be given about it; but it must be 
left to the prudence of the parents or tutor. But this I think I may say in general, that there 
should be a constant discountenancing of this sort of crying also; and that the father, by 
his looks, words, and authority; should always stop it, mixing a greater degree of 
roughness in his looks or words, proportionably as the child is of a greater age, or a 
sturdier temper; but always let it be enough to master the disorder. 

§115 Fool-hardiness. — Cowardice and courage are so nearly related to the fore- 
mentioned tempers, that it may not be amiss here to take notice of them. Fear is a passion, 
that, if rightly governed, has its use. And though self-love seldom fails to keep it watchful 
and high enough in us, yet there may be an excess on the daring side. Fool-hardiness and 
insensibility of danger, being as little reasonable, as trembling and shrinking at the 
approach of every little evil. Fear was given us as a monitor to quicken our industry, and 
keep us upon our guard against the approaches of evil; and therefore to have no 
apprehension of mischief at hand, not to mistake a just estimate of the danger, but 
heedlessly to run into it, be the hazard what it will, without considering of what use or 
consequence it may be, is not the resolution of a rational creature, but brutish fury, those 
who have children of this temper have nothing to do but a little to awaken their reason, 
which self-preservation will quickly dispose them to hearken to, unless (which is usually 
the case) some other passion hurries them on head-long, without sense, and without 
consideration. A dislike of evil is so natural to mankind, that no body, I think, can be 
without fear of it; fear being nothing but an uneasiness under the apprehension of that 
coming upon us, which we dislike: and therefore, when ever any one runs into danger, we 
may say, 'tis under the conduct of ignorance, or the command of some more imperious 
passion; no body being so much an enemy to himself, as to come within the reach of evil, 
out of free choice, and court danger for danger's sake. If it be therefore pride, vainglory, 




or rage, that silences a child's fear, or makes him not hearken to its advice, those are by fit 
means to be abated, that a little consideration may allay his heat, and make him bethink 
himself, whether this attempt be worth the venture. But this being a fault that children are 
not so often guilty of, I shall not be more particular in its cure. Weakness of spirit is the 
more common defect, and therefore will require the greater care. 

Fortitude. — Fortitude is the guard and support of the other virtues; and without courage a 
man will scarce keep steady to his duty, and fill up the character of a truly worthy man. 

Courage. — Courage, that makes us bear up against dangers that we fear, and evils that 
we feel, is of great use in an estate, as ours is in this life, exposed to assaults on all hands: 
and therefore it is very adviseable to get children into this armour as early as you can. 
Natural temper, I confess, does here a great deal: but even where that is defective, and the 
heart is in itself weak and timorous, it may, by a tight management, be brought to a better 
resolution. What is to be done, to prevent breaking children's spirits by frightful 
apprehensions instilled into them when young, or bemoaning themselves under every 
little suffering, I have already taken notice: how to harden their tempers; and raise their 
courage, if we find them too much subject to fear, is farther to be considered. 

True fortitude, I take to be the quiet possession of a man's self, and an undisturbed doing 
his duty, whatever evil besets, or danger lies in his way. This there are so few men attain 
to, that we are not to expect it from children. But yet something may be done: and a wise 
conduct by insensible degrees may carry them farther than one expects. 

The neglect of this great care of them, whilst they are young, is the reason, perhaps, why 
there are so few that have this virtue in its full latitude, when they are men. I should not 
say this in a nation so naturally brave, as ours is, did I think that true fortitude required 
nothing but courage in the field, and a contempt of life in the face of an enemy. This, I 
confess, is not the least part of it, nor can be denied the laurels and honours always justly 
due to the valour of those who venture their lives for their country. But yet this is not all. 
Dangers attack us in other places, besides the field of battle: and though death be the king 
of terrors; yet pain, disgrace and poverty, have frightful looks, able to discompose most 
men, whom they seem ready to seize on: and there are those who condemn some of these, 
and yet are heartily frighted with the other. True fortitude is prepared for dangers of all 
kinds; and unmoved, whatsoever evil it be that threatens. I do not mean unmoved with 
any fear at all. Where danger shows itself, apprehension cannot, without stupidity, be 
wanting: where danger is, sense of danger should be; and so much fear as should keep us 
awake, and excite our attention, industry and vigour; but not disturb the calm use of our 
reason, nor hinder the execution of what that dictates. 

Cowardice . — The first step to get this noble and manly steadiness, is, what I have above- 
mentioned, carefully to keep children, from frights of all kinds, when they are young. Let 
not any fearful apprehension be talked into them, nor terrible objects surprise them. This 
often so shatters and discomposes the spirits, that they never recover it again; but during 
their whole life, upon the first suggestion, or appearance of any terrifying idea, are 
scattered and confounded; the body is enervated, and the mind disturbed, and the man 




scarce himself, or capable of any composed or rational action. Whether this be from an 
habitual motion of the animal spirits, introduced by the first strong impression, or from 
the alteration of the constitution by some more unaccountable way; this is certain, that so 
it is. Instances of such who, in a weak timorous mind, have born, all their whole lives 
through, the effects of a fright when they are young, are every where to be seen, and 
therefore as much as may be to be prevented. 

The next thing is, by gentle degrees to accustom children to those things they are too 
much afraid of. But here great caution is to be used, that you do not make too much haste, 
nor attempt this cure too early, for fear lest you increase the mischief instead of 
remedying it. Little ones in arms may be easily kept out of the way of terrifying objects 
and till they can talk, and understand what is said to them, are scarce capable of that 
reasoning and discourse, which should be used, to let them know there is no harm in 
those frightful objects, which we would make them familiar with, and do, to that purpose, 
by gentle degrees bring nearer and bearer to them. And therefore 'tis seldom there is need 
of any application to them of this kind, till after they can run about and talk. But yet, if it 
should happen that infants should have taken offence at any thing which cannot be easily 
kept out of their way, and that they show marks of terror as often as it comes in sight; all 
the allays of fright, by diverting their thoughts, or mixing pleasant and agreeable 
appearances with it, must be used till it be grown familiar and inoffensive to them. 

I think we may observe, that, when children are first born, all objects of sight, that do not 
hurt the eyes, are indifferent to them; and they are no more afraid of a blackamoor or a 
lion, than of their nurse, or a cat. what is it then, that afterwards, in certain mixtures of 
shape and colour, comes to affright them? Nothing but the apprehensions of harm that 
accompanies those things. Did a child suck every day a new nurse, I make account it 
would be no more affrighted with the change of faces at fix months old, than at sixty. The 
reason then why it will not come to a stranger, is, because having been accustomed to 
receive its food and kind usage only from one or two, that are about it, the child 
apprehends, by coming into the arms of a stranger, the being taken from what delights 
and feeds it, and every moment supplies its wants, which it often feels, and therefore 
fears when the nurse is away. 

Timorousness . — The only thing we naturally are afraid of is pain, or loss of pleasure. 
And because these are not annexed to any shape, colour, or size of visible objects, we are 
frighted with none of them, till either we have felt pain from them, or have notions put 
into us that they will do us harm. The pleasant brightness and lustre of flame and fire so 
delights children, that at first they always desire to be handling of it: but when, constant 
experience has convinced them, by the exquisite pains it has put them to, how cruel and 
unmerciful it is, they are afraid to touch it, and carefully avoid it. This being the ground 
of fear, 'tis not hard to find whence it arises, and how it is to be cured in all mistaken 
objects of terror. And when the mind is confirmed against them, and has got a.mastery 
over itself, and its usual fears, in lighter occasions, it is in good preparation to meet more 
real dangers. Your child shrieks, and runs away at the sight of a frog; let another catch it, 
and lay it down at a good distance from him: at first accustom him to look upon it; when 
he can do that, then to come nearer to it, and see it leap, without emotion; then to touch it 




lightly, when it is held fast in another's hand and so on, till he can come to handle it as 
confidently as a butterfly, or a sparrow. By the same way any other vain terrors may be 
removed; if care be taken, that you go not too fast, and push not the child on to a new 
degree of assurance, till he be throughly confirmed in the former. And thus the young 
soldier is to be trained on to the warfare of life; wherein care is to be taken, that more 
things be not represented as dangerous, than really are so; and then, that whatever you 
observe him to be more frighted at than he should, you be sure to toll him on to by 
insensible degrees, till he at last, quitting his fears, masters the difficulty, an comes off 
with applause. Successes of this kind, often repeated, will make him find, that evils are 
not always so certain, or so great, as our fears represent them; and that the way to avoid 
them, is not to run away, or be discomposed, dejected and deterred by fear, where either 
our credit or duty requires us to go on. 

Hardiness . — But since the great foundation of fear in children is pain, the way to harden 
and fortify children against fear and danger is, to accustom them to suffer pain. This, 'tis 
possible, will be thought, by kind parents, a very unnatural thing towards their children; 
and by most, unreasonable, to endeavour to reconcile any one to the sense of pain, by 
bringing it upon him. 'Twill be said, it may perhaps give the child an aversion for him 
that makes him suffer; but can never recommend to him suffering itself. This is a strange 
method. You will not have children whipped and punished for their faults, but you would 
have them tormented for doing well, or for tormenting sake. I doubt not but such 
objections as these will be made, and I shall be thought inconsistent with myself, or 
fantastical, in proposing it. I confess, it is a thing to be managed with great discretion; 
and therefore it falls not out amiss, that it will not be received or relished, but by those 
who confider well, and look into the reason of things. I would not have children much 
beaten for their faults, because I would not have them think bodily pain the greatest 
punishment: and I would have them, when they do well, be sometimes put in pain, for the 
same reason, that they might be accustomed to bear it, without looking on it as the 
greatest evil. How much education may reconcile young people to pain and sufferance, 
the examples of sparta do sufficiently show: and they who have once brought themselves 
not to think bodily pain the greater of evils, or that which they ought to hand most in fear 
of, have made no small advance towards virtue. But I am not so foolish to propose the 
lacedaernonian discipline in our age, or constitution. But yet I do say, that inuring 
children gently to suffer some degrees of pain without shrinking, is a way to gain 
firmness to their minds, and lay a foundation for courage and resolution in the future part 
of their lives. 

Not to bemoan them, or permit them to bemoan themselves, of every little pain they 
suffer, is the first step to be made. But of this I have spoken elsewhere. 

The next thing is, sometimes designedly to put them in pain: but care must be taken that 
this be done when the child is in good humour, and satisfied of the goodwill and kindness 
of him that hurts him, at the time that he does it. There must no marks of anger or 
displeasure on the one side, nor compassion or repenting on the other, go along with it: 
and it must be sure to be no more than the child can bear, without repining, or taking it 
amiss, or for a punishment. Managed by these degrees, and with such circumstances, I 




have seen a child run away laughing, with good smart blows of a wand on his back, who 
would have cried for an unkind word, and been very sensible of the chastisement of a 
cold look from the same person. Satisfy a child by a constant course of your care and 
kindness that you perfectly love him, and he may by degrees be accustomed to bear very 
painful and rough usage from you, without flinching or complaining: and this we see 
children do every day in play one with another. The softer you find your child is, the 
more you are to seek occasions, at fit times, thus to harden him. The great art in this is, to 
begin with what is but very little painful, and to proceed by insensible degrees, when you 
are playing, and in good humour with him; and speaking well of him: and when you have 
once got him to think himself made amends for his suffering, by the praise is given him 
for his courage; when he can take a pride in giving such marks of his manliness, and can 
prefer the reputation of being brave and stout, to the avoiding a little pain, or the 
shrinking under it; you need not despair in time, and by the assistance of his growing 
reason, to, master his timorousness, and mend the weakness of his constitution. As he 
grows bigger, he is to be set upon bolder attempts than his natural temper carries him to, 
and whenever he is observed to flinch from what one has reason to think he would come 
well of in, if he had but courage to undertake: that he should be assisted in at first, and by 
degrees shamed to, till at last practice has given more assurance, and with it a mastery; 
which must be rewarded with great praise; and the good opinion of others, for his 
performance. When, by these steps, he has got resolution enough not to be deterred from 
what he ought to do, by the apprehension of danger; when fear does not, in sudden or 
hazardous occurrences, discompose his mind, set his body a trembling, and make him 
unfit for action, or run away from it, he has then the courage of a rational creature: and 
such a hardiness we should endeavour by custom and use to bring children to, as proper 
occasions come in our way. 

§116 Cruelty. — One thing I have frequently observed in children, that when they have 
got possession of any poor creature, they are apt to use it ill; they often torment and treat 
very roughly young birds, butterflies, and such other poor animals which fall into their 
hands, and that with a seeming kind of pleasure. This, I think, should be watched in them; 
and if they incline to any such cruelty, they should be taught the contrary usage; for the 
custom of tormenting and killing of beasts will, by degrees, harden their minds even 
towards men; and they who delight in the suffering and destruction of inferior creatures, 
will not be apt to be very compassionate or benign to those of their own kind. Our 
practice takes notice of this, in the exclusion of butchers from juries of life and death. 
Children should from the beginning be bred up in an abhorrence of killing or tormenting 
any living creature, and be taught not to spoil or destroy anything, unless it be for the 
preservation or advantage of some other that is nobler. And truly, if the preservation of 
all mankind, as much as in him lies, were every one's persuasion, as indeed it is every 
one's duty, and the true principle to regulate our religion, politics, and morality by, the 
world would be much quieter and better natured than it is. But to return, to our present 
business; I cannot but commend both the, kindness and prudence of a mother I knew, 
who was wont always to indulge her daughters, when any of them desired dogs, squirrels, 
birds, or any such things, as young girls use to be delighted with: but then, when they had 
them, they must be sure to keep them well, and look diligently after them, that they 
wanted nothing, or were not ill used; for, if they were negligent in their care of them, it 




was counted a great fault which often forfeited their possession; or at least they failed not 
to be rebuked for it whereby they were early taught diligence and good-nature. And, 
indeed, I think people should be accustomed from their cradles to be tender to all sensible 
creatures, and to spoil or waste nothing at all. 

This delight they take in doing of mischief whereby I mean spoiling of any thing to no 
purpose, but more especially the pleasure they take to put any thing in pain that is capable 
of it, I cannot persuade myself to be any other than a foreign and introduced disposition, a 
habit borrowed from custom and conversation. People teach children to strike, and laugh 
when they hurt, or see harm come to others; and they have the examples of most about 
them to confirm them in it. All the entertainments of talk and history is of nothing almost 
but fighting and killing; and the honour and renown that is bestowed on conquerors (who 
for the most part are but the great butchers of mankind), farther mislead growing youths, 
who by this means, come to think slaughter the laudable business of mankind, and the 
most heroic of virtues. This custom plants unnatural appetites and reconciles us to that 
which it has laid in the way to honour. Thus, by fashion and opinion, that comes to be a 
pleasure, which in itself neither is, nor can be any. This ought carefully to be watched, 
and early remedied, so as to settle and cherish the contrary and more natural temper of 
benignity and compassion in the room of it; but still by the same gentle methods, which 
are to be applied to the. other two faults before mentioned. But pray remember that the 
mischiefs or harms that come by play, inadvertency, or ignorance, and were not known to 
be harms, or designed for mischiefs sake, though they may perhaps be sometimes of 
considerable damage, yet are not at all, or but very gently, to be taken notice of. For this, 

I think; I cannot too often inculcate, that whatever miscarriage a child is guilty of, and 
whatever be the consequence of it, the thing to be regarded in taking notice of it, is only 
what root it springs from, and what habit it is like to establish; and to that the correction 
ought to be directed, and the child not to suffer any punishment for any harm which may 
have come by his play or inadvertency. The faults to be amended lie in the mind; and if 
they are such as either age will cure, or no ill habits will follow from, the present action, 
whatever displeasing circumstances it may have, is to be passed by without any 
animadversion. 

§117 Another way to instil sentiments of humanity, and to keep them lively in young 
folks, will be, to accustom them to civility in their language and towards their inferiors, 
and the meaner sort of people, particularly servants. It is not unusual to observe the 
children in gentlemen's families treat the servants of the house with domineering words, 
names of contempt, and an imperious carriage; as if they were of another race and species 
beneath them. Whether ill example, the advantage of fortune, or their natural vanity 
inspire this haughtiness; it should be prevented, or weeded out; and a gentle, courteous, 
affable carriage towards the lower ranks of men, placed in the room of it. No part of their 
superiority will be hereby lost: but the distinction increased, and their authority 
strengthened; when love in inferiors is joined to outward respect, and an esteem, of the 
person has a share in their submission: and domestics will pay a more ready and cheerful 
service, when they find themselves not spurned, because fortune has laid them below the 
level of others, at their master's feet. Children should not be suffered to lose the 
consideration of human nature, in the shufflings of outward conditions. The more they 




have, the better humoured they should be taught to be, and the more compassionate and 
gentle to those of their brethren who are placed lower, and have scantier portions. If they 
are suffered from their cradles to treat men ill and rudely, because by their father's title 
they think they have a little power over them, at best it is ill-bred, and if care be not 
taken, will by degrees nurse up their natural pride into an habitual contempt of those 
beneath them. And where will that probably end, but in oppression and cruelty? 

§118 Curiosity. — Curiosity in children (which I had occasion just to mention, section 
108) is but an appetite after knowledge, and therefore ought to be encouraged in them, 
not only as a good sign, but as the great instrument nature has provided to remove that 
ignorance they were born with, and which, without this busy inquisitiveness, will make 
them dull and useless creatures. The ways to encourage it, and keep it active and 
vigorous, are, I suppose, these following: 

1. Not to check or discountenance any inquiries he shall make, nor suffer them to be 
laughed at; but to answer all his questions, and explain the matters he desires to know, so 
as to make them as much intelligible to him. as suits the capacity of his age and 
knowledge. But confound not his understanding with explications or notions that are 
above it, or with the variety or number of things that are not to his present purpose. Mark 
what 'tis his mind aims at in the question, and not what words he expresses it in: and, 
when you have informed and satisfied him in that, you shall see how his thoughts will 
proceed on to other things, and how by fit answers to his inquiries he may be led on 
farther than perhaps you could imagine. For knowledge to the understanding is 
acceptable as light to the eyes: and children are please and delighted with it exceedingly, 
especially if they see that their inquiries are regarded, and that their desire of knowing is 
encouraged and commended. And I doubt not, but one great reason why many children 
abandon themselves wholly to silly sports; and trifle away all their time in trifling, is, 
because they have found their curiosity balked, and their inquiries neglected. But had 
they been treated with more kindness and respect, and their questions answered, as they 
should to their satisfaction, I doubt not but they would have taken more pleasure in 
learning, and improving their knowledge, wherein there would he still newness and 
variety, which is what they are delighted with, than in returning over and over to the same 
play and playthings. 

§119 2. To this serious answering their questions, and informing their understandings 

in what they desire, as if it were a matter that needed it, should be added some peculiar 
ways of commendation. Let others, whom they esteem, be told before their faces of the 
knowledge they have in such and such things; and since we are all, even from our cradles, 
vain and proud creatures, let their vanity be flattered with things that will do them good, 
and let their pride set them on work on something which may turn to their advantage. 
Upon this ground you shall find, that there cannot be a greater spur to the attaining what 
you would have the eldest learn and know himself, than to set him upon teaching it his 
younger brothers and sisters. 

§ 120 3. As children's inquiries are not to be slighted, so also great care is to be taken 

that they never receive deceitful and eluding answers. They easily perceive when they are 




slighted or deceived, and quickly learn the trick of neglect, dissimulation and falsehood, 
which they observe others to make use of. We are not to entrench upon truth in any 
conversation, but least of ah with children; since, if we play false with them, we not only 
deceive their expectation, and hinder their knowledge, but corrupt their innocence, and 
teach them the worst of vices. They are travellers newly arrived in a strange country, of 
which they know nothing: we should therefore make conscience not to mislead them. 

And though their questions seem sometimes not very material, yet they should be 
seriously answered; for however they may appear to us (to whom they are long since 
known) inquiries not worth the making, they are of moment to those who are wholly 
ignorant. Children are strangers to ah we are acquainted with; and ah the things they meet 
with, are at first unknown to them, as they once were to us: and happy are they who meet 
with civil people, that will comply with their ignorance, and help them to get out of it. If 
you or I now should be set down in Japan, with ah our prudence and knowledge about us, 
a conceit whereof makes us perhaps so apt to slight the thoughts and inquiries of 
children; should we, I say, be set down in Japan, we should, no doubt (if we would 
inform ourselves of what is there to be known), ask a thousand questions, which, to a 
supercilious or inconsiderate Japaner, would seem very idle and impertinent; and yet to 
us would be natural; and we should be glad to find a man so kind and humane as to 
answer them and instruct our ignorance. When any new thing comes in their way, 
children usually ask the common question of a stranger, What is it? whereby they 
ordinarily mean nothing but the name; and therefore to tell them how it is called, is 
usually the proper answer to that demand. The next question usually is. What is it for? 
And to this it should be answered truly and directly: the use of the thing should be told, 
and the way explained, how it serves to such a purpose, as far as their capacities can 
comprehend it; and so of any other circumstances they shah ask about it; not turning 
them going till you have given them ah the satisfaction they are capable ot and so leading 
them by your answers into farther questions. And perhaps, to a grown man, such 
conversation will not he altogether so idle and insignificant as we are apt to imagine. The 
native and untaught suggestions of inquisitive children do often offer things that may set 
a considering man's thoughts on work. And I think there is frequently more to be learned 
from the unexpected questions of a child, than the discourses of men, who talk in a road, 
according to the notions they have borrowed, and the prejudices of their education. 

§121 4. Perhaps it may not sometimes be amiss to excite their curiosity, by bringing 

strange and new things in their way, on purpose to engage their inquiry, and give them 
occasion to inform themselves about them; and if by chance their curiosity leads them to 
ask what they should not know, it is a great deal better to tell them plainly that it is a 
thing that belongs not to them to know, than to pop them off with a falsehood or a 
frivolous answer. 

§122 Pertness. — Pertness, that appears sometimes so early, proceeds from a principle 
that seldom accompanies a strong constitution of body, or ripens into a strong judgment 
of mind. If it were desirable to have a child a more brisk talker, I believe there might be 
ways found to make him so; but, I suppose, a wise father had rather that this son should 
be able and useful, when a man, than pretty company and a diversion to others whilst a 
child; though, if that too were to be considered, I think I may say, there is not so much 




pleasure to have a child prattle agreeably as to reason well. Encourage, therefore, his 
inquisitiveness all you can, by satisfying his demands and informing his judgment as far 
as it is capable. When his reasons are any way tolerable, let him find the credit and 
commendation of them; and when they are quite out of the way, let him, without being 
laughed at for his mistake; be gently put into the right; and, take care, as much as you 
can, that in this inclination he shews to reasoning about every thing no body balk or 
impose upon him. For, when all is done, this, as the highest and most important faculty of 
our minds, deserves the greatest care and attention in cultivating it; the right improvement 
and exercise of our reason being the highest perfection that a man can attain to in this life. 

§123 Sauntering. — Contrary to this busy inquisitive temper, there is sometimes 
observable in children a listless carelessness, a want of regard to any thing, and a sort of 
trifling, even at their business. This sauntering humour I look on as one of the worst 
qualities that can appear in a child, as well as one of the hardest to be cured, where it is 
natural. But, it being liable to be mistaken in some cases, care must be taken to make a 
right judgment concerning that trifling at their books or business, which may sometimes 
be complained of in a child. Upon the first suspicion a father has that his son is of a 
sauntering temper, he must carefully observe him, whether he be listless and indifferent 
in all his actions, or whether in some things alone he he slow and sluggish, but in others 
vigorous and eager: for though he find that he does loiter at his book, and let a good deal 
of the time he spends in his chamber or study run idly away, he must not presently 
conclude that this is from a sauntering humour in his temper; it may be childishness, and 
a preferring something to his study which his thoughts run on; and he dislikes his book, 
as is natural, because it is forced upon him as a task. To know this perfectly, you must 
watch him at play, when he is out of his place and time of study, following his own 
inclinations; and see there, whether he be vigorous and active; whether he designs 
anything, and with labour and eagerness pursues it, till he has accomplished what he 
aimed at; or whether he, lazily and listlessly dreams away his time. If this sloth be only 
when he is about his book, I think it may be easily cured; if it be in his temper, it will 
require a little more pains and attention to remedy it. 

§124 If you are satisfied, by his earnestness at play, or any thing else he sets his mind 
on, in the intervals between his hours of business, that he is not of himself inclined to 
laziness, but that only want of relish of his book makes him negligent and sluggish in his 
application to it, the first step is to try, by talking to him kindly of the folly and 
inconvenience of it, whereby he loses a good part of his time, which he might have for 
his diversion: but be sure to talk calmly and kindly, and not much at first but only these 
plain reasons in short. If this prevails, you have gained the point in the most desirable 
way, which is reason and kindness. If it prevails not, try to shame him out of it, by 
laughing at him for it, asking every day, when he comes to table, if there be no strangers 
there, "how long he was that day about his business?" And if he has not done it, in the 
time he might be well supposed to have despatched it, expose and turn him into ridicule 
for it; but mix no chiding, only put on a pretty cold brow towards him, and keep it till he 
reform; and let his mother, tutor, and all about him, do so too. If this work not the effect 
you desire, then tell him he shall be no longer troubled with a tutor to take care of his 
education: you will not be at the charge to have him spend his time idly with him; but 




since he prefers this or that (whatever play he delights in) to his book, that only he shall 
do; and so in earnest set him to work on his beloved play, and keep him steadily and in 
earnest to it mormug and afternoon, till he be fully surfeited, and would, at any rate, 
change it for some hours at his book again: but when you thus set him a task of his play, 
you must be sure to look after liun yourself, or set somebody else to do it, that may 
constantly see him employed in it, and that he be not permitted to be idle at that too. I 
say, your self look after him; for it is worth the father's while, whatever business he has, 
to bestow two or three days upon his son, to cure so great a mischief as is sauntering at 
his business. 

§125 This is what I propose, if it be idleness not from his general temper, but a 
peculiar or acquired aversion to learning, which you must be careful to examine and 
distinguish, which you shall certainly know by the way above proposed. But though you 
have your eyes upon him to watch what he does with the time he has at his own disposal, 
yet you must not let him perceive that you or any body else do so. For that may restrain 
him from following his own inclination, and that being the thing his head or heart is 
upon; and not daring to prosecute it for fear of you, he may forbear doing other things, 
and so seem to be idle and negligent, when in truth it is nothing but being intent on that 
which the fear of your eye or knowledge keeps him from erecuting. You must therefore, 
when you would try him, give him full liberty; but let some body whom you can trust 
observe what he does. And it will be best he should have his play-day of liberty, when 
you and all that he may suspect to have an eye upon him are abroad, that so he may 
without check follow his natural inclination. Thus by his employing of such times of 
liberty, you will easily discern whether it be listlessness in his temper, or aversion to his 
book that makes him saunter away his time of study. 

§126 If listlessness and dreaming be his natural disposition, this unpromising temper is 
one of the hardest to be dealt with, because it generally carrying with it an indifferency 
for future things, may be attributed to want of foresight and want of desire; and how to 
plant or increase either of these, where Nature has given a cold or contrary temper, is not 
I think very easy. As soon as it is perceived, the first thing to be done is to find out his 
most predominate passion, and carefully examine what it is to which the greatest bent of 
his mind has the most steady and earnest tendency. And when you have found that, you 
must set that on work to excite his industry to any thing else. If he loves praise, or play, 
or fine clothes, etc., or, on the other side, dreads shame and disgrace, your displeasure, 
etc., whatever it be that he loves most, except it be sloth (for that will never set him on 
work), let that be made use of to excite him to activity. For in this listless temper you are 
not to fear an excess of appetite (as in all other cases) by cherishing it. 'Tis that which you 
want, and therefore must labour to stir up and increase. For where there is no desire, there 
will be no industry. 

§127 If you have not hold enough upon him this way to stir up rigour and activity in 
him, you must employ him in some constant bodily labour, whereby he may get a habit of 
doing something. The keeping kim hard to some study, were the better way to get him an 
habit of exercising and applying his mind. But, because this is an invisible attention, and 
nobody can tell when he is or is not idle at it, you must find bodily employments for him, 




which he must be constantly busied in and kept to; and if they have some little hardship 
and shame in them, it may not be the worse, to make them the sooner weary him, and 
desire to return to his book. But be sure, when you exchange his book for his other 
labour, set him such a task, to be done in such a time, as may allow him no opportunity to 
be idle. Only, after you have by this way brought him to be attentive and industrious at 
his book, you may, upon his despatching his study within the time set him, give him as a 
reward some respite from his other labour; which you may diminish, as you find him 
grow more and more steady in his application; and, at last, wholly take off, when his 
sauntering at his book is cured. 

§ 128 Compulsion. — We formerly observed, that variety and freedom was that that 
delighted children, and recommended their plays to them; and that therefore their book, 
or anything we would have them learn, should not be enjoined them as business. This 
their parents, tutors, and teachers are apt to forget; and their impatience to have them 
busied in what is fit for them to do suffers them not to deceive them into it: but by the 
repeated injunctions they meet with, children quickly distinguish between what is 
required of them and what not. When this mistake has once made his book uneasy to him, 
the cure is to be applied at the other end. And since it will be then too late to endeavour to 
make it a play to him, you must take the contrary course; observe what play he is most 
delighted with; enjoin that and make him play so many hours every day, not as a 
punishment for playing, but as if it were the business required of him. This, if I mistake 
not, will in a few days, make him so weary of his most beloved sport, that he will prefer 
his book, or any thing to it, especially if it may redeem him from any part of the task of 
play that is set him; and he may be suffered to employ some part of the time destined to 
his task of play in his book, or such other exercise as is really useful to him. This I at least 
think a better cure than that forbidding (which usually increases the desire) or any other 
punishment that should be made use of to remedy it. For when you have once glutted his 
appetite (which may safely be done in all things but eating and drinking), and made him 
surfeit of what you would have him avoid, you have put into him a principle of aversion, 
and you need not so much fear afterwards his longing for the same thing again. 

§129 This, I think, is sufficiently evident, that children generally hate to be idle. All the 
care then is, that their busy hamour should be constantly employed in something of use to 
them; which if you will attain, you must make what you would have them do a recreation 
to them, and not a business. The way to do this, so that they may not perceive you have 
any hand in it is this proposed here, viz. to make them weary of that which you would not 
have them do, by enjoining and making them, under some pretence or other, do it till they 
are surfeited. For example: Does your son play at top and scourge too much? Enjoin him 
to play so many hours every day, and look that he do it; and you shall see he will quickly 
be sick of it and willing to leave it. By this means, making the recreations you dislike a 
business to him, he will of himself with delight betake himself to those things you would 
have him do, especially if they be proposed as rewards for having performed his task in 
that play which is commanded him. For, if he be ordered every day to whip his top so 
long as to make him sufficiently weary, do you not think he will apply himself with 
eagerness to his book, and wish for it if you promise it him as a reward of having 
whipped his top lustily, quite out all the time that is set in him? Children, in the things 




they do, if they comport with their age, find little difference, so they may the esteem they 
have for one thing above another, they borrow from others; so that what those about them 
make to be a reward to them, will really be so. By this art, it is in their governor's choice, 
whether scotch-hoppers shall reward their dancing, or dancing their scotch-hoppers 
whether peg-top, or reading, playing at trap, or studying the globes, shall he more 
acceptable and pleasing to them; all that they desire being to be busy, and busy, as they 
imagine, in things of their own choice, and which they receive as favours from their 
parents, or others for whom they have respect, and with whom they would be in credit. A 
set of children thus ordered, and kept from the ill example of others, would all of them, I 
suppose, with as much earnestness and delight, learn to read, write, and what else one 
would have them, as others do their ordinary plays: and the eldest being thus entered, and 
this made the fashion of the place, it would be as impossible to hinder them from learning 
the one, as it is ordinarily to keep them from the other. 

§130 Play-games. — Playthings, I think, children should have, and of all sorts, but still 
to be in the keeping of their tutors, or somebody else, whereof the child should have in 
his power but one at once, and should not be suffered to have another; but when he 
restored that. This teaches them betimes to be careful of not losing or spoiling the things 
they have; whereas plenty and variety in their own keeping, makes them wanton and 
careless, and teaches them from the beginning to be squanderers and wasters. These, I 
confess, are little things, and such as will seem beneath the care of a governor; but 
nothing that may form children's minds is to be over-looked ad neglected: and 
whatsoever introduces habits, and settles customs in them, deserves the care and attention 
of their governors, and is not a small thing in its consequences. 

One thing more about children's play-things may be worth their parents care. Though it 
be agreed they should have of several sorts; yet, I think they should have none bought for 
them. This will hinder that great variety they are often overcharged with, which serves 
only to teach the mind to wander after change and superfluity, to be unquiet, and 
perpetually stretching itself after something more still, though it knows not what, and 
never to be satisfied with what it has. The court that is made to people of condition in 
such kind of presents to their children, does the little ones great harm. By it they are 
taught pride, vanity and covetousness, almost before they can speak: and I have known a 
young child so distracted with the number and variety of his play-games, that he tired his 
maid every day to look them over; and was so accustomed to abundance, that he never 
thought he had enough, but was always asking, what more? What more? What new thing 
shall I have? A good introduction to moderate desires, and the ready way to make a 
contented happy man! 

How then shall they have the play-games you allow them, if none must be bought for 
them? I answer, they should make them themselves, or at least endeavour it, and set 
themselves about it; till then they should have none, and till then they will want none of 
any great artifice. A smooth pebble, a piece of paper, the mother's bunch of keys, or any 
thing they cannot hurt themselves with, serves as much to divert little children, as those 
more chargeable and curious toys from the shops, which are presently out of order and 
broken. Children are never dull, or out of humour, for want of such play-things, unless 




they have been used to them: when they are little, whatever occurs serves the turn; and as 
they grow bigger, if they are not stored by the expensive folly of others, they will make 
them themselves. Indeed, when they once begin to set themselves to work about any of 
their inventions, they should be taught and assisted; but should have nothing whilst they 
lazily sit still, expecting to be furnished from other hands, without employing their own. 
And if you help them where they are at a stand, it will more endear you to them than any 
chargeable toys you shall buy for them. Play-things which are above their skill to make, 
as tops, gigs, battledores, and the like, which are to be used with labour, should indeed be 
procured them. These 'tis convenient they should have, not for variety, but exercise; but 
these too should be given them as bare as might be. If they had a top, the scourge-stick 
and leather-strap should be left to their own making and fitting. If they sit gaping to have 
such things dropped in their mouths, they should go without them. This will accustom 
them to seek for what they want, in themselves, and in their own endeavours; whereby 
they will be taught moderation in their desires, application, industry, thought, 
contrivance, and good husbandry; qualities that will be useful to them when they are 
men; and therefore cannot be learned too soon, nor fixed too deep. All the plays and 
diversions of children should be directed towards good useful habits, or else they will 
introduce ill ones. Whatever they do, leaves some impression on that tender age, and 
from thence they receive a tendency to good or evil: and whatever has such an influence, 
ought not to be neglected. 

§131 Lying. — Lying is so ready and cheap a cover for any miscarriage, and so much 
in fashion amongst all sorts of people, that a child can hardly avoid observing the use is 
made of it on all occasions, and so can scarce be kept, without great care, from getting 
into it. But it is so ill a quality, and the mother of so many ill ones that spawn from it and 
take shelter under it, that a child should be brought up in the greatest abhorrence of it 
imaginable: it should be always (when occasionally it comes to be mentioned), spoke of 
before him with the utmost detestation, as a quality so wholly incompetent with a 
gentleman, that nobody of any credit can bear the imputation of a lie; that is proper only 
to beggars'-boys and the abhorred rascality, and not tolerable in any one, who would 
converse with people of condition, or have any esteem or reputation in the world. And the 
first time he is found in a lie, it should rather be wondered at, as a monstrous thing in 
him, than reproved as an ordinary fault. If that keeps him not from relapsing, the next 
time he must be sharply rebuked, and fall into the state of great displeasure of his father 
and mother, and all about him, who take notice of it. And if this way work not the cure, 
you must come to blows; for, after he has been thus warned, a premeditated lie must 
always be looked upon as obstinacy, and never be permitted to 'scape unpunished. 



§132 Excuses. — Children, afraid to have their faults seen in their naked colours, will 
like the rest of the sons of Adam, be apt to make excuses. This is a fault usually bordering 
upon, and leading to untruth, and is not to be indulged in them; but yet, it ought to be 
cured rather with shame than roughness. If therefore, when a child is questioned for 
anything, his first answer be an excuse, warn him soberly to tell the truth; and then, if he 
persists to shuffle it off with a falsehood, he must be chastised. But if he directly confess, 
you must commend his ingenuity, and pardon the fault, be it what it will; and pardon it 




so, that you never so much as reproach him with it, or mention it to him again. For if you 
would have him in love with ingenuity, and by a constant practice make it habitual to 
him, you must take care that it never procure him the least inconvenience; but, on the 
contrary, his own confession bringing always with it perfect impunity, should be, besides, 
encouraged by some marks of approbation. If his excuse be such at any time that you 
cannot prove it to have any falsehood in it, let it pass for true, and be sure not to show any 
suspicion of it. Let him keep up his reputation with you as high as is possible; for, when 
once he finds he has lost that, you have lost a great and your best hold upon him. 
Therefore let him not think he has the character of a liar with you, as long as you can 
avoid it without flattering him in it. Thus some slips in truth may be overlooked. But, 
after he has once been corrected for a lie, you must be sure never after to pardon it in 
him, whenever you find, and take notice to him, that he is guilty of it: for it being a fault, 
which he has been forbid, and may, unless he be wilful, avoid, the repeating of it is 
perfect perverseness, and must have the chastisement due to that offence. 

§133 This is what I have thought, concerning the general method of educating a young 
gentleman; which, though I am apt to suppose may have some influence on the whole 
course of his education, yet I am far from imagining it contains all those particulars 
which his growing years or peculiar temper may require. But this being premised in 
general, we shall, in the next place, descend to a more particular consideration of the 
several parts of his education. 

§134 That which every gentleman (that takes any care of his education) desires for his 
son, besides the estate he leaves him, is contained I suppose in these four things, Virtue, 
Wisdom, Breeding, and Learning. I will not trouble myself whether these names do not 
some of them sometimes stand for the same thing, or really include one another. It serves 
my turn here to follow the popular use of these words, which, I presume, is clear enough 
to make me be understood, and I hope there will be no difficulty to comprehend my 
meaning. 

§135 Virtue. — I place Virtue as the first and most necessary of those endowments that 
belong to a man or a gentleman, as absolutely requisite to make him valued and beloved 
by others, acceptable or tolerable to himself; without that, I think, he will be happy 
neither in this nor the other world. 

§136 God. — As the foundation of this, there ought very early to be imprinted on his 
mind a true notion of God, as of the independent Supreme Being, Author and Maker of 
all things, from whom we receive all our good, who loves us, and gives us all things; and, 
consequent to it, a love and reverence of this Supreme Being. This is enough to begin 
with, without going to explain this matter any farther, for fear, lest by talking too early to 
him of spirits, and being unseasonably forward to make him understand the 
incomprehensible nature of that infinite being, his head be either filled with false, or 
perplexed with unintelligible notions of him. Let him only he told upon occasion, of God, 
that made and governs all things, hears and sees everything, and does all manner of good 
to those that love and obey him. You will find, that being told of such a God, other 
thoughts will be apt to rise up fast enough in his mind about him; which, as you observe 




them to have any mistakes, you must set right. And I think it would be better, if men 
generally rested in such an idea of God, without being too curious in their notions about a 
being, which all must acknowledge incomprehensible; whereby many, who have not 
strength and clearness of thought to distinguish between what they can, and what they 
cannot know, run themselves into superstition or atheism, making God like themselves, 
or (because they cannot comprehend any thing else) none at all. And I am apt to think, 
the keeping children constantly morning and evening to acts of devotion to God, as to 
their Maker, Preserver, and Benefactor, in some plain and short form of prayer, suitable 
to their age and capacity, will be of much more use to them in religion, knowledge, and 
virtue, than to distract their thoughts with curious inquiries into his inscrutable essence 
and being. 

§137 Spirits. — Having by gentle degrees, as you find him capable of it, settled such an 
idea of God in his mind, and taught him to pray to him, forbear any discourse of other 
spirits, till the mention of them coming in his way, upon occasion hereafter to be set 
down, and his reading the Scripture history, put him upon that inquiry. 

§138 Goblins. — But even then, and always whilst he is young, be sure to preserve his 
tender mind from all impressions and notions of sprites and goblins, or any fearful 
apprehensions in the dark. It being the usual method of servants to awe children, and 
keep them in subjection, by telling them of Raw-Head and Bloody-Bones, and such other 
names, as carry with them the ideas of some hurtful, terrible things inhabiting darkness, 
this must be carefully prevented. For though by this foolish way they may keep them 
from little faults, yet the remedy is much worse than the disease, and there are stamped 
upon their minds ideas that follow them with terror and affrightment. For such bugbear 
thoughts, once got into the tender minds of children, sink deep there, and fasten 
themselves so, as not easily, if ever, to be got out again; and whilst they are there, 
frequently haunt them with strange visions, making children dastards when alone, and 
afraid of their shadows and darkness all their lives after. For it is to be taken notice, that 
the first impressions sink deepest into the minds of children, and the notions they are 
possessed with when young are scarce by any industry or art ever after quite wiped out. 

I have had those complain to me, when men, who had been thus used when young, that, 
though their reason corrected the wrong ideas they had taken in, and though they were 
satisfied that there was no cause to fear invisible beings more in the dark than in the light, 
yet that these notions were apt still, upon any occasion, to start up first in their 
prepossessed fancies, and not to be removed without some pains. And, to let you see how 
lasting frightful images are, that take place in the mind early, I here tell you a pretty 
remarkable, but true story. There was in a town in the West a man of a disturbed brain, 
whom the boys used to tease, when he came in their way: this fellow one day, seeing in 
the street one of those lads that used to vex him, stepped into a cutler's shop he was near, 
and, there seizing on a naked sword, made after the boy, who seeing him coming so 
armed, betook himself to his feet, and ran for his life, and by good luck, had strength and 
heels enough to reach his father's house before the madman could get up to him. The door 
was only latched; and when he had the latch in his hand, he turned about his head to see 
how near his pursuer was, who was at the entrance of the porch, with his sword up ready 




to strike; and he had just time to get in and clap-to the door, to avoid the blow, which, 
though his body escaped, his mind did not. This frightening idea made so deep an 
impression there, that it lasted many years, if not all his life after; for telling this story 
when he was a man, he said, that after that time till then, he never went in at that door 
(that he could remember) at any time, without looking back, whatever business he had in 
his head, or how little soever, before he came thither, he thought of this madman. 

If children were let alone, they would be no more afraid in the dark than of broad 
sunshine; they would in their turns as much welcome the one for sleep, as the other to 
play in; there should be no distinction made to them, by any discourse, of more danger or 
terrible things in the one than the other. But, if the folly of any one about them should do 
them this harm, to make them think there is any difference between being in the dark and 
winking, you must get it out of their minds as soon as you can; and let them know that 
God, who made all things good for them, made the night, that they might sleep the better 
and the quieter; and that they being under his protection, there is nothing in the dark to 
hurt them. What is to be known more of God and good spirits is to be deferred till the 
time we shall hereafter mention; and of evil spirits, it will be well if you can keep him 
from wrong fancies about them, till he is ripe for that sort of knowledge. 

§139 Truth. — Having laid the foundations of virtue in a true notion of a God, such as 
the creed wisely teaches, as far as his age is capable, and by accustoming him to pray to 
him, the next thing to be taken care of, is to keep him exactly to speaking of truth, and by 
all the ways imaginable inclining him to be good-natured. Let him know, that twenty 
faults are sooner to be forgiven, than the straining of truth to cover any one by an excuse. 
And to teach him betimes to love and be good-natured to others, is to lay early the true 
foundation of an honest man; all injustice generally springing from too great love of 
ourselves and too little of others. 

This is all I shall say of this matter in general, and is enough for laying the first 
foundations of virtue in a child. As he grows up, the tendency of his natural inclination 
must be observed; which, as it inclines him, more than is convenient, on one or the other 
side, from the right path of virtue, ought to have proper remedies applied. For few of 
Adam's children are so happy as not to he born with some bias in their natural temper, 
which it is the business of education either to take off, or counterbalance: but to enter into 
particulars of this would be beyond the design of this short treatise of education. I intend 
not a discourse of all the virtues and vices, and how each virtue is to he attained, and 
every particular vice by its peculiar remedies cured though I have mentioned some of the 
most ordinary faults, and the ways to be used in correcting them. 

§ 140 Wisdom. — Wisdom I take, in the popular acceptation, for a man's managing his 
business ably and with foresight in this world. This is the product of a good natural 
temper, application of mind and experience together, and not to be taught children. The 
greatest thing that in them can be done towards it, is to hinder them, as much as may be, 
from being cunning; which, being the ape of wisdom, is the most distant from it that can 
be: and as an ape, for the likeness it has to a man, wanting what really should make him 
so, is by so much the uglier. Cunning is only the want of understanding; which, because it 




cannot compass its ends by direct ways, would do it by a trick and circumvention; and the 
mischief of it is, a cunning trick helps but once, but hinders ever after. No cover was ever 
made either so big or so fine as to hide itself. Nobody was ever so cunning, as to conceal 
their being so: and when they are once discovered, every body is shy, every body 
distrustful of crafty men; and all the world forwardly join to oppose and defeat them: 
whilst the open, fair, wise man has every body to make way for him, and goes directly to 
his business. To accustom a child to have true notions of things, and not to be satisfied till 
he has them; to raise his mind to great and worthy thoughts; and to keep him at a distance 
from falsehood and cunning, which has always a broad mixture of falsehood in it, is the 
fittest preparation of a child for wisdom, which being learned from time, experience, and 
observation, and an acquaintance with men, their tempers and designs [is] not to be 
expected in the ignorance and inadvertency of childhood, or the inconsiderate heat and 
unwariness of youth: all that can be done towards it, during this unripe age, is, as I have 
said, to accustom them to truth and submission to reason; and, as much as may be, to 
reflection on their own actions. 

§ 141 Breeding. — The next good quality belonging to a gentleman is good breeding. 
There are two sorts of ill breeding; the one, a sheepish bashfulness; and the other, a 
misbecoming negligence and disrespect in our carriage; both which are avoided by duly 
observing this one rule, Not to think meanly of ourselves, and not to think meanly of 
others. 

§ 142 The first part of this rule must not be understood in opposition to humility, but to 
assurance. We ought not to think so well of ourselves as to stand upon our own value; or 
assume a preference to others, because of any advantage we may imagine we have over 
them; but modestly to take what is offered, when it is our due. But yet we ought to think 
so well of ourselves, as to perform those actions which are incumbent on and expected of 
us, without discomposure or disorder, in whose presence soever we are, keeping that 
respect and distance which is due to every one's rank and quality. There is often in 
people, especially children, a clownish shamefacedness before strangers, or those above 
them; they are confounded in their thoughts, words, and looks, and so lose themselves in 
that confusion, as not to be able to do any thing, or at least not to do it with that freedom 
and gracefulness which pleases and makes them acceptable. The only cure for this, as for 
any miscarriage, is by use to introduce the contrary habit. But since we cannot accustom 
ourselves to converse with strangers and persons of quality without being in their 
company, nothing can cure this part of ill breeding but change and variety of company, 
and that of persons above us. 

§143 As the before-mentioned consists in too great a concern how to behave ourselves 
towards others, so the other part of ill breeding lies in the appearance of too little care of 
pleasing or showing respect to those we have to do with. To avoid these, two things are 
requisite: first, a disposition of the mind not to offend others: and, secondly, the most 
acceptable and agreeable way of expressing that disposition. From the one, men are 
called civil: from the other, well-fashioned. The latter of these is that decency and 
gracefulness of looks, voice, words, motions, gestures, and of ah the whole outward 
demeanour which pleases in company, and makes those easy and delighted whom we 




converse with. This is, as it were, the language whereby that internal civility of the mind 
is expressed; and being very much governed by the fashion and custom of every country, 
as other languages are, must, in the rules and practice of it, be learned chiefly from 
observation, and the carriage of those who are allowed to be exactly well-bred. The other 
part, which lies in the mind, is that general goodwill and regard for all people, which 
makes any one have a care not to show, in his carriage, any contempt, disrespect, or 
neglect of them; but to express, according to the fashion and way of that country, a 
respect and value for them, according to their rank and condition. It is a disposition of the 
mind that shows itself in the carriage, whereby a man avoids making any one uneasy in 
conversation. 

I shall take notice of four qualities, that are most directly opposite to this first and most 
taking of all the social virtues. And from some one of these four it is that incivility 
commonly has its rise. I shall set them down, that children may be preserved or recovered 
from their ill influence. 

1 . Roughness. The first is a natural roughness, which makes a man uncomplaisant to 
others, so that he has no deference for their inclinations, tempers or conditions. 'Tis the 
sure badge of a clown, not to mind what pleases or difpleases those he is with; and yet 
one may find a man in fashionable clothes give an unbounded swing to his humour; and 
suffer it to justle or over- run any one that stands in its way, with a perfect indifferency 
how they take it. This is a brutality that every one sees and abhors, and no body can be 
easy with; and therefore this finds no place in any one who would be thought to have the 
least tincture of good breeding. For the very end and business of good breeding is to 
supply the natural stiffness, and so soften men's tempers, that they may bend to a 
compliance, and acommodate themselves to those they have to do with. 

2. Contempt. Contempt, or want of respect, discovered either in looks, words or gesture. 
This, from whomsoever it comes, brings always uneasiness with it: for no body can 
contentedly bear being slighted. 

3. Censoriousness. Censoriousness, and finding fault with others, has a direct opposition 
to civility. Men, whatever they are or are not guilty of, would not have their faults 
displayed, and set in open view and broad daylight, before their own or other people's 
eyes. Blemishes affixed to any one always carry shame with them: and the discovery, or 
even bare imputation of any defect is not born without some uneasiness. Raillery is the 
most refined way of exposing the faults of others: but, because it is usually done with wit 
and good language, and gives entertainment to the company, people are led into a 
mistake, that where it keeps within fair bounds, there is no incivility in it. And so the 
pleasantry of this sort of conversation often introduces it amongst people of the better 
rank; and such talkers are favourably heard and generally applauded by the laughter of 
the bystanders on their side. But they ought to consider, that the entertainment of the rest 
of the company is at the cost of that one who is set out in their burlesque colours, who 
therefore is not without uneasiness, unless the subject, for which he is railled, be really in 
itself matter of commendation. For then the pleasant images and representations, which 
make the raillery, carrying praise as well as sport with them, the rallied person also finds 




his account, and takes part in the diversion. But because the right management of so nice 
and ticklish a business, wherein a little slip may spoil all, is not every body's talent, I 
think those who would secure themselves from provoking others, especially all young 
people, should carefully abstain from raillery, which by a small mistake, or any wrong 
turn, may leave upon the mind of those who are made uneasy by it, the lasting memory of 
having been picquantly, though wittily, taunted for something censurable in them. 

Besides raillery, contradiction is a sort of censoriousness, wherein ill-breeding often 
shows itself. Complaisance does not require that we should always admit all the 
reasonings or relations that the company is entertained with; no, nor silently to let pass all 
that is vented in our hearing. The opposing the opinions, and rectifying the mistakes of 
others, is what truth and charity sometimes require of us, and civility does not oppose, if 
it be done with due caution and care of circumstances. But there are some people that one 
may observe, possessed as it were with the spirit of contradiction, that steadily, and 
without regard to right or wrong, oppose some one, or perhaps every one, of the 
company, whatever they say. This is so visible and outrageous a way of censuring, that 
no body can avoid thinking himself injured by it. All opposition to what another man has 
said, is so apt to be suspected of censoriousness, and is so seldom received without some 
sort of humiliation, that it ought to be made in the gentlest manner, and softest words can 
be found, and such as, with the whole deportment, may express no forwardness to 
contradict. All marks of respect and good will ought to accompany it, that whilst we gain 
the argument, we may not lose the esteem of those that hear us. 

4. Captiousness. Captiousness is another fault opposite to civility; not only because it 
often produces misbecoming and provoking expressions, and carriage; but because it is a 
tacit accusation and reproach of some incivility taken notice of in those whom we are 
angry with. Such a suspicion or intimation cannot be born by any one without uneasiness. 
Besides, one angry body discomposes the whole company, and the harmony ceases upon 
such jarring. 

The happiness that all men so steadily pursue consisting in pleasure, it is easy to see why 
the civil are more acceptable than the useful. The ability, sincerity, and good intention of 
a man of weight and worth, or a real friend, seldom atones for the uneasiness that is 
produced by his grave and solid representations. Power and riches, nay virtue itself, are 
valued only as conducing to our happiness: and therefore he recommends himself ill to 
another, who in the services he does him, makes him uneasy in the manner of doing 
them. He that knows how to make those he converses with easy, without debasing 
himself to low and servile flattery, has found the true art of living in the world, and being 
both welcome and valued every where. Civility therefore is what in the first place should 
with great care be made habitual to children and young people. 

§ 144 There is another fault in good manners, and that is, excess of ceremony, and an 
obstinate persisting to force upon another what is not his due, and what he cannot take 
without folly or shame. This seems rather a design to expose than oblige, or at least looks 
like a contest for mastery; and at best is but troublesome, and so can be no part of good 
breeding, which has no other use nor end but to make people easy and satisfied in their 




conversation with us. This is a fault few young people are apt to fall into; but yet, if they 
are ever guilty of it, or are suspected to incline that way, they should be told of it, and 
warned of this mistaken civility. The thing they should endeavour and aim at in 
conversation, should be to show respect, esteem, and good-will, by paying to every one 
that common ceremony and regard which is in civility due to them. To do this, without a 
suspicion of flattery, dissimulation, or meanness, is a great skill which good sense, reason 
and good company can only teach; but is of so much use in civil life, that it is well worth 
the studying. 

§145 Though the managing ourselves well in this part of our behaviour has the name 
of good breeding, as if peculiarly the effect of education; yet, as I have said, young 
children should not be much perplexed about it; I mean, about putting off their hats and 
making legs modishly. Teach them humility and to be good-natured if you can, and this 
sort of manners will not be wanting: civility being, in truth, nothing but a care not to 
show any slighting or contempt of any one in conversation. What are the most allowed 
and esteemed ways of expressing this, we have above observed. It is as peculiar and 
different, in several countries of the world, as their languages: and therefore, if it be 
rightly considered, rules and discourses, made to children about it, are as useless and 
impertinent as it would be now and then to give a rule or two of the Spanish tongue to 
one that converses only with Englishmen. Be as busy as you please with discourses of 
civility to your son; such as is his company, such will be his manners. A ploughman of 
your neighbourhood, that has never been out of his parish, read what lectures you please 
to him, will be as soon in his language, as his carriage, a courtier; that is, in neither will 
be more polite than those he uses to converse with: and therefore of this no other care can 
be taken. And, in good earnest, if I were to speak my mind freely, so children do nothing 
out of obstinacy, pride, and ill-nature, it is no great matter how they put off their hats or 
make legs. If you can teach them to love and respect other people, they will, as their age 
requires it, find ways to express it acceptably to every one, according to the fashions they 
have been used to: and, as to their motions, and carriage of their bodies, a dancing- 
master, as has been said, when it is fit, will teach them what is most becoming. In the 
meantime, when they are young, people expect not that children should be over-mindful 
of these ceremonies; carelessness allowed to that age, and becomes them as well as 
compliments do grown people: or, at least, if some very nice people will think it a fault, I 
am sure it is a fault that should be over-looked, and left to time and conversation only to 
cure: and therefore I think it not worth your while to have your son (as I often see 
children are) molested or chid about it. But where there is pride or ill-nature appearing in 
his carriage, there he must be persuaded or shamed out of it. 

Though children, when little, should not be much perplexed with rules and ceremonious 
parts of breeding, yet there is a sort of unmannerliness very apt to grow up with young 
people, if not early restrained; and that is a forwardness to interrupt others that are 
speaking, and to stop them with some contradiction. Whether the custom of disputing, 
and the reputation of parts and learning usually given to it, as if it were the only standard 
and evidence of knowledge, make young men so forward to watch occasions to correct 
others in their discourfe, and not to slip any opportunity of showing their talents: so it is, 
that I have found scholars most blamed in this point. There cannot be a greater rudeness, 




than to interrupt another in the current of his discourse; for if there be not impertinent 
folly in answering a man before we know what he will say, yet it is a plain declaration, 
that we are weary to hear him talk any longer, and have a dis-esteem of what he says; 
which we judging not fit to entertain the company; desire them to give audience to us, 
who have something to produce worth their attention. This shows a very great disrespect, 
and cannot but be offensive: and yet, this is what almost all interruption constantly carries 
with it. To which, if there be added, as is usual, a correcting of any mistake, or a 
contradiction of what has been said, it is a mark of yet greater pride and self- 
conceitedness, when we thus intrude ourselves for teachers, and take upon us, either to 
set another right in his story, or show the mistakes of his judgment. 

I do not say this, that I think there should be no difference of opinions in conversation, 
nor opposition in men's discourses: this would be to take away the greatest advantage of 
society, and the improvements are to be made by ingenious company; where the light is 
to be got from the opposite arguings of men of parts, showing the different sides of 
things, and their various afpects, and probabilities, would be quite lost if every one were 
obliged to assent to, and say after the first speaker. 'Tis not the owning one's dissent from 
another, that I speak against, but the manner of doing it. Young men should be taught not 
to be forward to interpose their opinions; unless asked, or when others have done, and are 
silent; and then only by way of enquiry, not instruction. The positive asserting, and the 
magisterial air should be avoided; and when a general pause of the whole company 
affords an opportunity, they may modestly put in their question as learners. 

This becoming decency will not cloud their parts, nor weaken the strength of their reason; 
but bespeak the more favourable attention, and give what they say the greater advantage: 
an ill argument, or ordinary observation, thus introduced, with some civil preface of 
deference and respect to the opinions of others, wiil procure them more credit and 
esteem, than the sharpest wit, or profoundest science, with a rough, insolent, or noisy 
management, which always shocks the hearers, leaves an ill opinion of the man, though 
he get the better of it in the argument. 

This therefore should be carefully watched in young people, stopped in the beginning, 
and the contrary habit introduced in all their conversation. And the rather, because 
forwardness to talk, frequent interruptions in arguing, and loud wrangling, are too often 
observable amongst grown people, even of rank, amongst us. The indians whom we call 
barbarous, observe much more decency and civility in their discourses and conversation; 
giving one ano ther a fair silent hearing, till they have quite done; and then answering 
them calmly, and without noise or passion. And if it be not so in this civilized part of the 
world, we must impute it to a neglect in education, which has not yet reformed this 
ancient piece of barbarity amongst us. Was it not, think you, an entertaining spectacle, to 
see two ladies of quality accidentally seated on the opposite sides of a room, set round 
with company, fall into a dispute, and grow so eager in it, that in the heat of their 
controversy, edging by degrees their chairs forwards, they were in a little time got up 
close to one another in the middle of the room; where they for a good while managed the 
dispute as fiercely as two game-cocks in the pit, without minding or taking any notice of 
the circle, which could not all the while forbear smiling? This I was told by a person of 




quality, who was present at the combat, and did not omit to reflect upon the indecencies 
that warmth in dispute often runs people into; which, since custom makes too frequent, 
education should take the more care of. 

§ 146 Company. — This that I have said here, if it were reflected on, would perhaps 
lead us a little farther, and let us see of what influence company is. 'Tis not the modes of 
civility alone that are imprinted by conversation; the tincture of company sinks deeper 
than the outside; and possibly, if a true estimate were made of the morality and religions 
of the world, we should find that the far greater part of mankind received even those 
opinions and ceremonies they would die for, rather from the fashions of their countries, 
and the constant practice of those about them, than from any conviction of their reasons. I 
mention this only to let you see of what moment I think company is to your son in all the 
parts of his life, and therefore how much that one part is to be weighed and provided for, 
it being of greater force to work upon him than all you can do besides. 

§ 147 Learning. — You will wonder, perhaps, that I put learning last, especially if I tell 
you I think it the least part. This will seem strange in the mouth of a bookish man: and 
this making usually the chief, if not only bustle and stir about children, this being almost 
that alone, which is thought on, when people talk of education, makes it the greater 
paradox. When I consider what a-do is made about a little Latin and Greek, how many 
years are spent in it, and what a noise and business it makes to no purpose, I can hardly 
forbear thinking that the parents of children still live in fear of the school-master's rod, 
which they look on as the only instrument of education; as a language or two to be its 
whole business. How else is it possible, that a child should be chained to the oar seven, 
eight, or ten of the best years of his life, to get a language or two, which I think might be 
had at a great deal cheaper rate of pains and time, and be learned almost in playing. 

Forgive me therefore, if I say, I cannot with patience think, that a young gentleman 
should be put into the herd, and be driven with a whip and scourge, as if he were to run 
the gauntlet through the several classes, "ad cariendum in genii cultum." "What then," say 
you, "would you not have him write and read? Shall he be more ignorant than the clerk of 
our parish, who takes Hopkins and Stembold for the best poets in the world, whom yet he 
makes worse than they are by his ill reading?" Not so, not so fast, I beseech you. 

Reading, and writing, and learning, I allow to be necessary, but yet not the chief business. 
I imagine you would think him a very foolish fellow, that should not value a virtuous or a 
wise man infinitely before a great scholar. Not but that I think learning a great help to 
both, in well-disposed minds; but yet it must be confessed also, that in others not so 
disposed, it helps them only to be the more foolish or worse men. I say this, that, when 
you consider of the breeding of your son, and are looking out for a school-master, or a 
tutor, you would not have (as is usual) Latin and logic only in your thoughts. Learning 
must be had, but in the second place, as subservient only to greater qualities. Seek out 
somebody that may know how discreetly to frame his manners; place him in hands where 
you may, as much as possible, secure his innocence, cherish and nurse up the good, and 
gently correct and weed out any bad inclinations, and settle in him good habits. This is 
the main point; and this being provided for, learning may be had into the bargain, and 
that, as I think, at a very easy rate, by methods that may be thought on. 




§ 148 Reading. — When he can talk, 'tis time he should begin to learn to read. But as to 
this, give me leave here to inculcate again what is very apt to be forgotten, viz. that a 
great care is to be taken that it be never made as a business to him, nor he look on it as a 
task. We naturally, as I said; even from our cradles, love liberty, and have therefore an 
aversion to many things for no other reason but because they are enjoined us. I have 
always had a fancy that learning might be made a play and recreation to children; and that 
they might be brought to desire to be taught, if it were proposed to them as a thing of 
honour, credit, delight, and recreation, or as a reward for doing something else, and if 
they were never chid or corrected for the neglect of it. That which confirms me in this 
opinion, is, that amongst the Portugueses, 'tis so much a fashion and emulation amongst 
their children to learn to read and write, that they cannot hinder them from it: they will 
learn it one from another and are as intent on it as if it were forbid them. I remember, that 
being at a friend's house, whose younger son, a child in coats, was not easily brought to 
his book (being taught to read at home by his mother) I advised to try another way than 
requiring it of him as his duty. We therefore, in a discourse on purpose amongst ourselves 
in his hearing but without taking any notice of him, declared, that it was the privilege and 
advantage of heirs and elder brothers to be scholars; that this made them fine gentlemen 
and beloved by everybody: and that for younger brothers, it was a favour to admit them 
to breeding; to be taught to read and write was more than came to their share; they might 
be ignorant bumpkins and clowns, if they pleased. This so wrought upon the child, that 
afterwards he desired to be taught; would come himself to his mother to learn: and would 
not let his maid be quiet, till she heard him his Lesson. I doubt not but some way like this 
might be taken with other children; and, when their tempers are found, some thoughts be 
instilled into them, that might set them upon desiring of learning themselves, and make 
them seek it, as another sort of play or recreation. But then, as I said before, it must never 
be imposed as a task, nor made a trouble to them. There may be dice and play-things, 
with the letters on them, to teach children the alphabet by playing; and twenty other ways 
may be found, suitable to their particular tempers, to make this kind of learning a sport to 
them. 

§ 149 Thus children may be cozened into a knowledge the letters; be taught to read 
without perceiving it to be anything but a sport, and play themselves into that others are 
whipped for. Children should not have anything like work, or serious, laid on them; 
neither their minds nor bodies will bear it. It injures their healths; and their being forced 
and tied down to their books, in an age at enmity with all such restraint, has; I doubt not, 
been the reason why a great many have hated books and learning all their lives after: it is 
like a surfeit, that leaves an aversion behind, not to be removed. 

§ 150 I have therefore thought, that if playthings were fitted to this purpose, as they are 
usually to none, contrivances might be made to teach children to read, whilst they thought 
they were only playing. For example; what if an ivory-ball were made like that of the 
Royal-Oak lottery, with thirty-two sides, or one rather of twenty-four or twenty-five 
sides; and upon several of those sides pasted on an A, upon several others B, on others C, 
and on others D? I would have you begin with but these four letters, or perhaps only two 
at first; and when he is perfect in them, then add another; and so on, till each side having 




one letter, there be on it the whole alphabet. This I would have others play with before 
him, it being as good a sort of play to lay a stake who shall first throw an A or B, as who 
upon dice shall throw six or seven. This being a play amongst you, tempt him not to it, 
lest you make it business; for I would not have him understand it is anything but a play of 
older people, and I doubt not but he will take to it of himself. And that he may hate the 
more reason to think it is a play, that he is sometimes in favour admitted to, when the 
play is done, the ball should be laid up safe out of his reach, that so it may not, by his 
having it in his keeping at any time, grow stale to him. 

§151 To keep up his eagerness to it, let him think it a game belonging to those above 
him; and when by this means he knows the letters, by changing them into syllables, he 
may learn to read, without knowing how he did so, and never have any chiding or trouble 
about it, nor fall out with books, because of the hard usage and vexation they have caused 
him. Children, if you observe them, take abundance of pains to learn several games, 
which, if they should be enjoined them, they would abhor as a task and business. I know 
a person of great quality (more yet to be honoured for his learning and virtue than for his 
rank and high place) who, by pasting on the six vowels (for in our language Y is one) on 
the six sides of a die, and the remaining eighteen consonants on the sides of three other 
dice, has made this a play for his children, that he shall win, who, at one cast, throws 
most words on these four dice; whereby his eldest son, yet in coats, has played himself 
into spelling, with great eagerness, and without once having been chid for it, or forced to 
it. 

§152 I have seen little girls exercise whole hours together, and take abundance of pains 
to be expert at dibstones, as they call it. Whilst I have been looking on, I have thought it 
wanted only some good contrivance to make them employ all that industry about 
something that might be more useful to them; and methinks it is only the fault and 
negligence of elder people that it is not so. Children are much less apt to be idle than 
men; and men are to be blamed, if some part of that busy humour be not turned to useful 
things; which might be made usually as delightful to them as those they are employed in, 
if men would be but half so forward to lead the way as these little apes would be to 
follow. I imagine some wise Portuguese heretofore began this fashion amongst the 
children of his country, where I have been told, as I said, it is impossible to hinder the 
children from learning to read and write: and in some parts of France they teach one 
another to sing and dance from the cradle. 

§153 The letters pasted upon the sides of the dice, or polygon, were best to be of the 
size of those of the folio Bible to begin with, and none of them capital letters when once 
he can read what is printed in such letters, he will not long be ignorant of the great ones: 
and in the beginning he should not be perplexed with variety. With this die also, you 
might have a play just like the Royal-Oak, which would be another variety; and play for 
cherries, or apples, etc. 



§154 Besides these, twenty other plays might be invented; depending on letters, which 
those, who like this way, may easily contrive, and get made to this use, if they will. But 




the four dice above-mentioned I think so easy and useful, that it will be hard to find any 
better, and there will be scarce need of any other. 

§155 Thus much for learning to read, which let him never be driven to, nor chid for; 
cheat him into it if you can, but make it not a business for him. 'Tis better it be a year 
later before he can read, than that he should this way get an aversion to learning. If you 
have any contests with him, let it be in matters of moment, of truth, and good-nature; but 
lay no task on him about ABC. Use your skill to make his will supple and pliant to 
reason: teach him to love credit and commendation; to abhor being thought ill or meanly 
of, especially by you and his mother; and then the rest will come all easily. But, I think, if 
you will do that, you must not shackle and tie him up with rules about indifferent matters, 
nor rebuke him for every little fault, or perhaps some that to others would seem great 
ones. But of this I have said enough already. 

§ 156 When by these gentle ways he begins to be able to read, some easy, pleasant 
book, suited to his capacity, should be put into his hands, wherein the entertainment that 
he finds might draw him on, and reward his pains in reading; and yet not such as should 
fill his head with perfectly useless trumpery, or lay the principles of vice and folly. To 
this purpose I think Aesop's Fables the best, which being stories apt to delight and 
entertain a child, may yet afford useful reflections to a grown man; and if his memory 
retain them all his life after, he will not repent to find them there, amongst his manly 
thoughts and serious business. If his Aesop has pictures in it, it will entertain him much 
the better, and encourage him to read when it carries the increase of knowledge with it: 
for such visible objects children bear talked of in vain, and without any satisfaction, 
whilst they have no ideas of them; those ideas being not to be had from sounds, but from 
the things themselves, or their pictures. And therefore, I think, as soon as he begins to 
spell, as many pictures of animals should be got him as can be found, with the printed 
names to them, which at the same time will invite him to read, and afford him matter of 
inquiry and knowledge. Reynard the Fox is another book, I think, that may be made use 
of to the same purpose. And if those about him will talk to him often about the stories he 
has read, and hear him tell them, it will, besides other advantages, add encouragement 
and delight to his reading, when he finds there is some use and pleasure in it, which in the 
ordinary method, I think, learners do not till late; and so take books only for fashionable 
amusements, or impertinent troubles, good for nothing. 

§ 157 The Lord's Prayer, the Creeds, and Ten Commandments, 'tis necessary he should 
learn perfectly by heart; hut, I think, not by reading them himself in his primer, but by 
somebody's repeating them to him, even before he can read. But learning by heart, and 
learning to read, should not, I think, be mixed, and so one made to clog the other. But his 
learning to read should be made as little trouble or business to him as might be. 

What other books there are in English of the kind of those above-mentioned, fit to engage 
the liking of children, and tempt them to read, I do not know; but am apt to think that 
children, being generally delivered over to the method of schools, where the fear of the 
rod is to enforce, and not any pleasure of the employment to invite them to learn; this sort 
of useful books, amongst the number of silly ones that are of all sorts, have yet had the 




fate to be neglected; and nothing that I know has been considered of this kind out of the 
ordinary road of the horn-book, primer, psalter, Testament, and Bible. 

§ 158 As for the Bible, which children are usually employed in to exercise and improve 
their talent in reading, I think, the promiscuous reading of it through by chapters as they 
lie in order, is so far from being of any advantage to children, either for the perfecting 
their reading or principling their religion, that perhaps a worse could not be found. For 
what pleasure or encouragement can it be to a child, to exercise himself in reading those 
parts of a book where he understands nothing? And how little are the law of Moses, the 
Song of Solomon, the prophecies in the Old, and the Epistles and Apocalypse in the New 
Testament, suited to a child's capacity? And though the history of the Evangelists and the 
Acts have something easier; yet, taken all together, it is very disproportionate to the 
understanding of childhood. I grant, that the principles of religion are to be drawn from 
thence, and in the words of the Scripture; yet none should be proposed to a child but such 
as are suited to a child's capacity and notions. But it is far from this to read through the 
whole Bible, and that for reading's sake. And what an odd jumble of thoughts must a 
child have in his head, if he have any at all, such as he should have concerning religion, 
who in his tender age reads all the parts of the Bible indifferently, as the word of God, 
without any other distinction. I am apt to think that this, in some men, has been the very 
reason why they never had clear and distinct thoughts of it all their lifetime. 

§159 And now I am by chance fallen on this subject, give me leave to say, that there 
are some parts of the Scripture which may be proper to be put into the hands of a child to 
engage him to read; such as are the story of Joseph and his brethren, of David and 
Goliath, of David and Jonathan, etc., and others, that he should be made to read for his 
instruction; as that, "What you would have others do unto you, do you the same unto 
them;"and such other easy and plain moral rules, which, being fitly chosen, ought often 
be made use of, both for reading and instruction together. But the reading of the whole 
Scripture indifferently is what I think very inconvenient for children, till, after having 
been made acquainted with the plainest fundamental parts of it, they have got some kind 
of general view of what they ought principally to believe and practice, which yet, I think, 
they ought to receive in the very words of the Scripture, and not in such, as men 
prepossessed by systems and analogies, are apt in this case to make use of, and force 
upon them. Dr. Worthington, to avoid this, has made a catechism which has all its 
answers in the precise words of the Scripture, a thing of good example and such a sound 
form of words, as no Christian can except against as not fit for his child to learn. Of this, 
as soon as he can say the Lord's Prayer, Creed, and Ten Commandments by heart, it may 
be fit for him to learn a question every day, or every week, as his understanding is able to 
receive and his memory to retain them. And when he has this catechism perfectly by 
heart, so as readily and roundly to answer to any question in the whole book, it may be 
convenient to lodge in his mind the moral rules, scattered up and down in the Bible, as 
the best exercise of his memory, and that which may be always a rule to him, ready at 
hand, in the whole conduct of his life. 

§160 Writing. — When he can read English well, it will be seasonable to enter him in 
writing. And here the first thing should be taught him is, to hold his pen right; and this he 




should be perfect in, before he should be suffered to put it to paper: for not only children, 
but anybody else, that would do anything well, should never be put upon too much of it at 
once, or be set to perfect themselves in two parts of an action at the same time, if they can 
possibly be separated. When he has learned to hold his pen right, (to hold it betwixt the 
thumb and forefinger alone, I think best; but on this you should consult some good 
writing-master, or any other person who writes well and quick) then next be should learn 
how to lay his paper, and place his arm and body to it. These practices being got over, the 
way to teach him to write without much trouble, is to get a plate graved with the 
characters of such a hand as you like best: but you must remember to have them a pretty 
deal bigger than he should ordinarily write; for every one naturally comes by degrees to 
write a less hand than he at first was taught, but never a bigger. Such a plate being 
graved, let several sheets of good writing-paper be printed off with red ink, which he has 
nothing to do but to go over with a good pen filled with black ink, which will quickly 
bring his hand to the formation of those characters, being at first showed where to begin, 
and how to form every letter. And when he can do that well, he must then exercise on fair 
paper; and so may easily be brought to write the hand you desire. 

§161 Drawing. — When he can write well, and quick, I think it may be convenient, not 
only to continue the exercise of his hand in writing, but also to improve the use of it 
farther in drawing, a thing very useful to a gentleman on several occasions, but especially 
if be travel, as that which helps a man often to express, in a few lines well put together, 
what a whole sheet of paper in writing would not be able to represent and make 
intelligible. How many buildings may a man see, how many machines and habits meet 
with, the ideas whereof would be easily retained and communicated by a little skill in 
drawing; which being committed to words, are in danger to be lost, or at best but ill 
retained in the most exact descriptions? I do not mean that I would have your son a 
perfect painter; to be that to any tolerable degree, will require more time than a young 
gentleman can spare from his other improvements of greater importance; but so much 
insight into perspective, and skill in drawing, as will enable him to represent tolerably on 
paper any thing he sees, except faces, may, I think, be got in a little time, especially if he 
have a genius to it: but where that is wanting, unless it be in the things absolutely 
necessary, it is better to let him pass them by quietly, than to vex him about them to no 
purpose: and therefore in this, as in all other things not absolutely necessary, the rule 
holds, "Nihil invita Minerva." 

Short-hand, an art, as I have been told, known only in England, may perhaps be thought 
worth the learning, both for despatch in what men write for their own memory, and 
concealment of what they would not have lie open to every eye. For he that has once 
learned any sort of Character, may easy, and with more contraction suit it to the business 
he would employ it in. Mr. Rich's, the best contrived of any I have seen, may, as I think, 
by one who knows and considers grammar well, be made much easier and shorter. But 
for the learning this compendious way of writing, there will be no need hastily to look out 
[for] a master; it will be early enough when any convenient opportunity offers itself at 
any time, after his hand is well settled in fair and quick writing. For boys have but little 
use of short-hand, and should be no means practice it till they write perfectly well, and 
have thoroughly fixed the habit of doing so. 




§162 French. — As soon as he can speak English, it is time for him to learn some other 
language: this nobody doubts of, when French is proposed. And the reason is, because 
people are accustomed to the right way of teaching that language, which is by talking it 
into children in constant conversation, and not by grammatical rules. The Latin tongue 
would easily be taught the same way, if his tutor, being constantly with him, would talk 
nothing else to him, and make him answer still in the same language. But because French 
is a living language, and to be used more in speaking, that should be first learned, that the 
yet pliant organs of speech might be accustomed to a due formation of these sounds, and 
he get the habit of pronouncing French well, which is the harder to be done the longer it 
is delayed. 

§163 Latin. — When he can speak and read French well, which in this method is 
usually in a year or two, he should proceed to Latin, which 'tis a wonder parents, when 
they have had the experiment in French, should not think ought to be learned the same 
way by talking and reading. Only care is to be taken, whilst he is learning these foreign 
languages, by speaking and reading nothing else to his tutor, that he do not forget to read 
English, which may be preserved by his mother, or somebody else, hearing him read 
some chosen parts of the Scripture, or other English book, every day. 

§164 Latin I look upon as absolutely necessary to a gentleman; and indeed custom, 
which prevails over every thing, has made it so much a part of education, that even those 
children are whipped to it, and made spend many hours of their precious time uneasily in 
Latin, who, after they are once gone from school, are never to have more to do with it as 
long as they live. Can there be anything more ridiculous than that a father should waste 
his own money, and his son's time, in setting him to learn the Roman language, when, at 
the same time, he designs him for a trade, wherein he, having no use of Latin, fails not to 
forget that little which he brought from school, and which it is ten to one he abhors for 
the ill usage it procured him? Could it be believed, unless we had everywhere amongst us 
examples of it, that a child should be forced to learn the rudiments of a language which 
he is never to use in the course of life he is designed to, and neglect all the while the 
writing a good hand, and casting accounts, which are of great advantage in all conditions 
of life, and to most trades indispensably necessary? But though these qualifications, 
requisite to trade and commerce, and the business of the world, are seldom or never to be 
had at grammar-schools, yet thither not only gentlemen send their younger sons, intended 
for trades, but even tradesmen and farmers fail not to send their children, though they 
have neither intention nor ability to make them scholars. If you ask them, why they do 
this, they think it as strange a question, as if you should ask them, why they go to church. 
Custom serves for reason, and has, to those that take it for reason, so consecrated this 
method, that it is almost religiously observed by them; and they stick to it, as if their 
children had scarce an orthodox education unless they learned Lily's grammar. 

§165 But how necessary soever Latin be to some, and is thought to be to others, to 
whom it is of no manner of use or service, yet the ordinary way of learning it in a 
grammar-school, is that, which having had thoughts about, I cannot be forward to 
encourage. The reasons against it are so evident and cogent, that they have prevailed with 




some intelligent persons to quit the ordinary road, not without success, though the 
method made use of was not exactly that which I imagine the easiest, and in short is this: 
to trouble the child with no grammar at all, but to have Latin, as English has been, 
without the perplexity of rules, talked into him; for, if you will consider it, Latin is no 
more unknown to a child, when he comes into the world, than English: and yet he learns 
English without master, rule, or grammar; and so might he Latin too, as Tully did, if he 
had somebody always to talk to him in this language. And when we so often see a French 
woman teach an English girl to speak and read French perfectly in a year or two, without 
any rule of grammar, or anything else, but prattling to her, I cannot but wonder, how 
gentlemen have overseen this way for their sons, and thought them more dull or 
incapable than their daughters. 

§166 If therefore a man could be got who himself speaks good Latin, who would be 
always about your son and talk constantly to him and make him read Latin, that would be 
the true, genuine and easy way of teaching him Latin, and that I could wish; since besides 
teaching him a language without pains or chiding (which children are wont to be whipped 
for at school six or seven years together) he might at the same time not only form his 
mind and manners, but instruct him also in several sciences such as are a good part of 
geography, astronomy, chronology, anatomy, besides some parts of history and all other 
parts of knowledge of things that fall under the senses, and require little more than 
memory. For there, if we would take the true way, our knowledge should begin and in 
those things be laid the foundation, and not in the abstract notions of logic and 
metaphysics, which are fitter to amuse than inform the understanding in its first setting 
out towards knowledge. In which abstract speculations when young men have had their 
heads employed a while, without finding the success and improvement or use of it which 
they expected, they are apt to have mean thoughts either of learning or themselves, to quit 
their studies and throw away their books, as containing nothing but hard words and 
empty sounds; or even concluding that if there be any real knowledge in them, they 
themselves have not understanding capable of it; and that that is so, perhaps I could 
assure you upon my own experience. Amongst other things to be learned by a young man 
in this method, whilst others of his age are wholly taken up with Latin and languages, I 
may also set down geometry for one, having known a young gentleman, bred something 
after this way, able to demonstrate several propositions in Euclid before he was thirteen. 

§167 But if such a man cannot be got who speaks good Latin, and being able to 
instruct your son in all these parts of knowledge, will undertake it by this method; the 
next best is to have him taught as near this way as may be, which is by taking some easy 
and pleasant book, such as Aesop's Fables, and writing the English translation (made as 
literal as it can be) in one line, and the Latin words, which answer each of them, just over 
it in another. These let him read every day over and over again, till he perfectly 
understands the Latin. (But have a care still, whatever you are teaching him, of clogging 
him with too much at once, or making anything his business but down-right virtue, or 
reproving him for anything but vice.) And then go on to another fable, till he be also 
perfect in that, not omitting what he is already perfect in, but sometimes reviewing that, 
to keep it in his memory. And when he comes to write, let these be set him for copies, 
which, with the exercise of his hand, will also advance him in Latin. This being a more 




imperfect way than by talking Latin unto him; the formation of the verbs first, and 
afterwards the declensions of the nouns and pronouns perfectly learned by heart, may 
facilitate his acquaintance with the genius and manner of the Latin tongue, which varies 
the signification of verbs and nouns, not as the modern languages do, by particles 
prefixed, but by changing the last syllables. More than this of grammar I think he need 
not have, till he can read himself Sanctii Minerva, with Scioppius' and Perizonius's notes. 

In teaching of children this too, I think, it is to be observed, that in most cases, where they 
stick, they are apt to be farther puzzled, by putting them upon finding it out themselves; 
as by asking such questions as these, viz., Which is the nominative case in the sentence 
they are to construe, or demanding what "ausero" signifies, to lead them to the 
knowledge what "abstulere" signifies, etc., when they cannot readily tell. This wastes 
time only in disturbing them; them; for whilst they are learning, and applying themselves 
with attention, they are to be kept in good humour, and everything made easy to them, 
and as, pleasant as possible. Therefore, wherever they are at a stand, and are willing to go 
forward, help them presently over the difficulty, without any rebuke or chiding; 
remembering, that where harsher ways are taken, they are the effect only of pride and 
peevishness in the teacher, who expects children should instantly be masters of as much 
as he knows: whereas he should rather consider that his business is to settle in them 
habits, not angrily to inculcate rules, which serve for little in the conduct of our lives; at 
least are of no use to children, who forget them as soon as given. In sciences, where their 
reason is to be exercised, I will not deny but this method may sometimes be varied, and 
difficulties proposed on purpose to excite industry and accustom the mind to employ its 
own strength and sagacity in reasoning. But yet, I guess, this is not to be done to children 
whilst very young; nor at their entrance upon any sort of knowledge: then everything of 
itself is difficult, and the great use and skill of a teacher is to make all as easy as he can. 
But particularly in learning of languages there is least occasion for posing of children. 

For languages being to be learnt by rote, custom, and memory, are then spoken in greatest 
perfection, when all rules of grammar are utterly forgotten. I grant the grammar of a 
language is sometimes very carefully to be studied: but it is only to be studied by a grown 
man, when he applies himself to the understanding of any language critically, which is 
seldom the business of any but professed scholars. This, I think, will be agreed to, that if 
a gentleman be to study any language, it ought to be that of his own country, that he may 
understand the language, which he has constant use of, with the utmost accuracy. 

There is yet a farther reason why masters and teachers should raise no difficulties to their 
scholars; but, on the contrary, should smooth their way and readily help them forwards 
where they find them stop. Children's minds are narrow and weak, and usually 
susceptible but of one thought at once. Whatever is in a child's head, fills it for the time, 
especially if set on with any passion. It should therefore be the skill and art of the teacher, 
to clear their heads of all other thoughts, whilst they are learning of any thing, the better 
to make room for what he would instil into them, that it may be received with attention 
and application, without which it leaves no impression. The natural temper of children 
disposes their minds to wander. Novelty alone takes them; whatever that presents, they 
are presently eager to have a taste of, and are as soon satiated with it. They quickly grow 
weary of the same thing, and so have almost their whole delight in change and variety. It 




is a contradiction to the natural state of childhood for them to fix their fleeting thoughts. 
Whether this be owing to the temper of their brains, or the quickness or instability of their 
animal spirits, over which the mind has not yet got a full command; this is visible, that it 
is a pain to children to keep their thoughts steady to any thing. A lasting, continued 
attention is one of the hardest tasks that can be imposed on them: and therefore, he that 
requires their application, should endeavour to make what he proposes as grateful and 
agreeable as possible; at least, he ought to take care not to join any displeasing or 
frightful idea with it. If they come not to their books with some kind of liking and relish, 
it is no wonder their thoughts should be perpetually shifting from what disgusts them, and 
seek better entertainment in more pleasing objects, after which they will unavoidably be 
gadding. 

It is, I know, the usual method of tutors to endeavour to procure attention in their 
scholars, and to fix their minds to the business in hand by rebukes and corrections, if they 
find them over so little wandering. But such treatment is sure to produce the quite 
contrary effect. Passionate words or blows from the tutor, fill the child's mind with terror 
and affrightment, which immediately takes it wholly up, and leaves no room for other 
impressions. I believe there is nobody that reads this, but may recollect what disorder 
hasty or imperious words from his parents or teachers have caused in his thoughts; how 
for the time it has turned his brains so that he scarce knew what was said by or to him: he 
presently lost the sight of what he was upon; his mind was filled with disorder and 
confusion, and in that state was no longer capable of attention to any thing else. 

It is true, parents and governors ought to settle and establish their authority, by an awe 
over the minds of those under their tuition; and to rule them by that: but when they have 
got an ascendant over them, they should use it with great moderation, and not make 
themselves such scarecrows, that their scholars should always tremble in their sight. Such 
an austerity may make their government easy to themselves, but of very little use to their 
pupils. It is impossible children should learn any thing whilst their thoughts are possessed 
and disturbed with any passion, especially fear, which makes the strongest impression on 
their yet tender and weak spirits. Keep the mind in an easy, calm temper, when you 
would have it receive your instructions, or any increase of knowledge. It is as impossible 
to draw fair and regular characters on a trembling mind, as on a shaking paper. 

The great skill of a teacher is to get and keep the attention of his scholar: whilst he has 
that, he is sure to advance as fast as the learner's abilities will carry him, and without that, 
all his bustle and pother will be to little or no purpose. To attain this, he should make the 
child comprehend (as much as may be) the usefulness of what he teaches him; and let 
him see, by what he has learned, that he can do something which he could not do before, 
something which gives him some power and real advantage above others who are 
ignorant of it. To this he should add sweetness in all his instructions; and by a certain 
tenderness in his whole carriage, make the child sensible that he loves him, and designs 
nothing but his good; the only way to beget love in the child, which will make him 
hearken to his lessons, and relish what he teaches him. 




Nothing but obstinacy should meet with any imperiousness or rough usage. All other 
faults should be corrected with a gentle hand; and kind, encouraging words will work 
better and more effectually upon a willing mind, and even prevent a good deal of that 
perverseness which rough and imperious usage often produces in well-disposed and 
generous minds. It is true, obstinacy and wilful neglects must be mastered, even though it 
cost blows to do it: but I am apt to think perverseness in the pupils is often the effect of 
frowardness in the tutor; and that most children would seldom have deserved blows, if 
needless and misapplied roughness had not taught them ill-nature, and given them an 
aversion to their teacher, and all that comes from him. 

Inadvertency, forgetfulness, unsteadiness, and wandering of thought, are the natural faults 
of childhood; and therefore, when they are not observed to be wilful, are to be mentioned 
softly, and gained upon by time. If every slip of this kind produces anger and rating, the 
occasions of rebuke and corrections will return so often, that the tutor will be a constant 
terror and uneasiness to his pupils; which one thing is enough to hinder their profiting by 
his lessons, and to defeat all his methods of instructions. 

Let the awe he has got upon their minds be so tempered with the constant marks of 
tenderness and good-will, that affection may spur them to their duty, and make them find 
a pleasure in complying with his dictates. This will bring them with satisfaction to their 
tutor make them hearken to him, as to one who is their friend, that cherishes them, and 
takes pains for their good; this will keep their thoughts easy and free, whilst they are with 
him, the only temper wherein the mind is capable of receiving new informations, and of 
admitting into itself those impressions, which if not taken and retained, all that they and 
their teacher do together, is lost labour; there is much uneasiness, and little learning. 

§168 When, by this way of interlining Latin and English one with another, he has got a 
moderate knowledge of the Latin tongue, he may then be advanced a little farther to the 
reading of some other easy Latin book, such as Justin, or Eutropius; and to make the 
reading and understanding of it the less tedious and difficult to him, let him help himself, 
if he please, with the English translation. Nor let the objection, that he will then know it 
only by rote (which is when well considered not of any moment against, but plainly for 
this way of learning a language), fright any one. For languages are only to be learned by 
rote; and a man, who does not speak English or Latin perfectly by rote, so that having 
thought of the thing he would speak of, his tongue of course, without thought of rule of 
grammar, falls into the proper expressions and idiom of that language, does not speak it 
well, nor is master of it. And I would fain have any one name to me that tongue, that any 
one can learn or speak as he should do, by the rules of grammar. Languages were made 
not by rules or art, but by accident, and the common use of the people. And he that will 
speak them well, has no other rule but that; nor any thing to trust to but his memory, and 
the habit of speaking after the fashion learned from those that are allowed to speak 
properly, which, in other words, is only to speak by rote. 

Grammar. — It will possibly be asked here, Is grammar then of no use? And have those 
who have taken so much pains in reducing several languages to rules and observations, 
who have written so much about declensions and conjugations, about concords and 




syntaxis, lost their labour, and been learned to no purpose? I say not so; grammar has its 
place, too. But this I think I may say, There is more stir a great deal made with it than 
there needs, and those are tormented about it, to whom it does not at all belong; I mean 
children, at the age wherein they are usually perplexed with it in grammar schools. 

There is nothing more evident, than that languages learned by rote serve well enough for 
the common affairs of life, and ordinary commerce. Nay, persons of quality of the softer 
sex, and such of them as have spent their time in well-bred company, show us, that this 
plain, natural way, without the least study or knowledge of grammar, can carry them to a 
great degree of elegance and politeness in their language: and there are ladies who, 
without knowing what tenses and participles, adverbs and prepositions are, speak as 
properly, and as correctly (they might take it for an ill compliment, if I said as any 
country school-master) as most gentlemen who have been bred up in the ordinary 
methods of grammar-schools. Grammar therefore we see may be spared in some cases. 
The question then will be, To whom should it be taught, and when? To this I answer, 

1 . Men learn languages for the ordinary intercourse of society, and communication of 
thoughts in common life, without any farther design in their use of them. And for this 
purpose the original way of learning a language by conversation, not only serves well 
enough, but is to be preferred, as the most expedite, proper, and natural. Therefore to this 
use of language one may answer, that grammar is not necessary. This so many of my 
readers must be forced to allow, as understand what I here say, and who, conversing with 
others, understand them without having ever been taught the grammar of the English 
tongue: which I suppose is the case of incomparably the greatest part of Englishmen; of 
whom I have never yet known any one who learned his rnother-tongue by rules. 

2. Others there are, the greatest part of whose business in this world is to be done with 
their tongues, and with their pens; and to those it is convenient, if not necessary, that they 
should speak properly and correctly, whereby they may let their thoughts into other men's 
minds the more easily and with the greater impression. Upon this account it is, that any 
sort of speaking, so as will make him be understood, is not thought enough for a 
gentleman. He ought to study grammar, amongst the other helps of speaking well: but it 
must be the grammar of his own tongue, of the language he uses, that he may understand 
his own country speech nicely, and speak it properly, without shocking the ears of those 
it is addressed to, with solecisms; and offensive irregularities. And to this purpose 
grammar is necessary: but it is the grammar only of their own proper tongues, and to 
those only who would take pains in cultivating their language, and in perfecting their 
styles. Whether all gentlemen should not do this, I leave to be considered, since the want 
of propriety and grammatical exactness is thought very misbecoming one of that rank, 
and usually draws on one guilty of such faults the censure of having had a lower breeding 
and worse company than suits with his quality. If this be so (as I suppose it is), it will be 
matter of wonder, why young gentlemen are forced to learn the grammars of foreign and 
dead languages, and are never once told of the grammar of their own tongues: they do not 
so much as know there is any such thing, much less is it made their business to be 
instructed in it. Nor is their own language ever proposed to them as worthy their care and 
cultivating, though they have daily use of it, and are not seldom in the future course of 




their lives judged of, by their handsome or awkward way of expressing themselves in it. 
Whereas the languages, whose grammars they have been so much employed in, are such 
as probably they shall scarce ever speak or write; or, if upon occasion this should happen, 
they shall be excused for the mistakes and faults they make in it. Would not a Chinese, 
who took notice of this way of breeding, be apt to imagine that all our young gentlemen 
were designed to be teachers and professors of the dead languages of foreign countries, 
and not to be men of business in their own. 

3. There is a third sort of men who apply themselves to two or three foreign dead (and 
which amongst us are called the learned) languages, make them their study, and pique 
themselves upon their skill in them. No doubt those who propose to themselves the 
learning of any language with this view, and would be critically exact in it, ought 
carefully to study the grammar of it. I would not be mistaken here, as if this were to 
undervalue Greek and Latin: I grant these are languages of great use and excellency; and 
a man can have no place amongst the learned, in this part of the world, who is a stranger 
to them. But the knowledge a gentleman would ordinarily draw for his use, out of the 
Roman and Greek writers, I think he may attain without studying the grammars of those 
tongues, and, by bare reading, may come to understand them sufficiently for all his 
purposes. How much farther he shall at any time be concerned to look into the grammar 
and critical niceties of either of these tongues, he himself will be able to determine, when 
he comes to propose to himself the study of anything that shall require it. Which brings 
me to the other part of the inquiry, viz. "When grammar should he taught?" 

To which, upon the premised grounds, the answer is obvious, viz.- That if grammar ought 
to be taught at any time, it must be to one that can speak the language already: how else 
can he be taught the grammar of it? This, at least, is evident from the practice of the wise 
and learned nations amongst the ancients. They made it a part of education to cultivate 
their own, not foreign tongues. The Greeks counted all other nations barbarous, and had a 
contempt for their languages. And, though the Greek learning grew in credit amongst the 
Romans, towards the end of their commonwealth, yet it was the Roman tongue that was 
made the study of their youth: their own language they were to make use of, and 
therefore it was their own language they were instructed and exercised in. 

But more particularly to determine the proper season for grammar, I do not see how it can 
reasonably be made any one's study, but as an introduction to rhetoric: when it is thought 
time to put any one upon the care of polishing his tongue, and of speaking better than the 
illiterate, then is the time for him to be instructed in the rules of grammar, and not before. 
For grammar being to teach men not to speak, but to speak correctly, and according to the 
exact rules of the tongue, which is one part of elegancy, there is little use of the one to 
him that has no need of the other: where rhetoric is not necessary, grammar may be 
spared. I know not why any one should waste his time, and beat his head about the Latin 
grammar, who does not intend to be a critic, or make speeches, and write dispatches in it. 
When any one finds in himself a necessity or disposition to study any foreign language to 
the bottom, and to be nicely exact in the knowledge of it, it will be time enough to take a 
grammatical survey of it. If his use of it be only to understand some books written in it, 




without a critical knowledge of the tongue itself, reading alone, as I have said, will attain 
this end, without charging the mind with the multiplied rules and intricacies of grammar. 

§169 For the exercise of his writing, let him sometimes translate Latin into English; 
but the learning of Latin being nothing but the learning of words, a very unpleasant 
business both to young and old, join as much other real knowledge with it as you can, 
beginning still with that which lies most obvious to the senses; such as is the knowledge 
of minerals, plants, and animals, and particularly timber and fruit-trees, their parts and 
ways of propagation, where a great deal may be taught a child, which will not be useless 
to the man. But more especially geography, astronomy, and anatomy. 

§170 But if, after all, his fate be to go to school to get the Latin tongue, 'tis in vain to 
talk to you concerning the method I think best to be observed in schools. You must 
submit to that you find there, not expect to have it changed for your son; but yet by all 
means obtain, if you can, that he be not employed in making Latin themes and 
declamations, and, least of all, verses of any kind. You may insist on it, if it will do any 
good, that you have no design to make him either a Latin orator or poet, but barely would 
have him understand perfectly a Latin author; and that you observe those who teach any 
of the modern languages, and that with success, never amuse their scholars to make 
speeches or verses either in Lrench or Italian, their business being language barely, and 
not invention. 

§171 Themes. — But to tell you, a little more fully, why I would not have him 
exercised in making of themes and verses. 1. As to themes, they have, I confess, the 
pretence of something useful, which is to teach people to speak handsomely and well on 
any subject; which, if it could be attained this way, I own would be a great advantage; 
there being nothing more becoming a gentleman, nor more useful in all the occurrences 
of life, than to be able, on any occasion, to speak well, and to the purpose. But this I say, 
that the making of themes, as is usual in schools, helps not one jot towards it. Lor do but 
consider what 'tis in making a theme, that a young lad is employed about; 'tis to make a 
speech on some Latin saying, as. Omnia vincit amor [Love conquers everything], or Non 
licet in hello bis peccare [In warfare, a mistake is not allowed twice], etc. And here the 
poor lad, who wants knowledge of these things he is to speak of, which is to be had only 
from time and observation, must set his invention on the rack, to say something where he 
knows nothing, which is a sort of Egyptian tyranny, to bid them make bricks who have 
not yet any of the materials. And therefore it is usual, in such cases, for the poor children 
to go to those of higher forms with this petition, "Pray give me a little sense;" which, 
whether it be more reasonable or more ridiculous, is not easy to determine. Before a man 
can be in any capacity to speak on any subject, it is necessary he be acquainted with it; or 
else it is as foolish to set him to discourse of it, as to set a blind man to talk of colours, or 
a deaf man of music. And would you not think him a little cracked who would require 
another to make an argument on a moot-point, who understands nothing of our laws? 

And what, I pray, do school-boys understand concerning those matters, which are used to 
be proposed to them in their themes, as subjects to discourse on, to whet and exercise 
their fancies? 




§ 172 In the next place consider the language that their themes are made in. 'Tis Latin, a 
language foreign in their country, and long since dead everywhere; a language which 
your son, 'tis a thousand to one, shall never have an occasion once to make a speech in as 
long as he lives, after he comes to be a man; and a language, wherein the manner of 
expressing oneself is so far different from ours, that to be perfect in that, would very little 
improve the purity and facility of his English style. Besides that, there is now so little 
room or use for set speeches in our own language in any part of our English business, that 
I can see no pretence for this sort of exercise in our schools unless it can be supposed, 
that the making of set Latin speeches should he the way to teach men to speak well in 
English extempore. The way to that I should think rather to be this: that there should be 
proposed some rational and material question to young gentlemen, when they are of a fit 
age for such exercise, which they should extempore or after a little meditation in the 
place, speak to, without penning of anything. For I ask, if we will examine the effects of 
this way of learning to speak well, who speak best in any business, when occasion calls 
them to it upon any debate; either those who have accustomed themselves to compose 
and write down beforehand what they would say; or those, who thinking only of the 
matter, to understand that as well as they can, use themselves only to speak extempore? 
And he that shall judge by this; will be little apt to think, that the accustoming him to 
studied speeches, and set compositions, is the way to fit a young gentleman for business. 

§173 But perhaps we shall be told, it is to improve and perfect them in the Latin 
tongue. It is true, that is their proper business at school; but the making of themes is not 
the way to it: that perplexes their brains, about invention of things to be said, not about 
the signification of words to be learnt: and when they are making a theme, it is thoughts 
they search and sweat for, and not language. But the learning and mastery of a tongue 
being uneasy and unpleasant enough in itself, should not be cumbered with any other 
difficulties, as is done in this way of proceeding. In fine, if boys' invention be to be 
quickened by such exercise, let them make themes in English, where they have facility 
and a command of words, and will better see what kind of thoughts they have, when put 
into their own language. And if the Latin tongue is to be learned, let it be done the easiest 
way, without toiling and disgusting the mind by so uneasy an employment as that of 
making speeches joined to it. 

§174 Verses. — If these may be any reasons against children's making Latin themes at 
school, I have much more to say, and of more weight, against their making verses, verses 
of any sort; for if he has no genius to poetry, it is the most unreasonable thing in the 
world to torment a child, and waste his time about that which can never succeed; and if 
he have a poetic vein, it is to me the strangest thing in the world, that the father should 
desire or suffer it to be cherished or improved. Methinks the parents should labour to 
have it stifled and suppressed as much as may be; and I know not what reason a father 
can have to wish his son a poet, who does not desire to have him bid defiance to all other 
callings and business which is not yet the worst of the case; for if he proves a successful 
rhymer, and gets once the reputation of a wit, I desire it may be considered what 
company and places he is like to spend his time in, nay, and estate too. For it is very 
seldom seen that any one discovers mines of gold or silver in Parnassus. 'Tis a pleasant 
air, but a barren soil; and there are very few instances of those who have added to their 




patrimony by anything they have reaped from thence. Poetry and gaming, which usually 
go together, are alike in this too, that they seldom bring any advantage, but to those who 
have nothing else to live on. Men of estates almost constantly go away losers; and 'tis 
well if they escape at a cheaper rate than their whole estates, or the greatest part of them. 
If therefore you would not have your son the fiddle to every jovial company, without 
whom the sparks could not relish their wine, nor know how to pass an afternoon idly; if 
you would not have him waste his time and estate to divert others, and contemn the dirty 
acres left him by his ancestors, I do not think you will much care he should be a poet, or 
that his school-master should enter him in versifying. But yet, if any one will think poetry 
a desirable quality in his son, and that the study of it would raise his fancy and parts, he 
must needs yet confess, that, to that end, reading the excellent Greek and Roman poets is 
of more use than making bad verses of his own, in a language that is not his own. And he, 
whose design it is to excel in English poetry, would not, I guess, think the way to it were 
to make his first essays in Latin verses. 

§ 175 Another thing, very ordinary in the vulgar method of grammar-schools, there is, 
of which I see no use at all, unless it be to balk young lads in the way of learning 
languages, which, in my opinion, should be made as easy and pleasant as may be; and 
that which was painful in it as much as possible quite removed. That which I mean, and 
here complain of, is, their being forced to learn by heart great parcels of the authors 
which are taught them; wherein I can discover no advantage at all, especially to the 
business they are upon. Languages are to be learnt only by reading and talking, and not 
by scraps of authors got by heart; which, when a man's head is stuffed with, he has got 
the just furniture of a pedant, and it is the ready way to make him one, than which there is 
nothing less becoming a gentleman. Lor what can be more ridiculous, than to mix the rich 
and handsome thoughts and sayings of others with a deal of poor stuff of his own; which 
is thereby the more exposed, and has no other grace in it, nor will otherwise recommend 
the speaker, than a thread-bare russet-coat would, that was set off with large patches of 
scarlet and glittering brocard? Indeed, where a passage comes in the way, whose matter is 
worth remembrance, and the expression of it very close and excellent (as there are many 
such in the ancient authors), it may not be amiss to lodge it in the minds of young 
scholars, and with such admirable strokes of those great masters sometimes exercise the 
memories of school-boys. But their learning of their lessons by heart, as they happen to 
fall out in their books without choice or distinction, I know not what it serves for, but to 
misspend their time and pains, and give them a disgust and aversion to their books, 
wherein they find nothing but useless trouble. 

§ 176 [Memorizing.] — I hear it is said, That children should be employed in getting 
things by heart, to exercise and improve their memories. I could wish this were said with 
as much authority of reason, as it is with forwardness of assurance; and that this practice 
were established upon good observation, more than old custom; for it is evident, that 
strength of memory is owing to a happy constitution, and not to any habitual 
improvement got by exercise. It is true, what the mind is intent upon, and for fear of 
letting it slip, often imprints afresh on itself by frequent reflection, that it is apt to retain, 
but still according to its own natural strength of retention. An impression made on bees- 
wax or lead will not last so long as on brass or steel. Indeed, if it be renewed often, it may 




last the longer; but every new reflecting on it is a new impression, is from thence one is 
to reckon, if one would know how long the mind retains it. But the learning pages of 
Latin by heart, no more fits the memory for retention of anything else, than the graving of 
one sentence in lead, makes it the more capable of retaining firmly any other characters. 

If such a sort of exercise of the memory were able to give it strength, and improve our 
parts, players of all other people must needs have the best memories, and be the best 
company: but whether the scraps they have got into their heads this way, make them 
remember other things the better; and whether their parts be improved proportionably to 
the pains they have taken in getting by heart other sayings, experience will show. 

Memory is so necessary to all parts and conditions of life, and so little is to be done 
without it, that we are not to fear it should grow dull and useless for want of exercise, if 
exercise would make it grow stronger. But I fear this faculty of the mind is not capable of 
much help and amendment in general, by any exercise or endeavour of ours, at least not 
by that used upon this pretence in grammar-schools. And if Xerxes was able to call every 
common soldier by his name, in his army; that consisted of no less than a hundred 
thousand men, I think it may be guessed he got not this wonderful ability by learning his 
lessons by heart, when he was a boy. This method of exercising and improving the 
memory by toilsome repetitions, without book, of what they read, is, I think, little used in 
the education of princes; which, if it had that advantage that is talked of, should be as 
little neglected in them, as in the meanest school-boys: princes having as much need of 
good memories as any men living, and have generally an equal share in this faculty with 
other men: though it has never been taken care of this way. What the mind is intent upon, 
and careful of, that it remembers best, and for the reason above-mentioned: to which if 
method and order be joined, all is done, I think, that can be, for the help of a weak 
memory; and he that will take any other way to do it, especially that of charging it with a 
train of other people's words, which he that learns cares not for, will, I guess, scarce find 
the profit answer half the time and pains employed in it. 

I do not mean hereby, that there should be no exercise given to children's memories. I 
think their memories should be employed, but not in learning by rote whole pages out of 
books, which, the lesson being once said, and that task over, are delivered up again to 
oblivion, and neglected for ever. This mends neither the memory nor the mind. What they 
should learn by heart out of authors, I have above mentioned: and such wise and useful 
sentences being once given in charge to their memories, they should never be suffered to 
forget again, but be often called to account for them: whereby, besides the use those 
sayings may be to them in their future life, as so many good rules and observations, they 
will be taught to reflect often, and bethink themselves what they have to remember, 
which is the only way to make the memory quick and useful. The custom of frequent 
reflection will keep their minds from running adrift, and call their thoughts home from 
useless, inattentive roving: and therefore, I think, it may do well, to give them something 
every day to remember; but something still, that is in itself worth the remembering, and 
what you would never have out of mind, whenever you call, or they themselves search 
for it. This will oblige them often to turn their thoughts inwards, than which you cannot 
wish them a better intellectual habit. 




§177 But under whose care soever a child is put to be taught, during the tender and 
flexible years of his life, this is certain, it should be one who thinks Latin and language 
the least part of education; one, who knowing how much virtue, and a well-tempered 
soul, is to be preferred to any sort of learning or language, makes it his chief business to 
form the mind of his scholars, and give that a right disposition: which, if once got, though 
all the rest should be neglected, would, in due time, produce all the rest; and which, if it 
be not got, and settled, so as to keep out ill and vicious habits, languages and sciences, 
and all the other accomplishments of education, will be to no purpose, but to make the 
worse or more dangerous man. And indeed, whatever stir there is made about getting of 
Latin, as the great and difficult business, his mother may teach it him herself, if she will 
but spend two or three hours in a day with him, and make him read the evangelists in 
Latin to her: for she need but buy a Latin Testament, and having got somebody to mark 
the last syllable but one, where it is long, in words above two syllables (which is enough 
to regulate her pronunciation, and accenting the words), read daily in the gospels, and 
then let her avoid understanding them in Latin, if she can. And when she understands the 
evangelists in Latin, let her, in the same manner, read Aesop's Fables, and so proceed on 
to Eutropius, Justin, and other such books. I do not mention this, as an imagination of 
what I fancy may do, but as of a thing I have known done, and the Latin tongue, with 
ease, got this way. 

But to return to what I was saying: he that takes on him the charge of bringing up young 
men, especially young gentlemen, should have something more in him than Latin, more 
than even a knowledge in the liberal sciences; he should be a person of eminent virtue 
and prudence, and with good sense have good humour, and the skill to carry himself with 
gravity, ease, and kindness, in a constant conversation with his pupils. 

§178 At the same time that he is learning French and Latin, a child, as has been said, 
may also be entered in arithmetic, geography, chronology, history, and geometry, too. For 
if these be taught him in French or Fatin, when he begins once to understand either of 
these tongues, he will get a knowledge in these sciences, and the language to boot. 

Geography — Geography, I think, should be begun with; for the learning of the figure of 
the globe, the situation and boundaries of the four parts of the world, and that of 
particular kingdoms and countries, being only an exercise of the eyes and memory, a 
child with pleasure will learn and retain them: and this is so certain, that I now live in the 
house with a child whom his mother has so well instructed this way in geography, that he 
knew the limits of the four parts of the world, could readily point, being asked, to any 
country upon the globe, or any county in the map of England; knew all the great rivers, 
promontories, straits, and bays in the world, and could find the longitude and latitude of 
any place, before he was six years old. These things that he will thus learn by sight, and 
have by rote in his memory, are not all, I confess, that he is to learn upon the globes. But 
yet it is a good step and preparation to it, and will make the remainder much easier, when 
his judgment is grown ripe enough for it: besides that, it gets so much time now; and by 
the pleasure of knowing things, leads him on insensibly to the gaining of languages. 




§ 179 Arithmetic. — When he has the natural parts of the globe well fixed in his 
memory, it may then be time to begin arithmetic. By the natural parts of the globe, I mean 
the several positions of the parts of the earth and sea, under different names and 
distinctions of countries; not coming yet to those artificial and imaginary lines, which 
have been invented, and are only supposed, for the better improvement of that science. 

§180 Arithmetic is the easiest, and consequently the first sort of abstract reasoning, 
which the mind commonly bears, or accustoms itself to: and is of so general use in all 
parts of life and business, that scarce any thing is to be done without it. This is certain, a 
man cannot have too much of it, nor too perfectly; he should therefore begin to be 
exercised in counting, as soon, and as far, as he is capable of it; and do something in it 
every day, till he is master of the art of numbers. When he understands addition and 
subtraction, he may then be advanced farther in geography, and after he is acquainted 
with the poles, zones, parallel circles, and meridians, be taught longitude and latitude, and 
the use of maps. Which when he can readily do, he may then be entered in the celestial; 
and there going over all the circles again, with a more particular observation of the 
ecliptic or zodiac, to fix them all very clearly and distinctly in his mind, he may be taught 
the figure and position of the several constellations which may be showed him first upon 
the globe, and then in the heavens. 

Astronomy. — When that is done, and he knows pretty well the constellations of this our 
hemisphere, it may be time to give him some notions of this our planetary world, and to 
that purpose it may not be amiss to make him a draught of the Copernican system; and 
therein explain to him the situation of the planets, their respective distances from the sun, 
the centre of their revolutions. This will prepare him to understand the motion and theory 
of the planets, the most easy and natural way. For since astronomers no longer doubt of 
the motion of the planets about the sun, it is fit he should proceed upon that hypothesis, 
which is not only the simplest and least perplexing for a learner, but also the likeliest to 
be true in itself. But in this, as in all other parts of instruction, great care must be taken 
with children, to begin with that which is plain and simple, and to teach them as little as 
can be at once, and settle that well in their heads, before you proceed to the next, or 
anything new in that science. Give them first one simple idea, and see that they take it 
right, and perfectly comprehend it, before you go any farther; and then add some other 
simple idea, which lies next in your way to what you aim it; and so proceeding by gentle 
and insensible steps, children, without confusion and amazement, will have their 
understandings opened, and their thoughts extended, farther than could have been 
expected. And when any one has learned any thing himself, there is no such way to fix it 
in his memory, and to encourage him to go on as to set him to teach it others. 

§181 Geometry. — When he has once got such an acquaintance with the globes, as is 
above-mentioned, he may be fit to be tried a little in geometry; wherein I think the six 
first books of Euclid enough for him to be taught. For I am in some doubt, whether more 
to a man of business be necessary or useful; at least if he have a genius and inclination to 
it, being entered so far by his tutor, he will be able to go on of himself, without a teacher. 
The globes therefore must he studied, and that diligently, and, I think, may be begun 
betimes, if the tutor will but be careful to distinguish, what the child is capable of 




knowing, and what not; for which this may be a rule, that perhaps will go a pretty way, 
viz., That children may be taught any thing that falls under their senses, especially their 
sight, as far as their memories only are exercised: and thus a child very young may learn, 
which is the equator, which the meridian, etc., which Europe, and which England upon 
the globes, as soon almost as he knows the rooms of the house he lives in; if care be taken 
not to teach him too much at once, nor to set him upon a new part till that, which he is 
upon, be perfectly learned and fixed in his memory. 

§ 182 Chronology. — With geography, chronology ought to go hand in hand; I mean the 
general part of it, so that he may have in his mind a view of the whole current of time, 
and the several considerable epochs that are made use of in history. Without these two, 
history, which is the great mistress of prudence, and civil knowledge; and ought to be the 
proper study of a gentleman, or man of business in the world; without geography and 
chronology, I say, history, will be very ill retained, and very little useful; but be only a 
jumble of matters of fact, confusedly heaped together without order or instruction. It is by 
these two, that the actions of mankind are ranked into their proper places of times and 
countries; under which circumstances, they are not only much easier kept in the memory, 
but in that natural order, are only capable to afford those observations which make a man 
the better and the abler for reading them. 

§ 183 When I speak of chronology as a science he should be perfect in, I do not mean 
the little controversies that are in it. These are endless, and most of them of so little 
importance to a gentleman, as not to deserve to be inquired into, were they capable of an 
easy decision. And therefore all that learned noise and dust of the chronologist is wholly 
to be avoided. The most useful book I have seen in that part of learning, is a small treatise 
of Strauchius, which is printed in twelves, under the title of Breviarium Chronologicum, 
out of which may be selected all that is necessary to be taught a young gentleman 
concerning chronology; for all that is in that treatise, a learner need not be cumbered 
with. He has in him the most remarkable or usual epochs reduced all to that of the Julian 
period, which is the easiest and plainest and surest method that can be made use of in 
chronology. To this treatise of Strauchius, Helvicus' tables may he added, as a book to be 
turned to on all occasions. 

§ 184 History. — As nothing teaches, so nothing delights, more than history. The first of 
these recommends it to the study of grown men, the latter makes me think it the fittest for 
a young lad, who, as soon as he is instructed in chronology, and acquainted with the 
several epochs in use in this part of the world, and can reduce them to the Julian period, 
should then have some Latin history put into his hand. The choice should be directed by 
the easiness of the style; for wherever he begins, chronology will keep it from confusion; 
and the pleasantness of the subject inviting him to read, the language will insensibly be 
got, without that terrible vexation and uneasiness, which children suffer where they are 
put into books beyond their capacity, such as are the Roman orators and poets, only to 
learn the Roman language. When he has by reading mastered the easier, such perhaps as 
Justin, Eutropius, Quintus Curtius, etc., the next degree to these will give him no great 
trouble, and thus by a gradual progress from the plainest and easiest historians, he may at 




last come to read the most difficult and sublime of the Latin authors, such as are Tully, 
Virgil, and Horace. 

§ 185 Ethics. — The knowledge of virtue, all along from the beginning, in all the 
instances he is capable of, being taught him, more by practice than rules; and the love of 
reputation, instead of satisfying his appetite, being made habitual in him; I know not 
whether he should read any other discourses of morality but what he finds in the Bible; or 
have any system of ethics put into his hand, till he can read Tully's Offices, not as a 
school-boy to learn Latin, but as one that would be informed in the principles and 
precepts of virtue for the conduct of his life. 

§ 186 Civil Law. — When he has pretty well digested Tully's Offices, and added to it 
Puffendorf de officio hominis et civis, it may be seasonable to set him upon Grotius de 
jure belli et pacis, or, which perhaps is the better of the two, Puffendorf de jure naturali et 
gentium, wherein he will be instructed in the natural rights of men, and the original and 
foundations of society, and the duties resulting from thence. This general part of civil law 
and history, are studies which a gentleman should not barely touch at, but constantly 
dwell upon and never have done with. A virtuous and well-behaved young man, that is 
well versed in the general part of the civil law (which concerns not the chicane of private 
cases, but the affairs and intercourse of civilized nations in general, grounded upon 
principles of reason), understands Latin well, and can write a good hand, one may turn 
loose into the world, with great assurance that he will find employment and esteem every 
where. 

§ 187 Law. — It would be strange to suppose an English gentleman should be ignorant 
of the law of his country. This, whatever station he is in, is so requisite that from a justice 
of the peace to a minister of state, I know no place he can well fill without it. I do not 
mean the chicane or wrangling and captious part of the law; a gentleman whose business 
it is to seek the true measures of right and wrong, and not the arts how to avoid doing the 
one and secure himself in doing the other, ought to be as far from such a study of the law, 
as he is concerned diligently to apply himself to that wherein he may be serviceable to his 
country. And to that purpose I think the right way for a gentleman to study our law, 
which he does not design for his calling, is to take a view of our English constitution and 
government, in the ancient books of the common law, and some more modern writers, 
who out of them have given an account of this government. And having got a true idea of 
that, then to read our history, and with it join in every king's reign the laws then made. 
This will give an insight into the reason of our statutes, and show the true ground upon 
which they came to be made, and what weight they ought to have. 

§ 188 Rhetoric, Logic. — Rhetoric and logic being the arts, that in the ordinary method 
usually follow immediately after grammar, it may perhaps be wondered that I have said 
so little of them. The reason is, because of the little advantage young people receive by 
them; for I have seldom or never observed any one to get the skill of reasoning well, or 
speaking handsomely by studying those rules which pretend to teach it: and therefore I 
would have a young gentleman take a view of them in the shortest systems that could be 
found without dwelling long on the contemplation and study of those formalities. Right 




reasoning is founded on something else than the predicaments and predicables, and does 
not consist in talking in mode and figure itself. But it is beside my present business to 
enlarge upon this speculation. To come therefore to what we have in hand; if you would 
have your son reason well, let him read Chilling worth; and if you would have him speak 
well, let him be conversant in Tully, to give him the true idea of eloquence, and let him 
read those things that are well written in English, to perfect his style in the purity of our 
language. 

§ 189 If the use and end of right reasoning be to have right notions, and a right 
judgment of things, to distinguish betwixt truth and falsehood, right and wrong, and to act 
accordingly, be sure not to let your son be bred up in the art and formality of disputing, 
either practising it himself, or admiring it in others; unless, instead of an able man, you 
desire to have him an insignificant wrangler, opiniator in discourse, and priding himself 
in contradicting others; or which is worse, questioning every thing, and thinking there is 
no such thing as truth to be sought, but only victory, in disputing. For this, in short, is the 
way and perfection of logical disputes, that the opponent never takes any answer, nor the 
respondent ever yields to any argument. This neither of them must do, whatever becomes 
of truth or knowledge, unless he will pass for a poor baffled wretch, and lie under the 
disgrace of not being able to maintain whatever he has once affirmed, which is the great 
aim and glory in disputing. Truth is to be found and supported by a mature and due 
consideration of things themselves, and not by artificial terms and ways of arguing: 
which lead not men so much into the discovery of truth, as into a captious and fallacious 
use of doubtful words, which is the most useless and disingenuous way of talking, and 
most unbecoming a gentleman or a lover of truth of any thing in the world. 

There can scarce be a greater defect in a gentleman than not to express himself well, 
either in writing or speaking. But yet, I think, I may ask my reader, Whether he does not 
know a great many, who live upon their estates, and so, with the name, should have the 
qualities of gentlemen, who cannot so much as tell a story as they should, much less 
speak clearly and persuasively in any business? This I think not to be so much their fault, 
as the fault of their education; for I must, without partiality, do my countrymen this right, 
that where they apply themselves, I see none of their neighbours outgo them. They have 
been taught rhetoric, but yet never taught how to express themselves handsomely with 
their tongues, or pens, in the language they are always to use; as if the names of the 
figures that embellished the discourses of those who understood the art of speaking, were 
the very art and skill of speaking well. This, as all other things of practice, is to be 
learned not by a few or a great many rules given, but by exercise and application, 
according to good rules, or rather patterns, till habits are got, and a facility of doing it 
well. 

Agreeable hereunto, perhaps it might not be amiss, to make children, as soon as they are 
capable of it, often to tell a story of any thing they know; and to correct at first the most 
remarkable fault they are guilty of, in their way of putting it together. When that fault is 
cured, then to show them the next, and so on, till one after another, all, at least the gross 
ones, are mended. When they can tell tales pretty well, then it may be time to make them 
write them. The fables of Aesop, the only book almost that I know fit for children, may 




afford them matter for this exercise of writing English, as well as for reading and 
translating, to enter them in the Latin tongue. When they are got past the faults of 
grammar; and can join in a continued, coherent discourse the several parts of a story, 
without bald and unhandsome forms of transition (as is usual) often repeated; he that 
desires to perfect them yet farther in this, which is the first step to speaking well, and 
needs no invention, may have recourse to Tully; and by putting in practice those rules, 
which that master of eloquence gives in his first book De Inventione, section 20, make 
them know wherein the skill and graces of a handsome narrative, according to the several 
subjects and designs of it, lie. Of each of which rules fit examples may be found out, and 
therein they may be shown how others have practised them. The ancient classic authors 
afford plenty of such examples, which they should be made not only to translate, but have 
set before them as patterns for their daily imitation. 

When they understand how to write English with due connection, propriety, and order, 
and are pretty well masters of a tolerable narrative style, they may be advanced to writing 
of letters; wherein they should not be put upon any strains of wit or compliment, but 
taught to express their own plain easy sense, without any incoherence, confusion, or 
roughness. And when they are perfect in this, they may, to raise their thoughts, have set 
before them the example of Voiture's, for the entertainment of their friends at a distance, 
with letters of compliment, mirth, raillery, or diversion; and Tully's epistles, as the best 
pattern, whether for business or conversation. The writing of letters has so much to do in 
all the occurrences of human life, that no gentleman can avoid showing himself in this 
kind of writing; occasions will daily force him to make this use of his pen, which, besides 
the consequences, that, in his affairs, his well or ill managing of it often draws after it, 
always lays him open to a severer examination of his breeding, sense, and abilities, than 
oral discourses; whose transient faults, dying for the most part with the sound that gives 
them life, and so not subject to a strict review, more easily escape observation and 
censure. 

Had the methods of education been directed to their right end, one would have thought 
this, so necessary a part, could not have been neglected, whilst themes and verses in 
Latin, of no use at all, were so constantly everywhere pressed, to the racking of children's 
inventions beyond their strength, and hindering their cheerful progress in learning the 
tongues, by unnatural difficulties. But custom has so ordained it, and who dares disobey? 
And would it not be very unreasonable to require of a learned country school-master 
(who has all the tropes and figures in Farnaby's Rhetoric at his fingers' end) to teach his 
scholar to express himself handsomely in English, when it appears to be so little his 
business or thought, that the boy's mother (despised, it is like, as illiterate, for not having 
read a system of logic and rhetoric) outdoes him in it? 

To write and speak correctly, gives a grace, and gains a favourable attention to what one 
has to say: and since it is English that an English gentleman will have constant use of, 
that is the language he should chiefly cultivate, and wherein most care should be taken to 
polish and perfect his style. To speak or write better Latin than English, may make a man 
be talked of; but he would find it more to his purpose to express himself well in his own 
tongue, that he uses every moment, than to have the vain commendation of others for a 




very insignificant quality. This I find universally neglected, and no care taken anywhere 
to improve young men in their own language, that they may thoroughly understand and 
be masters of it. If any one among us have a facility or purity more than ordinary in his 
mother- tongue, it is owing to chance or his genius, or any thing, rather than to his 
education, or any care of his teacher. To mind what English his pupil speaks or writes, is 
below the dignity of one bred up amongst Greek and Latin, though he have but little of 
them himself. These are the learned languages, fit only for learned men to meddle with 
and teach; English is the language of the illiterate vulgar; though yet we see the polity of 
some of our neighbours has not thought it beneath the public care, to promote and reward 
the improvement of their own language. Polishing and enriching their tongue, is no small 
business amongst them; it has colleges and stipends appointed it, and there is raised 
amongst them a great ambition and emulation of writing correctly: and we see what they 
are come to by it, and how far they have spread one of the worst languages possibly, in 
this part of the world, if we look upon it as it was in some few reigns backwards, 
whatever it be now. The great men amongst the Romans were daily exercising 
themselves in their own language and we find yet upon record, the names of orators, who 
taught some of their emperors Latin, though it were their mother- tongue. 

It is plain the Greeks were yet more nice in theirs; all other speech was barbarous to them 
but their own, and no foreign language appears to have been studied or valued amongst 
that learned and acute people; though it be past doubt, that they borrowed their learning 
and philosophy from abroad. 

I am not here speaking against Greek and Latin: I think they ought to be studied, and the 
Latin, at least, understood well by every gentleman. But whatever foreign languages a 
young man meddles with (and the more he knows the better), that which he should 
critically study, and labour to get a facility, clearness, and elegancy to express himself in, 
should be his own, and to this purpose he should daily be exercised in it. 

§190 Natural Philosophy. — Natural philosophy, as a speculative science, I imagine we 
have none, and perhaps I may think I have reason to say we never shall. The works of 
nature are contrived by a wisdom, and operate by ways too far surpassing our faculties to 
discover, or capacities to conceive, for us ever to be able to reduce them into a science. 
Natural philosophy being the knowledge of the principles, properties, and operations of 
things, as they are in themselves, I imagine there are two parts of it, one comprehending 
Spirits with their nature and qualities; and the other Bodies. The first of these is usually 
referred to metaphysics: but under what title soever the consideration of spirits comes, I 
think it ought to go before the study of matter and body, not as a science that can be 
methodized into a system, and treated of upon principles of knowledge; but as an 
enlargement of our minds towards a truer and fuller comprehension of the intellectual 
world, to which we are led both by reason and revelation. And since the clearest and 
largest discoveries we have of other spirits, besides God and our own souls, is imparted 
to us from heaven by revelation, I think the information that at least young people should 
have of them, should be taken from that revelation. To this purpose, I conclude it would 
be well if there were made a good history of the Bible for young people to read; wherein 
every thing that is fit to be put into it being laid down in its due order of time, and several 




things omitted which were suited only to riper age, that confusion which is usually 
produced by promiscuous reading of the Scripture, as it lies now bound up in our Bibles, 
would be avoided; and also this other good obtained, that by reading of it constantly, 
there would be instilled into the minds of children a notion and belief of spirits, they 
having so much to do, in all the transactions of that history, which will be a good 
preparation to the study of bodies. For without the notion and allowance of spirit, our 
philosophy will be lame and defective in one main part of it, when it leaves out the 
contemplation of the most excellent and powerful part of the creation. 

§191 Of this history of the Bible, I think, too, it would be well if there were a short and 
plain epitome made, containing the chief and most material heads for children to be 
conversant in, as soon as they can read. This, though it will lead them early in some 
notion of spirits, yet is not contrary to what I said above, that I would not have children 
troubled whilst young with notions of spirits; whereby my meaning was that I think it 
inconvenient that their yet tender minds should receive early impressions of goblins, 
spectres, and apparitions, wherewith their maids and those about them are apt to fright 
them into a compliance with their orders, which often proves a great inconvenience to 
them all their lives after, by subjecting their minds to frights, fearful apprehensions, 
weakness, and superstition; which, when coming abroad into the world and conversation, 
they grow weary and ashamed of, it not seldom happens, that to make, as they think, a 
thorough cure, and ease themselves of a load, which has sat so heavy on them, they throw 
away the thoughts of all spirits together, and so run into the other but worse extreme. 

§192 The reason why I would have this premised to the study of bodies, and the 
doctrine of the Scriptures well imbibed, before young men be entered in natural 
philosophy, is, because matter being a thing that all our senses are constantly conversant 
with, it is so apt to possess the mind, and exclude all other beings but matter, that 
prejudice, grounded on such principles, often leaves no room for the admittance of spirits, 
or the allowing any such things as immaterial beings, "in rerum natura;" when yet it is 
evident, that by mere matter and motion, none of the great phenomena of nature can be 
resolved to instance but in that common one of gravity; which I think impossible to be 
explained by any natural operation of matter, or any other law of motion, but the positive 
will of a superior Being so ordering it. And therefore since the Deluge cannot be well 
explained, without admitting something out of the ordinary course of nature, I propose it 
to be considered, whether God's altering the centre of gravity in the earth for a time (a 
thing as intelligible as gravity it self, which perhaps a little variation of causes, unknown 
to us, would produce) will not more easily account for Noah's flood, than any hypothesis 
yet made use of to solve it. I hear the great objection to this is, that it would produce but a 
partial deluge. But this I mention by the by, to show the necessity of having recourse to 
something beyond bare matter, and its motion, in the explication of nature; to which the 
notions of spirits, and their power, as delivered in the Bible, where so much is attributed 
to their operation, may be a fit preparative; reserving to a fitter opportunity a fuller 
explication of this hypothesis, and the application of it to all the parts of the Deluge, and 
any difficulties that can be supposed in the history of the Flood, as recorded in the Bible. 




§ 193 But to return to the study of natural philosophy: though the world be full of 
systems of it, yet I cannot say, I know any one which can be taught a young man as a 
science, wherein he may be sure to find truth and certainty, which is what all sciences 
give an expectation of. I do not hence conclude, that none of them are to be read; it is 
necessary for a gentleman, in this learned age, to look into some of them to fit himself for 
conversation: but whether that of Descartes be put into his hands, as that which is most in 
fashion, or it be thought fit to give him a short view of that and several others also; I think 
the systems of natural philosophy, that have obtained in this part of the world, are to he 
read more to know the hypotheses, and to understand the terms and ways of talking of the 
several sects, than with hopes to gain thereby a comprehensive, scientific, and 
satisfactory knowledge of the works of Nature; only this may be said, that the modern 
Corpuscularians talk, in most things, more intelligibly than the Peripatetics, who 
possessed the schools immediately before them. He that would look farther back, and 
acquaint himself with the several opinions of the ancients, may consult Dr. Cudworth's 
Intellectual System; wherein that very learned author has, with such accurateness and 
judgment, collected and explained the opinions of the Greek philosophers, that what 
principles they built on, and what were the chief hypotheses that divided them, is better to 
be seen in him than anywhere else that I know. But I would not deter any one from the 
study of nature, because all the knowledge we have, or possibly can have of it, cannot be 
brought into a science. There are very many things in it, that are convenient and 
necessary to be known to a gentleman; and a great many other, that will abundantly 
reward the pains of the curious with delight and advantage. But these, I think, are rather 
to be found amongst such writers as have employed themselves in making rational 
experiments and observations, than in starting barely speculative systems. Such writings, 
therefore, as many of Mr. Boyle's are, with others that have writ of husbandry, planting, 
gardening, and the like, may be fit for a gentleman, when he has a little acquainted 
himself with some of the systems of the natural philosophy in fashion. 

§ 194 Though the systems of physics that I have met with, afford little encouragement 
to look for certainty, or science, in any treatise, which shall pretend to give us a body of 
natural philosophy from the first principles of bodies in general; yet the incomparable Mr. 
Newton has shown how far mathematics, applied to some parts of nature, may, upon 
principles that matter of fact justify, carry us in the knowledge of some, as I may so call 
them, particular provinces of the incomprehensible universe. And if others could give us 
so good and clear an account of other parts of nature, as he has of this our planetary 
world, and the most considerable phenomena observable in it, in his admirable book 
Philosophiae naturalis Principia mathematica, we might in time hope to be furnished with 
more true and certain knowledge in several parts of this stupendous machine, than 
hitherto we could have expected. And though there are very few that have mathematics 
enough to understand his demonstrations; yet the most accurate mathematicians, who 
have examined them, allowing them to be such, his book will deserve to be read, and give 
no small light and pleasure to those, who, willing to understand the motions, properties, 
and operations of the great masses of matter in this our solar system, will but carefully 
mind his conclusions, which may be depended on as propositions well proved. 




§195 Greek. — This is, in short, what I have thought concerning a young gentleman's 
studies; wherein it will possibly be wondered that I should omit Greek, since amongst the 
Grecians is to be found the original, as it were, and foundation of all that learning which 
we have in this part of the world. I grant it so; and will add, that no man can pass for a 
scholar, that is ignorant of the Greek tongue. But I am not here considering of the 
education of a professed scholar, but of a gentleman, to whom Latin and French, as the 
world now goes, is by every one acknowledged to be necessary. When he comes to be a 
man, if he has a mind to carry his studies farther, and look into the Greek learning, he 
will then easily get that tongue himself; and if he has not that inclination, his learning of 
it under a tutor will be but lost labour, and much of his time and pains spent in that which 
will be neglected and thrown away as soon as he is at liberty. For how many are there of 
a hundred, even amongst scholars themselves, who retain the Greek they carried from 
school; or ever improve it to a familiar reading, and perfect understanding of Greek 
authors? 

To conclude this part, which concerns a young gentleman's studies, his tutor should 
remember, that his business is not so much to teach him all that is knowable, as to raise in 
him a love and esteem of knowledge; and to put him in the right way of knowing and 
improving himself, when he has a mind to it. The thoughts of a judicious author [La 
Bruyere, Moeurs du Siecle] on the subject of languages, I shall here give the reader, as 
near as I can in his own way of expressing them. He says, "one can scarce burden 
children too much with the knowledge of languages. They are useful to men of all 
conditions; and they equally open them the entrances either to the most profound, or the 
more easy and entertaining parts of learning. If this irksome study be put off to a little 
more advanced age, young men either have not resolution enough to apply it out of 
choice, or steadiness to carry it on. And if any one has the gift of perseverance, it is not 
without the inconvenience of spending that time upon languages, which is destined to 
other uses. And he confines to the study of words that age of his life that is above it, and 
requires things; at least, it is the losing of the best and beautifullest seasons of one's life. 
This large foundation of languages cannot be well laid, but when every thing makes an 
easy and deep impression on the mind; when the memory is fresh, ready and tenacious; 
when the head and heart are yet as free from cares, passions and designs; and those on 
whom the child depends have authority enough to keep him close to a long continued 
application. I am persuaded, that the small number of truly learned, and the multitude of 
superficial pretenders, is owing to the neglect of it." 

I think every body will agree with this observing gentleman, that languages are the proper 
study of our first years. But it is to be considered by the parents and tutors, what tongues 
it is fit the child should learn: for it must be confessed, that it is fruitless pains, and loss of 
time, to learn a language, which in the course of life that he is designed to, he is never 
like to make use of, or which one may guess by his temper he will wholly neglect and 
lose again, as soon as an approach to manhood, setting him free from a governor, shall 
put him into the hands of his own inclination, which is not likely to allot any of his time 
to the cultivating the learned tongues, or dispose him to mind any other language, but 
what daily use, or some particular necessity shall force upon him. 




But yet, for the sake of those who are designed to be scholars, I will add what the same 
author subjoins to make good his foregoing remark. It will deserve to be considered by all 
who desire to be truly learned; and therefore may be a fit rule for tutors to inculcate, and 
leave with their pupils to guide their future studies. 

"The study," says he, "of the original text, can never be sufficiently recommended. 'Tis 
the shortest, surest, and most agreeable way to all sorts of learning. Draw from the 
spring-head; and take no things at second hand. Let the writings of the great masters be 
never laid aside, dwell upon them, settle them in your mind, and cite them upon occasion; 
and make it your business thoroughly to understand them in their full extent, and all their 
circumstances: acquaint yourself fully with the principles of original authors; bring them 
to a consistency, and then do you yourself make your deductions. In this state were the 
first commentators; and do not you rest till you bring yourself to the same. Content not 
yourself with those borrowed lights, nor guide yourself by their views, but where your 
own fails you, and leaves you in the dark. Their explications are not your's, and will give 
you the flip. On the contrary, your own observations are the product of your own mind, 
where they will abide, and be ready at hand upon all occasions in converse, consultation 
and dispute. Lose not the pleasure it is to see that you are not stopped in your reading, but 
by difficulties that are invincible; where the commentators and scholars themselves are at 
a stand, and have nothing to say. Those copious expositors of other places, who with a 
vain and pompous overflow of learning, pondered out on passages, plain and easy in 
themselves, are very free of their words and pains, where there is no need. Convince 
yourself fully by this ordering your studies, that 'tis nothing but men's laziness which has 
encouraged pedantry to cram rather than enrich libraries, and to bury good authors under 
heaps of notes and commentaries, and you will perceive that sloth herein has acted 
against itself, and its own interest, by multiplying reading and enquiries, and increasing 
the pains it endeavoured to avoid." 

This, though it may seem to concern none but direct scholars, is of so great moment for 
the right ordering of their education aud studies, that I hope I shall not be blamed for 
inserting of it here; especially if it be considered, that it may be of use to gentlemen too, 
when at any time they have a mind to go deeper than the surface, and get to themselves a 
solid, satisfactory, and masterly insight in any part of learning. 

Method. — Order and constancy are said to make the great difference between one man 
and another; this I am sure, nothing so much clears a learner's way, helps him so much on 
in it, and makes him go so easy and so far in any inquiry, as a good method. His governor 
should take pains to make him sensible of this, accustom him to order, and teach him 
method in all the applications of his thoughts; show him wherein it lies, and the 
advantages of it; acquaint him with the several sorts of it, either from general to 
particulars, or from particulars to what is more general; exercise him in both of them; and 
make him see, in what cases each different method is most proper, and to what ends it 
best serves. 

In history the order of time should govern; in philosophical inquiries, that of nature, 
which in all progression is to go from the place one is then in, to that which joins and lies 




next to it; and so it is in the mind, from the knowledge it stands possessed of already, to 
that which lies next, and is coherent to it, and so on to what it aims at, by the simplest and 
most uncompounded parts it can divide the matter into. To this purpose, it will be of great 
use to his pupil to accustom him to distinguish well, that is, to have distinct notions, 
wherever the mind can find any real difference; but as carefully to avoid distinctions in 
terms, where he has not distinct and different clear ideas. 

§196 Besides what is to be had from study and books, there are other accomplishments 
necessary to a gentleman, to be got by exercise, and to which time is to be allowed, and 
for which masters must be had. 

Dancing. — Dancing being that which gives graceful motions all the life, and, above all 
things, manliness and a becoming confidence to young children, I think it cannot be 
learned too early, after they are once of an age and strength capable of it. But you must be 
sure to have a good master, that knows, and can teach, what is graceful and becoming, 
and what gives a freedom and easiness to all the motions of the body. One that teaches 
not this is worse than none at all, natural unfashionableness being much better than apish, 
affected postures; and I think it much more passable to put off the hat, and make a leg, 
like an honest country gentleman, than like an ill-fashioned dancing-master. For, as for 
the jigging part, and the figures of dances, I count that little or nothing farther than as it 
tends to perfect graceful carriage. 

§197 Music. — Music is thought to have some affinity with dancing, and a good hand, 
upon some instruments, is by many people mightily valued. But it wastes so much of a 
young man's time, to gain but a moderate skill in it, and engages often in such odd 
company, that many think it much better spared; and I have, amongst men of parts and 
business, so seldom heard any one commended or esteemed for having an excellency in 
music, that amongst all those things, that ever came into the list of accomplishments, I 
think I may give it the last place. Our short lives will not serve us for the attainment of all 
things; nor can our minds be always intent on something to be learned. The weakness of 
our constitutions, both of mind and body, requires that we should be often unbent: and he 
that will make a good use of any part of his life, must allow a large portion of it to 
recreation. At least this must not be denied to young people, unless, whilst you with too 
much haste make them old, you have the displeasure to set them in their graves, or a 
second childhood, sooner than you could wish. And therefore I think that the time and 
pains allotted to serious improvements should be employed about things of most use and 
consequence, and that too in the methods the most easy and short, that could be at any 
rate obtained; and perhaps it would be none of the least secrets of education to make the 
exercises of the body and the mind, the recreation one to another. I doubt not but that 
something might be done in it, by a prudent man, that would well consider the temper and 
inclination of his pupil. For he that is wearied either with study or dancing, does not 
desire presently to go to sleep; but to do something else which may divert and delight 
him. But this must be always remembered, that nothing can come into the account of 
recreation that is not done with delight. 




§198 Fencing, and riding the great horse, are looked upon as so necessary parts of 
breeding, that it would be thought a great omission to neglect them: the latter of the two, 
being for the most part to be learned only in great towns, is one of the best exercises for 
health which is to be had in those places of ease and luxury; and, upon that account, 
makes a fit part of a young gentleman's employment, during his abode there. And, as far 
as it conduces to give a man a firm and graceful seat on horseback, and to make him able 
to teach his horse to stop, and turn quick, and to rest on his haunches, is of use to a 
gentleman both in peace and war. But, whether it be of moment enough to be made a 
business of, and deserve to take up more of his time than should barely for his health be 
employed, at due intervals, in some such vigorous exercise, I shall leave to the discretion 
of parents and tutors; who will do well to remember, in all the parts of education, that 
most time and application is to be bestowed on that which is like to be of greatest 
consequence and frequent use, in the ordinary course and occurrences of that life the 
young man is designed for. 

§199 Fencing. — As for fencing, it seems to me a good exercise for health, but 
dangerous to the life, the confidence of it being apt to engage in quarrels those that think 
they have some skill, and to make them often more touchy than needs, on points of 
honour, and slight provocations. Young men in their warm blood are forward to think 
they have in vain learned to fence if they never show their skill and courage in a duel; and 
they seem to have reason. But how many sad tragedies that reason has been the occasion 
of, the tears of many a mother can witness. A man that cannot fence will be more careful 
to keep out of bullies' and gamesters' company, and will not be half so apt to stand upon 
punctilios nor to give affronts, or fiercely justify them when given, which is that which 
usually makes the quarrel. And when a man is in the field, a moderate skill in fencing 
rather exposes him to the sword of his enemy, than secures him from it. And certainly a 
man of courage, who cannot fence at all, and therefore will put all upon one thrust, and 
not stand parrying, has the odds against a moderate fencer, especially if he has skill in 
wrestling. And therefore, if any provision be to be made against such accidents, and a 
man be to prepare his son for duels, I had much rather mine should be a good wrestler, 
than an ordinary fencer; which is the most a gentleman can attain to in it, unless he will 
be constantly in the fencing school, and every day exercising. But since fencing and 
riding the great horse are so generally looked upon as necessary qualifications in the 
breeding of a gentleman, it will be hard wholly to deny any one of that rank these marks 
of distinction. I shall leave it therefore to the father, to consider, how far the temper of his 
son, and the station he is like to be in, will allow or encourage him to comply with 
fashions, which, having very little to do with civil life, were yet formerly unknown to the 
most warlike nations; and seem to have added little of force or courage to those who have 
received them; unless we will think martial skill or prowess have been improved by 
duelling, with which fencing came into, and with which, I presume, it will go out of the 
world. 

§ 200 These are my present thoughts concerning learning and accomplishments. The 
great business of all is virtue and wisdom. Nullum numen abest, si sit prudentia [No 
heavenly powers will lack where wisdom is]. 




Teach him to get a mastery over his inclinations, and submit his appetite to reason. This 
being obtained, and by constant practice settled into habit, the hardest part of the task is 
over. To bring a young man to this, I know nothing which so much contributes as the 
love of praise and commendation, which should therefore be instilled into him by all arts 
imaginable. Make his mind as sensible of credit and shame as may be: and when you 
have done that, you have put a principle into him which will influence his actions, when 
you are not by, to which the fear of a little smart of a rod is not comparable, and which 
will be the proper stock, whereon afterwards to graft the true principles of morality and 
religion. 

§201 Trade. — I have one more thing to add, which as soon as I mention I shall run the 
danger to be suspected to have forgot what I am about, and what I have above written 
concerning education, which has all tended towards a gentleman's calling, with which a 
trade seems wholly to be inconsistent. And yet, I cannot forbear to say, I would have him 
learn a trade, a manual trade; nay, two or three, but one more particularly. 

§ 202 The busy inclination of children being always to be directed to something that 
may be useful to them, the advantage may be considered of two kinds: 1. Where the skill 
itself, that is got by exercise, is worth the having. Thus skill not only in languages and 
learned sciences, but in painting, turning, gardening, tempering and working in iron, and 
all other useful arts, is worth the having. 2. Where the exercise itself, without any 
consideration, is necessary or useful for health. Knowledge in some things is so necessary 
to be got by children whilst they are young, that some part of their time is to be allotted to 
their improvement in them, though those employments contribute nothing at all to their 
health: such are reading and writing, and all other sedentary studies, for the improvement 
of the mind, and are the unavoidable business of gentlemen quite from their cradles. 

Other manual arts, which are both got and exercised by labour, do many of them by their 
exercise contribute to our health too, especially such as employ us in the open air. In 
these, then, health and improvement may be joined together, and of these should some fit 
ones be chosen, to be made the recreations of one, whose chief business is with books 
and study. In this choice, the age and inclination of the person is to be considered, and 
constraint always to be avoided in bringing him to it. For command and force may often 
create, but can never cure an aversion; and whatever any one is brought to by compulsion 
he will leave as soon as he can, and be little profited, and less recreated by, whilst he is at 
it. 

§ 203 Painting. — That which of all others would please me best would be a painter, 
were there not an argument or two against it not easy to be answered. First, ill painting is 
one of the worst things in the world; and to attain a tolerable degree of skill in it, requires 
too much of a man's time. If he has a natural inclination to it, it will endanger the neglect 
of all other more useful studies, to give way to that; and if he have no inclination to it, all 
the time, pains and money that shall be employed in it will be thrown away to no 
purpose. Another reason why I am not for painting in a gentleman is because it is a 
sedentary recreation, which more employs the mind than the body. A gentleman's more 
serious employment I look on to be study; and when that demands relaxation and 




refreshment, it should be in some exercise of the body, which unbends the thought and 
confirms the health and strength. For these two reasons I am not for painting. 

§ 204 Gardening- Joiner. — In the next place, for a country gentleman, I should propose 
one, or rather both these - viz., gardening and working in wood, as a carpenter, joiner, or 
turner, as being fit and healthy recreations for a man of study or business. For since the 
mind endures not to be constantly employed in the same thing or way; and sedentary or 
studious men should have some exercise, that at the same time might divert their minds 
and employ their bodies; I know none that could do better for a country gentleman than 
these two, the one of them affording him exercise, when the weather or season keeps him 
from the other. Besides, that, by being skilled in the one of them, he will be able to 
govern and teach his gardener; by the other, contrive and make a great many things both 
of delight and use: though these I propose not as the chief ends of his labour, but as 
temptations to it: diversion from his other more serious thoughts and employments by 
useful and healthy manual exercise being what I chiefly aim at in it. 

§ 205 The great men among the ancients understood very well how to reconcile manual 
labour with affairs of state, and thought it no lessening to their dignity to make the one 
the recreation to the other. That indeed which seems most generally to have employed 
and diverted their spate hours, was agriculture. Gideon among the Jews was taken from 
threshing, as well as Cincinnatus amongst the Romans, from the plough, to command the 
armies of their countries against their enemies; and 'tis plain their dexterous handling of 
the flail or the plough, and being good workmen with their tools, did not hinder their skill 
in arms, nor make them less able in the arts of war or government. They were great 
captains and statesmen, as well as husbandmen. Cato major, who had with great 
reputation born all the great offices of the commonwealth, has left us an evidence under 
his own hand, how much he was versed in country affairs; and, as I remember, Cyrus 
thought gardening so little beneath the dignity and grandeur of a throne, that he showed 
Xenophon a large field of fruit-trees, all of his own planting. The records of antiquity, 
both amongst Jews and Gentiles, are full of instances of this kind, if it were necessary to 
recommend useful recreations by examples. 

§ 206 Recreation. — Nor let it be thought that I mistake when I call these or the like 
trades, diversions or recreations: for recreation is not being idle (as every one may 
observe), but easing the wearied part by change of business: and he that thinks diversion 
may not lie in hard and painful labour, forgets the early rising, hard riding, heat, cold and 
hunger of huntsmen, which is yet known to be the constant recreation of men of the 
greatest condition. Delving, planting, inoculating, or any the like profitable employments, 
would be no less a diversion than any of the idle sports in fashion, if men could but be 
brought to delight in them, which custom and skill in a trade will quickly bring any one to 
do. And I doubt not, but there are to be found those, who, being frequently called to 
cards, or any other play, by those they could not refuse, have been more tired with these 
recreations, than with any the most serious employment of life; though the play has been 
such as they have naturally had no aversion to, and with which they could willingly 
sometimes divert themselves. 




§ 207 Though when one reflects on these and other the like pastimes (as they are 
called) one finds they leave little satisfaction behind them, when they are over; and most 
commonly give more vexation than delight to people, whilst they are actually engaged in 
them, and neither profit the mind nor the body. They are plain instances to me that men 
cannot be perfectly idle; they must be doing something. The skill should be so to employ 
their time of recreation that it may relax and refresh the part that has been exercised, and 
is tired; and yet do something, which, besides the present delight and ease, may produce 
what will afterwards be profitable. It has been nothing but the vanity and pride of 
greatness and riches, that has brought unprofitable and dangerous pastimes into fashion, 
and persuaded people into a belief, that the learning or putting their hands to any thing 
that was useful, could not be a diversion fit for a gentleman. This has been that which has 
given cards, dice, and drinking so much credit in the world; and a great many throw away 
their spare hours in them, through the prevalency of custom, and want of some better 
employment to pass their time, more than from any real delight [that] is to be found in 
them, only because it being very irksome and uneasy to do nothing at all, they had never 
learned any laudable manual art wherewith to divert themselves; and so they betake 
themselves to those foolish or ill ways in use, to help off their time, which a rational man, 
till corrupted by custom, could find very little pleasure in. 

§ 208 Trade. — I say not this, that I would never have a young gentleman accommodate 
himself to the innocent diversions in fashion amongst those of his age and condition. I am 
so far from having him austere and morose to that degree, that I would persuade him to 
more than ordinary complaisance for all the gaieties and diversions of those he converses 
with, and be averse or resty in nothing they should desire of him, that might become a 
gentleman and an honest man. But allowance being made for idle and jovial 
conversation, and all fashionable becoming recreations, I say, a young man will have 
time enough, from his serious and main business, to learn almost any trade. 'Tis want of 
application, and not of leisure, that men are not skilful in more arts than one; and an hour 
in a day, constantly employed in such a way of diversion, will carry a man in a short time 
a great deal farther than he can imagine: which, if it were of no other use, but to drive the 
common, vicious, useless, and dangerous pastimes out of fashion, and to show there was 
no need of them, would deserve to be encouraged. If men from their youth were weaned 
from that sauntering humour, wherein some, out of custom, lot a good part of their lives 
run uselessly away, without either business or recreation, they would find time enough to 
acquire dexterity and skill in hundreds of things, which, though remote from their proper 
callings, would not at all interfere with them. And therefore, I think, for this, as well as 
other reasons before-mentioned, a lazy, listless humour, that idly dreams away the days, 
is of all others the least to be indulged, or permitted in young people. It is the proper state 
of one sick, and out of order in his health, and is tolerable in nobody else, of what age or 
condition soever. 

§ 209 To the arts above-mentioned may be added perfuming, varnishing, graving, and 
several sorts of working in iron, brass, and silver: and if, as it happens to most young 
gentlemen, that a considerable part of his time be spent in a great town, he may learn to 
cut, polish, and set precious stones, or employ himself in grinding and polishing optical 
glasses. Amongst the great variety there is of ingenious manual arts, 'twill be impossible 




that no one should be found to please and delight him, unless he be either idle or 
debauched, which is not to be supposed in a right way of education. And since he cannot 
be always employed in study, reading, and conversation, there will be many an hour, 
besides what his exercises will take up, which, if not spent this way, will be spent worse. 
For, I conclude, a young man will seldom desire to sit perfectly still and idle; or if he 
does, it is a fault that ought to he mended. 

§210 But if his mistaken parents, frightened with the disgraceful names of mechanic 
and trade; shall have an aversion to anything of this kind in their children; yet there is one 
thing relating to trade, which, when they consider, they will think absolutely necessary 
for their sons to learn. 

Merchants' Accounts. — Merchants' accounts, though a science not likely to help a 
gentleman to get an estate, yet possibly there is not any thing of more use and efficacy to 
make him preserve the estate he has. 'Tis seldom observed that he who keeps an account 
of his income and expenses and thereby has constantly under view the course of his 
domestic affairs, lets them run to ruin; and I doubt not but many a man gets behindhand 
before he is aware, or runs farther on, when he is once in, for want of this care, or the 
skill to do it. I would therefore advise all gentlemen to learn perfectly merchants' 
accounts, and not to think it is a skill that belongs not to them because it has received its 
name from, and has been chiefly practised by, men of traffic. 

§211 When my young master has once got the skill of keeping accounts (which is a 
business of reason more than arithmetic), perhaps it will not be amiss, that his father from 
thenceforth require him to do it in all his concernments. Not that I would have him set 
down every pint of wine, or play, that costs him money; the general name of expenses 
will serve for such things well enough: nor would I have his father look so narrowly into 
these accounts, as to take occasion from thence to criticize on his expenses. He must 
remember, that he himself was once a young man, and not forget the thoughts he had 
then, nor the right his son has to have the same, and to have allowance made for them. If 
therefore I would have the young gentleman obliged to keep an account, it is not at all to 
have that way a check upon his expenses (for what the father allows him, he ought to let 
him be fully master of), but only that he might be brought early into the custom of doing 
it, and that that might be made familiar and habitual to him betimes, which will be so 
useful and necessary to be constantly practised through the whole course of his life. A 
noble Venetian, whose son wallowed in the plenty of his father's riches, finding his son's 
expenses grow very high and extravagant, ordered his cashier to let him have for the 
future no more money than what he should count when he received it. This one would 
think no great restraint to a young gentleman's expenses, who could freely have as much 
money as he would tell. But yet this, to one who was used to nothing but the pursuit of 
his pleasures, proved a very great trouble, which at last ended in this sober and 
advantageous reflection: If it be so much pains to me barely to count the money I would 
spend, what labour and pains did it cost my ancestors, not only to count, but get it? This 
rational thought, suggested by this little pains imposed upon him, wrought so effectually 
upon his mind, that it made him take up, and from that time forwards prove a good 
husband. This at least everybody must allow, that nothing is likelier to keep a man within 




compass than the having constantly before his eyes the state of his affairs in a regular 
course of accounts. 

§212 Travel. — The last part usually in education is travel, which is commonly thought 
to finish the work, and complete the gentleman. I confess, travel into foreign countries 
has great advantages; but the time usually chosen to send young men abroad, is, I think, 
of all other, that which renders them least capable of reaping those advantages. Those 
which are proposed, as to the main of them, may be reduced to these two; first, language; 
secondly, an improvement in wisdom and prudence by seeing men, and conversing with 
people of tempers, customs, and ways of living, different from one another, and 
especially from those of his parish and neighbourhood. But from sixteen to one and 
twenty, which is the ordinary time of travel, men are, of all their lives, the least suited to 
these improvements. The first season to get foreign languages, and form the tongue to 
their true accents, I should think, should be from seven to fourteen or sixteen and then 
too, a tutor with them is useful and necessary, who may, with those languages, teach 
them other things. But to put them out of their parents' view, at a great distance, under a 
governor, when they think themselves too much men to be governed by others, and yet 
have not prudence and experience enough to govern themselves: what is it, but to expose 
them to all the greatest dangers of their whole life, when they have the least fence and 
guard against them? Till that boiling, boisterous part of life comes in, it may be hoped, 
the tutor may have some authority; neither the stubbornness of age, nor the temptation of 
examples of others can take him from his tutor's conduct, till fifteen or sixteen: but then, 
when he begins to consort himself with men, and think himself one; when he comes to 
relish and pride himself in manly vices, and thinks it a shame to be any longer under the 
control and conduct of another: what can be hoped from even the most careful and 
discreet governor, when neither he has power to compel, nor his pupil a disposition to be 
persuaded; but, on the contrary, has the advice of warm blood, and prevailing fashion, to 
hearken to the temptations of his companions, just as wise as himself, rather than to the 
persuasions of his tutor, who is now looked on as the enemy to his freedom? And when is 
a man so like to miscarry, as when at the same time he is both raw and unruly? This is the 
season of all his life that most requires the eye and authority of his parents and friends to 
govern it. The flexibleness of the former part of a man's age, not yet grown up to be 
headstrong, makes it more governable and safe; and, in the after-part, reason and 
foresight begin a little to take place, and mind a man of his safety and improvement. The 
time therefore I should think the fittest for a young gentleman to be sent abroad would be 
either when he is younger, under a tutor, whom he might be the better for; or when he 
was some years older, when he is of age to govern himself, and make observations of 
what he finds in other countries worthy his notice, and that might be of use to him after 
his return: and when too, being thoroughly acquainted with the laws and fashions, the 
natural and moral advantages and defects of his own country, he has something to 
exchange with those abroad, from whose conversation he hoped to reap any knowledge. 

§213 The ordering of travel otherwise is that, I imagine, which makes so many young 
gentlemen come back so little improved by it. And if they do bring home with them any 
knowledge of the places and people they have seen, it is often an admiration of the worst 
and vainest practices they met with abroad; retaining a relish and memory of those things 




wherein their liberty took its first swing, rather than of what should make them better and 
wiser after their return. And indeed, how can it be otherwise, going abroad at the age they 
do, under a governor, who is to provide their necessaries, and make their observations for 
them? Thus, under the shelter and pretence of a governor, thinking themselves excused 
from standing upon their own legs, or being accountable for their own conduct, they very 
seldom trouble themselves with inquiries, or making useful observations of their own. 
Their thoughts run after play and pleasure, wherein they take it as a lessening to be 
controlled; but seldom trouble themselves to examine the designs, observe the address, 
and consider the arts, tempers, and inclinations of men they meet with; that so they may 
know how to comport themselves towards them. Here he that travels with them, is to 
screen them, get them out, when they have run themselves into the briars; and in all their 
miscarriages be answerable for them. 

§214 I confess, the knowledge of men is so great a skill, that it is not to be expected a 
young man should presently be perfect in it. But yet his going abroad is to little purpose, 
if travel does not somewhat open his eyes, make him cautious and wary, and accustom 
him to look beyond the outside, and, under the inoffensive guard of a civil and obliging 
carriage, keep himself free and safe in his conversation with strangers, and all sorts of 
people, without forfeiting their good opinion. He that is sent out to travel at the age, and 
with the thoughts of a man designing to improve himself, may get into the conversation 
and acquaintance of persons of condition where he comes: which, though a thing of most 
advantage to a gentleman that travels, yet I ask, amongst our young men that go abroad 
under tutors, What one is there of an hundred, that ever visits any person of quality? 
much less makes an acquaintance with such, from whose conversation he may learn what 
is good breeding in that country, and what is worth observation in it; though from such 
persons it is, one may learn more in one day, than in a year's rambling from one June to 
another. Nor indeed is it to be wondered; for men of worth and parts will not easily admit 
the familiarity of boys who yet need the care of a tutor: though a young gentleman and 
stranger, appearing like a man, and showing a desire to inform himself in the customs, 
manners, laws, and government of the country he is in, will find welcome assistance and 
entertainment amongst the best and most knowing persons everywhere, who will be 
ready to receive, encourage, and countenance an ingenuous and inquisitive foreigner. 

§215 This, how true soever it be, will not, I fear, alter the custom, which has cast the 
time of travel upon the worst part of a man's life; but for reasons not taken from their 
improvement. The young lad must not be ventured abroad at eight or ten, for fear of what 
may happen to the tender child, though he then runs ten times less risk than at sixteen or 
eighteen. Nor must he stay at home till that dangerous heady age be over, because he 
must be back again by one and twenty, to marry and propagate. The father cannot stay 
any longer for the portion, nor the mother for a new set of babies to play with; and so my 
young master, whatever comes on it, must have a wife looked out for him, by that time he 
is of age; though it would be no prejudice to his strength, his parts, nor his issue, if it 
were respited for some time, and he had leave to get, in years and knowledge, the start a 
little of his children, who are often found to tread too near upon the heels of their fathers, 
to the no great satisfaction either of son or father. But the young gentleman being got 
within view of matrimony, 'tis time to leave him to his mistress. 




§216 [Conclusion.] — Though I am now come to a conclusion of what obvious remarks 
have suggested to me concerning education, I would not have it thought that I look on it 
as a just treatise on this subject. There are a thousand other things that may need 
consideration; especially if one should take in the various tempers, different inclinations, 
and particular defaults, that are to be found in children; and prescribe proper remedies. 
The variety is so great, that it would require a volume; nor would that reach it. Each 
man's mind has some peculiarity, as well as his face, that distinguishes him from all 
others; and there are possibly scarce two children who can be conducted by exactly the 
same method. Besides that, I think a prince, a nobleman, and an ordinary gentleman's 
son, should have different ways of breeding. But having had here only some general 
views, in reference to the main end and aims in education, and those designed for a 
gentleman's son, whom being then very little, I considered only as white paper, or wax, to 
be moulded and fashioned as one pleases, I have touched little more than those heads, 
which I judged necessary for the breeding of a young gentleman of his condition in 
general; and have now published these my occasional thoughts, with this hope, that, 
though this be far from being a complete treatise on this subject, or such as that every one 
may find what will just fit his child in it; yet it may give some small light to those, whose 
concern for their dear little ones makes them so irregularly bold, that they dare venture to 
consult their own reason, in the education of their children, rather than wholly to rely 
upon old custom. 



About this online edition 

This E-text is from the edition included in The Educational Writings of John Locke, 
edited by John William Adamson, published by Cambridge University Press in 1922. 
This edition was based primarily on the 1693 first print, but it includes most of the 
passages that Locke added in subsequent prints. For better readability, Adamson slightly 
modernized the spelling, replacing words like "strengthen'd" or "physick" with 
"strengthened" and "physic", and using lowercase where in the original Print, numerous 
Nouns had Capitals like in this Sentence. 

Adamson also left out a few pages such as § 10-28, about health care, and failed to 
include all the passages that had been added after the first print. In this online version, all 
omitted passages have been re-inserted, using the 12th edition published by J. Brown, 
Edinburgh 1752. For consistency, we modernized the spelling of such re-inserted text in 
the same way as Adamson did for the rest. 



Henk van Setten 




